 CHAPTER 8

Creating a Republican
Culture, 1790–1820


 “The American war is over,” Philadelphia Patriot Benjamin Rush declared in 1787, “but this is far from being the case with the American Revolution. On the contrary, nothing but the first act of the great drama is closed. It remains yet to establish and perfect our new forms of government.” The changes that had already unfolded since 1763 were revolutionary in themselves: Britain had triumphed in the Great War for Empire, only to see its American empire unravel and descend into war. Against all odds, the thirteen rebelling colonies had pulled together and won their independence; now they were forming a federal republic that would take its place among the nations of the world. The republican revolution extended far beyond politics. It challenged many of the values and institutions that had prevailed for centuries in Europe and the Atlantic World. After 1776, Americans reconsidered basic assumptions that structured their societies, cultures, families, and communities. Here, in summary, are the three principal developments discussed in Part 3:



From British North America to
 the United States of America

Challenges to the Social Order


 After violently rejecting attempts to reform the British Empire, the Patriots won independence and began constructing republican governments. Their experiments extended across an entire generation, and it took still longer to decide how much power the federal republic should wield over the states. The political culture spawned by the Revolution was similarly unformed and slow to develop. Political parties, for example, were unanticipated by the founders and, at first, widely regarded as illegitimate. However, by 1820, they had become central to the adjudication of political conflict, heightening some forms of competition while blunting others. The United States also fought wars with Native Americans in the trans-Appalachian west to gain new territory, and with Great Britain to ensure its independence. Across three generations, American political culture was transformed, national borders were secured, and republican national and state governments commanded the allegiance of their citizens.

 As Patriots articulated values they associated with independence, they aligned their movement with currents of reform eddying through the Atlantic World: antislavery; women’s rights; religious liberty; social equality. Each of these ideas was controversial, and the American Revolution endorsed none of them in an unqualified way. But its idealism — the sense that the Revolution marked “a memorable epoch in the annals of the human race,” as John Adams put it — made the era malleable and full of possibility. Legislatures abolished slavery in the North, broadened religious liberty by allowing freedom of conscience, and, except in New England, ended the system of legally established churches. Postwar evangelicalism gave enormous energy to a new wave of innovative religious developments. However, Americans continued to argue over social equality, in part because their republican creed placed family authority in the hands of men and political power in the hands of propertied individuals: this arrangement denied power and status not only to slaves but also to free blacks, women, and middling and poor white men. Though the Revolution’s legacy was mixed, its meaning would be debated for decades in American public life.

 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820



Revolution and
Republican Culture
1763–1820


Conquest, Competition,
 and Consolidation

Thematic Understanding


 One uncontested value of the Revolutionary era was a commitment to economic opportunity. To achieve this, people migrated in large numbers, and the United States dramatically expanded its boundaries: first, by conquest, pushing west to the Mississippi River; then, by purchase, all the way to the Pacific Ocean. Northern merchants created a banking system and organized rural manufacturing. State governments used charters and other privileges to assist businesses and to improve infrastructure. Southern planters used slaves to grow a new staple crop — cotton. Many yeomen farm families moved west to farm; and Eastern laborers worked in burgeoning manufacturing enterprises. By 1820, the young American republic was on the verge of achieving economic as well as political independence. Even as the borders of the United States expanded, its diversity inhibited the effort to define an American culture and identity. Native Americans still lived in their own clans and nations; black Americans were developing a distinct African American culture; and White Americans were enmeshed in vigorous regional ethnic communities. Over time, political institutions began to unite Americans of diverse backgrounds, as did increasing participation in the market economy and in evangelical Protestant churches. By 1820, to be an American meant, for many members of the dominant white population, to be a republican, a Protestant, and an enterprising individual.

 This timeline arranges some of the important



 events of this period into themes. Consider the items listed under the theme “Ideas, Beliefs, and Culture.” How did the American Revolution challenge existing social arrangements? Consider the role of religion in American life, the status of women, and the institution of slavery. What tensions developed as a result of those challenges? >

WORK, EXCHANGE, & TECHNOLOGY

 Merchants defy Sugar and Stamp Acts Patriots mount three boycotts of British goods, in 1765, 1767, and 1774

 PEOPLING

 POLITICS & POWER

 Migration into the Ohio Valley after Pontiac’s Rebellion Quebec Act (1774) allows Catholicism

IDEAS, BELIEFS, & CULTURE

Stamp Act Congress
(1765)


 Patriots call for American unity

First Continental
Congress (1774)


 The idea of natural rights poses a challenge to the institution of chattel slavery

Second Continental
Congress (1775)


 IDENTITY

 Concept of popular sovereignty gains force in the colonies Colonists lay claim to rights of Englishmen

 Boycotts spur Patriot women to make textiles



 Manufacturing expands during the war Cutoff of trade and severe inflation threaten economy War debt grows

 Declining immigration from Europe (1775–1820) enhances American identity African American slaves seek freedom through military service

The Declaration of
Independence (1776)
 States adopt republican constitutions (1776 on) Articles of Confederation ratified (1781) Treaty of Paris (1783)



Bank of North America
 founded (1781) Land speculation increases in the West

 State cessions, land ordinances, and Indian wars create national domain in the West The Alien Act makes it harder for immigrants to become citizens and allow for deporting aliens (1798)



 Cotton output and demand for African labor expands Farm productivity improves Embargo encourages U.S. manufacturing Second Bank of the United States chartered (1816–1836)

 Suffrage for white men expands; New Jersey retracts suffrage for propertied women (1807) Atlantic slave trade ends (1808) American Colonization Society founded (1817)

U.S.
Constitution  drafted (1787) Conflict over Alexander Hamilton’s economic policies First national parties: Federalists and Republicans

Judith Sargent Murray
 publishes “On the Equality of the Sexes” (1779) Emancipation of slaves begins in the North Virginia enacts religious freedom (1786) Politicians and ministers deny vote to women; praise republican motherhood Bill of Rights ratified (1791) Sedition Act limits freedom of the press (1798)

 Jefferson reduces activism of national government

 Free blacks enhance sense of African American identity

Chief Justice Marshall
 asserts federal judicial powers

 Religious benevolence engenders social reform movements

Triumph of Republican
Party and end of
Federalist Party


 Thomas Paine’s Common Sense (1776) causes colonists to rethink political loyalties States rely on property qualifications to define citizenship rights in their new constitutions Indians form Western Confederacy (1790) Second Great Awakening (1790– 1860) Emerging political divide between South and North Tenskwatawa and Tecumseh revive Western Indian Confederacy War of 1812 tests national unity State constitutions democratized

 Supreme Court guards property

 PART 1

 PART 3 THEMATIC TIMELINE, 1763–1820 TRANSFORMATIONS OF NORTH AMERICA, 1450-1700





The Problem of Empire
1763–1776


C H A P T E R
AN EMPIRE TRANSFORMED
The Costs of Empire George Grenville and the Reform Impulse An Open Challenge: The Stamp Act 
THE DYNAMICS OF REBELLION, 1765–1770
Formal Protests and the Politics of the Crowd The Ideological Roots of Resistance Another Kind of Freedom Parliament and Patriots Square Off Again The Problem of the West Parliament Wavers 
THE ROAD TO INDEPENDENCE, 1771–1776 A
Compromise Repudiated The Continental Congress Responds The Rising of the Countryside Loyalists and Neutrals 
VIOLENCE EAST AND WEST
Lord Dunmore’s War Armed Resistance in Massachusetts The Second Continental Congress Organizes for War Thomas Paine’s Common Sense Independence Declared 


I


 n June 1775, the city of New York IDENTIF Y THE BIG IDEA faced a perplexing dilemma. Word Consider whether the collapse of arrived that George Washington, who British authority in the thirteen had just been named commander in chief rebellious colonies might have of the newly formed Continental army, been avoided through compromise was coming to town. But on the same measures and more astute leaderday, William Tryon, the colony’s crownship. Was colonial independence appointed governor, was scheduled to inevitable, and was war the only return from Britain. Local leaders orchesway to achieve it? trated a delicate dance. Though the Provincial Congress was operating illegally in the eyes of the crown, it did not wish to offend Governor Tryon. It instructed the city’s newly raised volunteer battalion to divide in two. One company awaited Washington’s arrival, while another prepared to greet the governor. The “residue of the Battalion” was to be “ready to receive either the General or Governour Tryon, which ever shall first arrive.” Washington arrived first. He was met by nine companies of the volunteer battalion and a throng of well-wishers, who escorted him to his rooms in a local tavern. Many of this same crowd then crossed town to join the large group assembled to greet the governor, whose ship was just landing. The crowd met him with “universal shouts of applause” and accompanied him home. This awkward moment in the history of one American city reflects a larger crisis of loyalty that plagued colonists throughout British North America in the years between 1763 and 1776. The outcome of the Great War for Empire left Great Britain the undisputed master of eastern North America. But that success pointed the way to catastrophe. Convinced of the need to reform the empire and tighten its administration, British policymakers imposed a series of new administrative measures on the colonies. Accustomed as they were to governing their own affairs, colonists could not accept these changes. Yet the bonds of loyalty were strong, and the unraveling of British authority was tortuous and complex. Only gradually — as militancy slowly mounted on both sides — were the ties of empire broken and independence declared.

 The Great New York Fire of 1776 In the wake of the Declaration of Independence, General William Howe’s first objective was to capture New York, with its strategic location and excellent harbor. Patriot forces under George Washington’s command attempted to defend the city but were forced into retreat and abandoned it to the British in September 1776. Early in the morning of September 21, a fire broke out near the southern tip of Manhattan and burned northwestward, driven by a strong wind. As many as a quarter of the town’s buildings were destroyed; residents, already distressed by the fighting, fled into the streets with whatever possessions they could carry. Each side accused the other of arson, but that charge was never proven. Miriam and Ira D. Wallach Division of Art, Prints and Photographs, The New York Public Library. Astor, Lenox and Tilden Foundations.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

An Empire Transformed
The Great War for Empire of 1756–1763 (Chapter 4)
 transformed the British Empire in North America. The British ministry could no longer let the colonies manage their own affairs while it contented itself with minimal oversight of the Atlantic trade. Its interests and responsibilities now extended far into the continental interior — a much more costly and complicated proposition than it had ever faced before. And neither its American colonies nor their Native American neighbors were inclined to cooperate in the transformation. British administrators worried about their American colonists, who, according to former Georgia governor Henry Ellis, felt themselves “entitled to a greater measure of Liberty than is enjoyed by the people of England.” Ireland had been closely ruled for decades, and recently the East India Company set up dominion over EXPLAIN millions of non-British peoples CONSEQUENCES (Map 5.1 and America Compared, What was the impact of p. 153). Britain’s American posthe Great War for Empire on British policymakers sessions were likewise filled with and the colonies? aliens and “undesirables”: “French, Dutch, Germans innumerable, Indians, Africans, and a multitude of felons from this country,” as one member of Parliament put it. Consequently, declared Lord Halifax, “The people of England” considered Americans “as foreigners.” Contesting that status, wealthy Philadelphia lawyer John Dickinson argued that his fellow colonists were “not [East Indian] Sea Poys, nor Marattas, but British subjects who are born to liberty, who know its worth, and who prize it high.” Thus was the stage set for a struggle between the conceptions of identity — and empire — held by British ministers, on the one hand, and many American colonists on the other.

The Costs of Empire
 The Great War for Empire imposed enormous costs on Great Britain. The national debt soared from £75 million to £133 million and was, an observer noted, “becoming the alarming object of every British subject.” By war’s end, interest on the debt alone consumed 60 percent of the nation’s budget, and the ministry had to raise taxes. During the eighteenth century, taxes were shifting from land — owned by the gentry and aristocracy — to consumables, and successive ministries became ever more ingenious in devising new ways to raise money. Excise (or sales) taxes were levied on all

 kinds of ordinary goods — salt and beer, bricks and candles, paper (in the form of a stamp tax) — that were consumed by middling and poor Britons. In the 1760s, the per capita tax burden was 20 percent of income. To collect the taxes, the government doubled the size of the tax bureaucracy (Figure 5.1). Customs agents patrolled the coasts of southern Britain, seizing tons of contraband French wines, Dutch tea, and Flemish textiles. Convicted smugglers faced heavy penalties, including death or forced “transportation” to America as indentured servants. (Despite colonial protests, nearly fifty thousand English criminals had already been shipped to America to be sold as indentured servants.) The price of empire abroad was thus larger government and higher taxes at home. Members of two British opposition parties, the Radical Whigs and the Country Party, complained that the huge war debt placed the nation at the mercy of the “monied interests,” the banks and financiers who reaped millions of pounds’ interest from government bonds. To reverse the growth of government and the threat to personal liberty and property rights, British reformers demanded that Parliament represent a broader spectrum of the property-owning classes. The Radical Whig John Wilkes condemned rotten boroughs — sparsely populated, aristocratic-controlled electoral districts — and demanded greater representation for rapidly growing commercial and manufacturing cities. The war thus transformed British politics. The war also revealed how little power Britain wielded in its American colonies. In theory, royal governors had extensive political powers, including command of the provincial militia; in reality, they shared power with the colonial assemblies, which outraged British officials. The Board of Trade complained that in Massachusetts “almost every act of executive and legislative power is ordered and directed by votes and resolves of the General Court.” To enforce the collection of trade duties, which colonial merchants had evaded for decades by bribing customs officials, Parliament passed the Revenue Act of 1762. The ministry also instructed the Royal Navy to seize American vessels carrying food crops from the mainland colonies to the French West Indies. It was absurd, declared a British politician, that French armies attempting “to Destroy one English province . . . are actually supported by Bread raised in another.” Britain’s military victory brought another fundamental shift in policy: a new peacetime deployment of 15 royal battalions — some 7,500 troops — in North

AMERICA C O M PA R E D
Britain’s Atlantic and Asian Empires 
 The following table enumerates the economic benefits derived by Great Britain from its various colonies, which sent a wide variety of goods to Britain and also served as markets for British exports.

 TABLE 5.1 English/British Imports and Exports (annual averages in pounds sterling) England* 1700–01

Britain*


1750–51


1772–73


1789–90


 Imports from Asia, Africa, and America North America

372,000


877,000


1,997,000


1,351,000


The Fisheries**




7,000


27,000


188,000


785,000


1,484,000


3,222,000


4,045,000


24,000


43,000


80,000


87,000


775,000


1,101,000


2,203,000


3,256,000


1,956,000


3,512,000


7,529,000


8,927,000


West Indies
Africa
East Indies
Total


Exports to America, Asia, and Africa
North America


362,000


1,355,000


3,254,000


3,763,000


West Indies


336,000


589,000


1,402,000


1,892,000


Africa


145,000


188,000


777,000


799,000


East India


125,000


653,000


893,000


2,173,000


Total


968,000


2,785,000


6,326,000


8,627,000


 *The “England” column shows data for England and Wales; “Britain” includes Scotland as well. **Includes Massachusetts Bay, Maine, and Newfoundland; by the 1760s more than £500,000 worth of fish was being sent annually to the West Indies and southern Europe. Source: Adapted from The Oxford History of the British Empire, vol. 2, ed. P. J. Marshall (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1998), 101.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
Compare Britain’s colonies in their roles as producers of British imports to their roles as consumers of British exports. Why are the mainland colonies of North America a distant third as producers of imports, but ranked first as consumers of exports? 
 America. The ministers who served under George III (r. 1760–1820) feared a possible rebellion by the 60,000 French residents of Canada, Britain’s newly conquered colony (Map 5.2). Native Americans were also a concern: Pontiac’s Rebellion had nearly overwhelmed

2. How did the American Revolution (1776–1783)
 impact the economic relationship between Great Britain and its mainland colonies? Is it reasonable to conclude that political independence did not bring economic independence?

 Britain’s frontier forts. Moreover, only a substantial military force would deter land-hungry whites from defying the Proclamation of 1763 and settling west of the Appalachian Mountains (see Chapter 4). Finally, British politicians worried about the colonists’ loyalty

A
IAN UIS O L

New Orleans


GEORGIA FLORIDA
(Br. 1763–83) 
S


E


Recife


Rio de Janeiro


Bahia


1,000
1,000


 2,000 kilometers

 2,000 miles

Capetown


 ANGOLA

Lagos


 BENIN

Beira


CHINA BENGAL

Canton


PACIFIC OCEAN
Formosa 
 JAPAN

 Réunion

Sumatra


 British control, c. 1770 French control, c. 1770 Dutch control, c. 1770

INDIAN OCEAN

Fort Dauphin


Ceylon


NEW GUINEA

NEW HOLLAND

Timor


 Portuguese control Spanish control Russian empire in 1763

Java


 INDONESIA

 MOLUCCAS

Calcutta
Macau
Diu Daman
 Rangoon Da Nang PHILIPPINES INDIA Bombay Manila Goa ANNAM Madras

 PERSIA

Madagascar Mauritius


Mozambique


Mombasa


Mogadishu


 ETHIOPIA

OTTOMAN EMPIRE

RUSSIAN EMPIRE

 By 1770, the Western European nations that had long dominated maritime trade had created vast colonial empires and spheres of influence. Spain controlled the western halves of North and South America, Portugal owned Brazil, and Holland ruled Indonesia. Britain, a newer imperial power, boasted settler societies in North America, rich sugar islands in the West Indies, slave ports in West Africa, and a growing presence on the Indian subcontinent. Only France had failed to acquire and hold on to a significant colonial empire. (To trace changes in empire and trade routes, see Map 1.4 on p. 24 and Map 2.2 on p. 46.)





(Fr. 1763–65, Br. 1765–70, Sp. 1770)


FALKLAND ISLANDS

RIO DE
Buenos Aires LA PLATA 
 BRAZIL

(1630–54)


DUTCH BRAZIL

Bordeaux


POLAND FRANCE

Seville


Accra


Lisbon
 Cádiz

CANARY ATLANTIC IS.

Cayenne


Eurasian Trade and European Colonies, c. 1770


 MAP 5.1

W


N


PACIFIC OCEAN

Spanish
 transcontinental route

 PERU

GRANADA SURINAM

Bristol
St. Malo


PORTUGAL SPAIN

OCEAN BAHAMAS CUBA
Santo Domingo Veracruz Jamaica Acapulco St. Louis LESSER ANTILLES HAITI (Fr. & Br.) Gorée Curaçao BELIZE Fort NEW Trinidad James Porto Bello 
NEW SPAIN

Newfoundland


Montreal
St. Pierre,
Boston Miquelon
Philadelphia
New York
Jamestown


Quebec


GREAT SWEDEN BRITAIN DENMARK

(Den.)


Iceland


 PART 3

 CANADA

(Den.)


Greenland


REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 CHAPTER 5

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776




 FIGURE 5.1 The Cost of Empire, 1690–1790 It cost money to build and maintain an empire. As Britain built a great navy, subsidized the armies of European allies, and fought four wars against France and Spain between 1702 and 1783, military expenditures soared. Tax revenues did not keep pace, so the government created a large national debt by issuing bonds for millions of pounds. This policy created a class of wealthy financiers, led to political protests, and eventually prompted attempts to tax the American colonists.

 Military spending Civil spending

 Net tax income (£ sterling, millions)

American War
 of Independence, 1775–1783

War of the
Spanish
Succession,
1702–1713


Seven
Years’ War,
1756–1763


War of the
Austrian
Succession,
1740–1748






 now that they no longer faced a threat from French Canada. The cost of stationing these troops, estimated at £225,000 per year, compounded Britain’s fiscal crisis, and it seemed clear that the burden had to be shared by the colonies. They had always managed their own finances, but the king’s ministers agreed that Parliament could no longer let them off the hook for the costs of empire. The greatest gains from the war had come in North America, where the specter of French encirclement had finally been lifted, and the greatest new postwar expenses were being incurred in North America as well.

George Grenville and the
Reform Impulse
 The challenge of raising revenue from the colonies fell first to George Grenville. Widely regarded as “one of the ablest men in Great Britain,” Grenville understood the need for far-reaching imperial reform. He first passed the Currency Act of 1764, which banned the American colonies from using paper money as legal tender. Colonial shopkeepers, planters, and farmers had used local currency, which was worth less than British pounds sterling, to pay their debts to British merchants. The Currency Act ensured that merchants would no longer be paid in money printed in the colonies, boosting their profits and British wealth.



















 The Sugar Act Grenville also won parliamentary approval of the Sugar Act of 1764 to replace the widely ignored Molasses Act of 1733 (see Chapter 3). The earlier act had set a tax rate of 6 pence per gallon on French molasses — a rate so high that it made the trade unprofitable. Rather than pay it, colonial merchants bribed customs officials at the going rate of 1.5 pence per gallon. Grenville settled on a duty of 3 pence per gallon, which merchants could pay and still turn a profit, and then tightened customs enforcement so that it could actually be collected. This carefully crafted policy garnered little support in America. New England merchants, among them John Hancock of Boston, had made their fortunes smuggling French molasses. In 1754, Boston merchants paid customs duties on a mere 400 hogsheads of molasses, yet they imported 40,000 hogsheads for use by 63 Massachusetts rum distilleries. Publicly, the merchants claimed that the Sugar Act would ruin the distilling industry; privately, they vowed to evade the duty by smuggling or by bribing officials. The End of Salutary Neglect More important, colonists raised constitutional objections to the Sugar Act. In Massachusetts, the leader of the assembly argued that the new legislation was “contrary to a fundamental Principall of our Constitution: That all Taxes ought to originate with the people.” In Rhode Island, Governor Stephen Hopkins warned: “They who are taxed at



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 The Treaty of Paris allowed the British-run Hudson’s Bay Company to expand its territory and influence.

Hudson
Bay


HUDSON'S BAY COMPANY
Newfoundland MAINE (part of Mass.) N.H. MASS. 
QUEBEC M N.Y.

S PA N I S H
 LOUISIANA

 tio n L ine

 Britain gained much more American territory from the Treaty of Paris (1763) than it had from the Treaty of Utrecht (1713). The new treaty gave Britain control of Spanish Florida and all of New France east of the Mississippi River.

 o Pr

Nova
Scotia


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

R.I.
CONN. N.J. DEL.

 PENN.

 cla ma



 MD.

British Colonies: Comparisons


 VA.

Royal


N.C.


Proprietary


Corporate


Population
Average Annual
White
Black
Exports
 (in 1770) (in 1770)

S.C.


 GA.

40,000
 West Indian islands 600,000 Southern mainland Northern mainland 1,092,000

FLOR IDA BA H A

330,000
394,000
45,000


Exports
 per White (shillings)*

£1,856,000
£1,703,776
£1,105,376


 928s. 57s. 21s.

 *20 shillings = £1 (one English pound); £1 = about $400 in 2010 prices.

M


 AS r.) (B

Gulf of Mexico


N


SANTO DOMINGO
(Sp.) 
Guadeloupe


 CUBA

(Fr.)


(Sp.)


 BELIZE

 JAMAICA

ST. DOMINIQUE

(Br.)


(Fr.)


Puerto
Rico
(Sp.)


Caribbean Sea


E


W


Martinique


S


(Fr.)


Barbados
(Br.)


 In 1763, West Indian sugar was still Britain’s primary colonial export crop, but its value was now less than the combined worth of the tobacco, rice, and flour exported from the mainland colonies.





 500 miles 500 kilometers

 MAP 5.2 Britain’s American Empire in 1763 The Treaty of Paris gave Britain control of the eastern half of North America and returned a few captured sugar islands in the West Indies to France. To protect the empire’s new mainland territories, British ministers dispatched troops to Florida and Quebec. They also sent troops to uphold the terms of the Proclamation of 1763, which prohibited Anglo-American settlement west of the Appalachian Mountains.

 pleasure by others cannot possibly have any property, and they who have no property, can have no freedom.” The Sugar Act raised other constitutional issues as well. Merchants prosecuted under the act would be tried in vice-admiralty courts, tribunals governing the high seas and run by British-appointed judges. Previously, merchants accused of Navigation Acts violations were tried by local common-law courts, where friendly juries often acquitted them. The Sugar Act closed this legal loophole by extending the jurisdiction of the viceadmiralty courts to all customs offenses.

 The Sugar Act revived old American fears. The influential Virginia planter Richard Bland emphasized that the American colonists “were not sent out to be the Slaves but to be the Equals of those that remained behind.” John Adams, the young Massachusetts lawyer defending John Hancock on a charge of smuggling,

 To see a longer excerpt of the Richard Bland document, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.

 CHAPTER 5

 argued that the vice-admiralty courts diminished this equality by “degrad[ing] every American . . . below the rank of an Englishman.” In fact, accused smugglers in Britain were also tried in vice-admiralty courts, so there was no discrimination against Americans. The real issue was the growing power of the British state. Americans had lived for decades under an administrative policy of salutary neglect. Now they saw that the new imperial regime would deprive them “of some of their most essential Rights as British subjects,” as a committee of the Massachusetts assembly put it. In response, Royal Governor Francis Bernard replied: “The rule that a British subject shall not be bound by laws or liable to taxes, but what he has consented to by his representatives must be confined to the inhabitants of Great Britain only.” To Bernard, Grenville, and other imperial reformers, Americans were second-class subjects of the king, with rights limited by the Navigation Acts, parliamentary laws, and British interests.

An Open Challenge: The Stamp Act
 Another new tax, the Stamp Act of 1765, sparked the first great imperial crisis. The new levy was to cover part of the cost of keeping British troops in America — which turned out to be £385,000 a year (about $150 million today), 70 percent more than the initial estimate. Grenville hoped the Stamp Act would raise £60,000 per year. The act would require a tax stamp on all printed items, from college diplomas, court documents, land titles, and contracts to newspapers, almanacs, and playing cards. It was ingeniously designed. Like its counterpart in England, it bore more heavily on the rich, since it charged only a penny a sheet for newspapers and other common items but up to £10 for a lawyer’s license. It also required no new bureaucracy; stamped paper would be delivered to colonial ports and sold to printers in lieu of unstamped stock. Benjamin Franklin, agent of the Pennsylvania assembly, proposed a different solution: American representation in Parliament. “If you chuse to tax us,” he wrote, “give us Members in your Legislature, and let us be one People.” With the exception of William Pitt, British politicians rejected Franklin’s idea as too radical. They argued that the colonists already had virtual representation in Parliament because some of its members were transatlantic merchants and West Indian sugar planters. Colonial leaders were equally skeptical of Franklin’s plan. Americans were “situate at a great Distance from their Mother Country,” the Connecticut

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776




 assembly declared, and therefore “cannot participate in the general Legislature of the Nation.” Asserting “the Right of Parliament to lay an internal Tax upon the Colonies,” the House of Commons ignored American opposition and passed the act by an overwhelm- UNDERSTAND ing majority of 205 to 49. At POINTS OF VIEW the request of General Thomas Why did most British and Gage, the British military com- colonial leaders reject mander in America, Parliament the idea that the colonies also passed the Quartering Act should be represented in Parliament? of 1765, which required colonial governments to provide barracks and food for British troops. Finally, Parliament approved Grenville’s proposal that violations of the Stamp Act be tried in vice-admiralty courts. Using the doctrine of parliamentary supremacy, Grenville had begun to fashion a centralized imperial system in America much like that already in place in Ireland: British officials would govern the colonies with little regard for the local assemblies. Consequently, the prime minister’s plan provoked a constitutional confrontation on the specific issues of taxation, jury trials, and military quartering as well as on the general question of representative self-government.

The Dynamics of Rebellion,
1765–1770
 In the name of reform, Grenville had thrown down the gauntlet to the Americans. The colonists had often resisted unpopular laws and aggressive governors, but they had faced an all-out attack on their institutions only once before — in 1686, when James II had unilaterally imposed the Dominion of New England. Now the danger to colonial autonomy was even greater because both the king and Parliament backed reform. But the Patriots, as the defenders of American rights came to be called, met the challenge posed by Grenville and his successor, Charles Townshend. They organized protests — formal and informal, violent as well as peaceful — and fashioned a compelling ideology of resistance.

Formal Protests and the Politics
 of the Crowd Virginia’s House of Burgesses was the first formal body to complain. In May 1765, hotheaded young Patrick Henry denounced Grenville’s legislation and attacked



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Protesting the Stamp
Act in Portsmouth, New
Hampshire
 Throughout the colonies, disciplined mobs protesting the Stamp Act forced stamp distributors to resign their offices. In this engraving, protesters in the small city of Portsmouth, New Hampshire, stone an effigy of the distributor as other members of the mob carry off a coffin representing the death of American “Liberty.” Illustration from “Interesting Events in the History of the U.S.” by J. W. Barber, 1829/Picture Research Consultants & Archives.

 George III for supporting it. He compared the king to Charles I, whose tyranny had led to his overthrow and execution in the 1640s. These remarks, which bordered on treason, frightened the Burgesses; nonetheless, they condemned the Stamp Act’s “manifest Tendency to Destroy American freedom.” In Massachusetts, James Otis, another republican-minded firebrand, persuaded the House of Representatives to call a meeting of all the mainland colonies “to implore Relief ” from the act.

 The Stamp Act Congress Nine assemblies sent delegates to the Stamp Act Congress, which met in New York City in October 1765. The congress protested the loss of American “rights and liberties,” especially the right to trial by jury. And it challenged the constitutionality of both the Stamp and Sugar Acts by declaring that only the colonists’ elected representatives could tax them. Still, moderate-minded delegates wanted compromise, not confrontation. They assured Parliament that Americans “glory in being subjects of the best of Kings” and humbly petitioned for repeal of the Stamp Act. Other influential Americans favored active (but peaceful) resistance; they organized a boycott of British goods. Crowd Actions Popular opposition also took a violent form, however. When the Stamp Act went into effect on November 1, 1765, COMPARE AND disciplined mobs demanded the CONTRAST resignation of stamp-tax collecWhy did the Stamp Act tors. In Boston, a group calling arouse so much more resisitself the Sons of Liberty burned tance than the Sugar Act? an effigy of collector Andrew

 Oliver and then destroyed Oliver’s new brick warehouse. Two weeks later, Bostonians attacked the house of Lieutenant Governor Thomas Hutchinson, Oliver’s brother-in-law and a prominent defender of imperial authority, breaking his furniture, looting his wine cellar, and setting fire to his library. Wealthy merchants and Patriot lawyers, such as John Hancock and John Adams, encouraged the mobs, which were usually led by middling artisans and minor merchants. In New York City, nearly three thousand shopkeepers, artisans, laborers, and seamen marched through the streets breaking windows and crying “Liberty!” Resistance to the Stamp Act spread far beyond the port cities: in nearly every colony, angry crowds — the “rabble,” their detractors called them — intimidated royal officials. Near Wethersfield, Connecticut, five hundred farmers seized tax collector Jared Ingersoll and forced him to resign his office in “the Cause of the People.”

 The Motives of the Crowd Such crowd actions were common in both Britain and America, and protesters had many motives. Roused by the Great Awakening, evangelical Protestants resented arrogant British military officers and corrupt royal bureaucrats. In New England, where rioters invoked the antimonarchy sentiments of their great-grandparents, an anonymous letter sent to a Boston newspaper promising to save “all the Freeborn Sons of America” was signed “Oliver Cromwell,” the English republican revolutionary of the 1650s. In New York City, Sons of Liberty leaders Isaac Sears and Alexander McDougall were minor merchants and Radical Whigs who feared

 CHAPTER 5

 that imperial reform would undermine political liberty. The mobs also included apprentices, day laborers, and unemployed sailors: young men with their own notions of liberty who — especially if they had been drinking — were quick to resort to violence. Nearly everywhere popular resistance nullified the Stamp Act. Fearing an assault on Fort George, New York lieutenant governor Cadwallader Colden called on General Gage to use his small military force to protect the stamps. Gage refused. “Fire from the Fort might disperse the Mob, but it would not quell them,” he told Colden, and the result would be “an Insurrection, the Commencement of Civil War.” The tax was collected in Barbados and Jamaica, but frightened collectors resigned their offices in all thirteen colonies that would eventually join in the Declaration of Independence. This popular insurrection gave a democratic cast to the emerging Patriot movement. “Nothing is wanting but your own Resolution,” declared a New York rioter, “for great is the Authority and Power of the People.”

The Ideological Roots of Resistance
 Some Americans couched their resistance in constitutional terms. Many were lawyers or well-educated merchants and planters. Composing pamphlets of remarkable political sophistication, they gave the resistance movement its rationale, its political agenda, and its leaders. Patriot writers drew on three intellectual traditions. The first was English common law, the centuries-old body of legal rules and procedures that protected the lives and property of the monarch’s subjects. In the famous Writs of Assistance case of 1761, Boston lawyer James Otis invoked English legal precedents to challenge open-ended search warrants. In demanding a jury trial for John Hancock in the late 1760s, John Adams appealed to the Magna Carta (1215), the ancient document that, said Adams, “has for many Centuries been esteemed by Englishmen, as one of the . . . firmest Bulwarks of their Liberties.” Other lawyers protested that new strictures violated specific “liberties and privileges” granted in colonial charters or embodied in Britain’s “ancient constitution.” Enlightenment rationalism provided Patriots with a second important intellectual resource. Virginia planter Thomas Jefferson and other Patriots drew on the writings of John Locke, who had argued that all individuals possessed certain “natural rights” — life, liberty, and property — that governments must protect (see Chapter 4). And they turned to the works of

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776




 French philosopher Montesquieu, who had maintained that a “separation of powers” among government departments prevented arbitrary rule. The republican and Whig strands of the English political tradition provided a third ideological source for American Patriots. Puritan New England had long venerated the Commonwealth era (1649–1660), when England had been a republic (see Chapter 2). After the Glorious Revolution of 1688–1689, many colonists praised the English Whigs for creating a constitutional monarchy that prevented the king from imposing taxes and other measures. Joseph Warren, a physician and a Radical Whig Patriot, suggested that the Stamp Act was part of a ministerial plot “to force the colonies into rebellion” and justify the use of “military power to reduce them to servitude.” John Dickinson’s Letters from a Farmer in Pennsylvania (1768) urged colonists to “remember your ancestors and your posterity” and oppose parliamentary taxes. The letters circulated widely and served as an early call to resistance. If Parliament could tax the colonies without their consent, he wrote, “our boasted liberty is but A sound and nothing else.” Such arguments, widely publicized in newspapers and pamphlets, gave intellectual substance to the Patriot movement and turned a series of impromptu riots, tax protests, and boycotts of British manufactures into a formidable political force.

Another Kind of Freedom
 “We are taxed without our own consent,” Dickinson wrote in one of his Letters. “We are therefore — SLAVES.” As Patriot writers argued that taxation without representation made colonists the slaves of Parliament, many, including Benjamin Franklin in Philadelphia and James Otis in Massachusetts, also began to con- COMPARE AND demn the institution of chattel CONTRAST slavery itself as a violation of Why were southerners slaves’ natural rights. African more threatened by chalAmericans made the connection lenges to the institution of as well. In Massachusetts, slaves slavery than northerners? submitted at least four petitions to the legislature asking that slavery be abolished. As one petition noted, slaves “have in common with other men, a natural right to be free, and without molestation, to enjoy such property, as they may acquire by their industry.” In the southern colonies, where slaves constituted half or more of the population and the economy depended on their servitude, the quest for freedom



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 alarmed slaveholders. In November 1773, a group of Virginia slaves hoped to win their freedom by supporting British troops that, they heard, would soon arrive in the colony. Their plan was uncovered, and, as James Madison wrote, “proper precautions” were taken “to prevent the Infection” from spreading. He fully understood how important it was to defend the colonists’ liberties without allowing the idea of natural rights to undermine the institution of slavery. “It is prudent,” he wrote, “such things should be concealed as well as suppressed.” Throughout the Revolution, the quest for African American rights and liberties would play out alongside that of the colonies, but unlike national independence, the liberation of African Americans would not be fulfilled for many generations.

Parliament and Patriots
Square Off Again


Phillis Wheatley
 Born in West Africa and enslaved as a child, Phillis Wheatley was purchased by Boston merchant and tailor John Wheatley when she was eight. Tutored by Wheatley’s children, Phillis learned to read English, Greek, and Latin by the age of twelve. This engraving, which pictures her at a writing desk, was the frontispiece for her Poems on Various Subjects, Religious and Moral (1773), which was praised by George Washington and gained attention in both Britain and the colonies. Freed upon the death of her master, Wheatley married John Peters, a free black man. He was later imprisoned for debt, forcing Wheatley to take employment as a maid. She died in 1784 at age thirty-one; none of her three children survived infancy. Library of Congress.

 TABLE 5.2 Ministerial Instability in Britain, 1760–1782 Leading Minister

Dates of
Ministry


American Policy


Lord Bute


1760–1763


 Mildly reformist

George Grenville


1763–1765


 Ardently reformist

Lord Rockingham


1765–1766


Accommodationist


William Pitt /
Charles Townshend


1766–1770


 Ardently reformist

Lord North


1770–1782


Coercive


 When news of the Stamp Act riots and the boycott reached Britain, Parliament was already in turmoil. Disputes over domestic policy had led George III to dismiss Grenville as prime minister (Table 5.2). However, Grenville’s allies demanded that imperial reform continue, if necessary at gunpoint. “The British legislature,” declared Chief Justice Sir James Mansfield, “has authority to bind every part and every subject, whether such subjects have a right to vote or not.” Yet a majority in Parliament was persuaded that the Stamp Act was cutting deeply into British exports and thus doing more harm than good. “The Avenues of Trade are all shut up,” a Bristol merchant told Parliament: “We have no Remittances and are at our Witts End for want of Money to fulfill our Engagements with our Tradesmen.” Grenville’s successor, the Earl of Rockingham, forged a compromise. To mollify the colonists and help British merchants, he repealed the Stamp Act and reduced the duty on molasses imposed by the Sugar Act to a penny a gallon. Then he pacified imperial reformers and hard-liners with the Declaratory Act of 1766, which explicitly reaffirmed Parliament’s “full power and authority to make laws and statutes . . . to bind the colonies and people of America . . . in all cases whatsoever.” By swiftly ending the Stamp Act crisis, Rockingham hoped it would be forgotten just as quickly.

 Charles Townshend Steps In Often the course of history is changed by a small event — an illness, a personal grudge, a chance remark. That was the case in 1767, when George III named William Pitt to head a new government. Pitt, chronically ill and often absent

 CHAPTER 5

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


Celebrating Repeal
 This British cartoon mocking supporters of the Stamp Act — “The Repeal, or the Funeral Procession of Miss Americ-Stamp” — was probably commissioned by merchants trading with America. Preceded by two flag bearers, George Grenville, the author of the legislation, carries a miniature coffin (representing the act) to a tomb, as a dog urinates on the leader of the procession. Two bales on the wharf, labeled “Stamps from America” and “Black cloth return’d from America,” testify to the failure of the act. The Granger Collection, New York.

 from parliamentary debates, left chancellor of the exchequer Charles Townshend in command. Pitt was sympathetic toward America; Townshend was not. As a member of the Board of Trade, Townshend had sought restrictions on the colonial assemblies and strongly supported the Stamp Act. In 1767, he promised to find a new source of revenue in America. The new tax legislation, the Townshend Act of 1767, had both fiscal and political goals. It imposed duties on colonial imports of paper, paint, glass, and tea that were expected to raise about £40,000 a year. Though Townshend did allocate some of this revenue for American military expenses, he earmarked most of it to pay the salaries of royal governors, judges, and other imperial officials, who had always previously been paid by colonial assemblies. Now, he hoped, royal appointees could better enforce parliamentary laws and carry out the king’s instructions. Townshend next devised the Revenue Act of 1767, which created a board of customs commissioners in Boston and viceadmiralty courts in Halifax, Boston, Philadelphia, and Charleston. By using parliamentary taxes to finance imperial administration, Townshend intended to undermine American political institutions. The Townshend duties revived the constitutional debate over taxation. During the Stamp Act crisis, some Americans, including Benjamin Franklin, distinguished between external and internal taxes. They suggested that external duties on trade (such as those long mandated by the Navigation Acts) were acceptable to Americans, but that direct, or internal, taxes were not.

 Townshend thought this distinction was “perfect nonsense,” but he indulged the Americans and laid duties only on trade.

A
Second Boycott and the Daughters of  Liberty Even so, most colonial leaders rejected the legitimacy of Townshend’s measures. In February 1768, the Massachusetts assembly condemned the Townshend Act, and Boston and New York merchants began a new boycott of British goods. Throughout Puritan New England, ministers and public officials discouraged the purchase of “foreign superfluities” and promoted the domestic manufacture of cloth and other necessities. American women, ordinarily excluded from public affairs, became crucial to the nonimportation movement. They reduced their households’ consumption of imported goods and produced large quantities of homespun cloth. Pious farmwives spun yarn at their ministers’ homes. In Berwick, Maine, “true Daughters of Liberty” celebrated American products by “drinking rye coffee and dining on bear venison.” Other women’s groups supported the boycott with charitable work, spinning flax and wool for the needy. Just as Patriot men followed tradition by joining crowd actions, so women’s protests reflected their customary concern for the well-being of the community. Newspapers celebrated these exploits of the Daughters of Liberty. One Massachusetts town proudly claimed an annual output of 30,000 yards of cloth; East Hartford, Connecticut, reported 17,000 yards. This





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 surge in domestic production did not offset the loss of British imports, which had averaged How did the nonimporabout 10 million yards of cloth tation movement bring annually, but it brought thouwomen into the political sands of women into the public sphere? arena. The boycott mobilized many American men as well. In the seaport cities, the Sons of Liberty published the names of merchants who imported British goods and harassed their employees and customers. By March 1769, the nonimportation movement had spread to Philadelphia; two months later, the members of the Virginia House of Burgesses vowed not to buy dutied articles, luxury goods, or imported slaves. Reflecting colonial self-confidence, Benjamin Franklin called for a return to the pre-1763 mercantilist system: “Repeal the laws, renounce the right, recall the troops, refund the money, and return to the old method of requisition.” EXPLAIN CONSEQUENCES

 Despite the enthusiasm of Patriots, nonimportation — accompanied by pressure on merchants and consumers who resisted it — opened fissures in colonial society. Not only royal officials, but also merchants, farmers, and ordinary folk, were subject to new forms of surveillance and coercion — a pattern that would only become more pronounced as the imperial crisis unfolded.

 Troops to Boston American resistance only increased British determination. When the Massachusetts assembly’s letter opposing the Townshend duties reached London, Lord Hillsborough, the secretary of state for American affairs, branded it “unjustifiable opposition to the constitutional authority of Parliament.” To strengthen the “Hand of Government” in Massachusetts, Hillsborough dispatched General Thomas Gage and 2,000 British troops to Boston (Map 5.3). Once in Massachusetts, Gage accused its leaders of “Treasonable and desperate Resolves” and

Edenton Ladies’ Tea Party
 In October 1774, a group of fifty-one women from Edenton, North Carolina, led by Penelope Barker created a local association to support a boycott of British goods. Patriots in the colonies praised the Edenton Tea Party, which was one of the first formal female political associations in North America, but it was ridiculed in Britain, where this cartoon appeared in March 1775. The women are given a mannish appearance, and the themes of promiscuity and neglect to their female duties are suggested by the presence of a slave and an amorous man, the neglected child, and the urinating dog. Library of Congress.

 CHAPTER 5



Louisbourg!


QUEBEC
Quebec ! Trois Rivières ! Montreal ! 
Michilimackinac


!


Ft. Detroit
!


Ft. Frontenac
!
!
Ft. Niagara
Ft. Pitt !


Halifax
Annapolis
Nova Royal


Crown Point Scotia
!
! Ticonderoga
! Boston
! Albany
! New York




Quebec
!


Michilimackinac


!


Ft. Frontenac
!
!


E


!
Ft. Niagara
! Ft. Pitt


W


Nova


Crown Point Scotia
!
! Ticonderoga
(11 Battalions)
!
!Albany Boston
! New York


!
Philadelphia


AT L A N T I C OCEAN
Ft. Prince George 
Mobile
!


!


Pensacola


!


! Charleston


 2–3 companies 4–5 companies Battalion (350 men)

Gulf of Me x ico


!


Company


St. Augustine






E
W


Ft. Chartres


 Small detachment

! Charleston


N


S


S
!


! Halifax


!
Montreal !


Ft. Detroit


Ft. Chartres




QUEBEC
Trois Rivières 
N


!
Philadelphia


The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


!
Mobile


!
Pensacola


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

! St. Augustine


 300 miles

 150 300 kilometers

Gul f of Me x ico


 (after Shy)

 MAP 5.3 British Troop Deployments, 1763 and 1775 As the imperial crisis deepened, British military priorities changed. In 1763, most British battalions were stationed in Canada to deter Indian uprisings and French Canadian revolts. After the Stamp Act riots of 1765, the British placed large garrisons in New York and Philadelphia. By 1775, eleven battalions of British regulars occupied Boston, the center of the Patriot movement.

 advised the ministry to “Quash this Spirit at a Blow.” In 1765, American resistance to the Stamp Act had sparked a parliamentary debate; in 1768, it provoked a plan for military coercion.

The Problem of the West
 At the same time that successive ministries addressed the problem of raising a colonial revenue, they quarreled over how to manage the vast new inland territory — about half a billion acres — acquired in the Treaty of Paris in 1763 (see Chapter 4). The Proclamation Line had drawn a boundary between the colonies and Indian country. The line was originally intended as a temporary barrier. It prohibited settlement “for the present, and until our further Pleasure be known.” The Proclamation also created three new mainland colonies — Quebec, East Florida, and West Florida — and thus opened new opportunities at the northern and southern extremities of British North America. But many colonists looked west rather than north or south. Four groups in the colonies were especially

 interested in westward expansion. First, gentlemen who had invested in numerous land speculation companies were petitioning the crown for large land grants in the Ohio country. Second, officers who served in the Seven Years’ War were paid in land warrants — up to 5,000 acres IDENTIFY CAUSES for field officers — and some, led What groups were most by George Washington, were interested in western exploring possible sites beyond lands, and why did the Appalachians. Third, Indian Hillsborough oppose traders who had received large them? grants from the Ohio Indians hoped to sell land titles. And fourth, thousands of squatters were following the roads cut to the Ohio by the Braddock and Forbes campaigns during the Seven Years’ War to take up lands in the hope that they could later receive a title to them. “The roads are . . . alive with Men, Women, Children, and Cattle from Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Maryland,” wrote one astonished observer (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 164). All of this activity antagonized the Ohio Indians. In 1770, Shawnees invited hundreds of Indian leaders to

THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN
Beyond the Proclamation Line 
 Though the Royal Proclamation of 1763 called the territory between the Appalachian Mountains and the Mississippi River “Indian country,” the reality was more complex than this phrase indicates. The following documents illustrate some of the patterns that shaped life beyond the Proclamation Line between 1763 and 1776.

 1. Colonel John Bradstreet’s Thoughts on Indian Affairs, 1764. Colonel John Bradstreet led a force of British redcoats to Fort Niagara in response to Pontiac’s Rebellion. He drafted these remarks shortly afterward.

 Of all the Savages upon the continent, the most knowing, the most intriguing, the less useful, and the greatest Villains, are those most conversant with the Europeans, and deserve most the attention of Govern[men]t by way of correction, and these are the Six Nations, Shawanese and Delawares; they are well acquainted with the defenceless state of the Inhabitants, who live on the Frontiers, and think they will ever have it in their power to distress and plunder them, and never cease raising the jealousy of the Upper Nations against us, by propagating amongst them such stories, as make them believe the English have nothing so much at heart as the extirpation of all Savages. The apparent design of the Six Nations, is to keep us at war with all Savages, but themselves, that they may be employed as mediators between us and them. 2. William Johnson to the British Lords of Trade, 1763. William Johnson, a New Yorker with extensive experience in Indian relations, was the crown’s superintendent for Indian affairs in the northern colonies.

 [T]he Colonies, had all along neglected to cultivate a proper understanding with the Indians, and from a mistaken notion, have greatly dispised them, without considering, that it is in their power at pleasure to lay waste and destroy the Frontiers. . . . Without any exageration, I look upon the Northern Indians to be the most formidable of any uncivilized body of people in the World. Hunting and War are their sole occupations, and the one qualifies them for the other, they have few wants, and those are easily supplied, their properties of little value, consequently, expeditions against them however successful, cannot distress them, and they have courage sufficient for their manner of fighting, the nature and situation of their Countrys, require not more.

3. “Indians Giving a Talk to Colonel Bouquet,”
 1766. Based on a painting by Benjamin West, this engraving from a book about Bouquet’s campaign to the Ohio following Pontiac’s Rebellion depicts a meeting with Delaware, Seneca, and Shawnee representatives in October 1764.

Source: The Granger Collection, New York.


 4. David Jones’s journal, 1773. David Jones was a Baptist minister who traveled down the Ohio River in 1772 and 1773. His journal offers a compelling glimpse of life in the valley’s trading communities.

 FRIDAY [January] 22, in company with Mr. Irwine, set out for Chillicaathee. . . . Here Mr. Irwine kept an assortment of goods, and for that purpose rented an house from an Indian whose name is Waappee Monneeto, often called the White Devil. . . . Went to see Mr. Moses Henry a gunsmith and trader from Lancaster. This gentleman has lived for some years in this town, and is lawfully married to a white woman, who was captivated so young that she speaks the language as well as any Indian. . . . Mr. Henry lives in a comfortable manner, having plenty of good beef, pork, milk, &c. … Chillicaathee is the chief town of the Shawannee Indians — it is situated north of a large plain

 adjacent to a branch of Paint Creek. This plain is their corn-field, which supplies great part of their town. Their houses are made of logs. . . . WEDNESDAY [February] 10. . . . This is a small town consisting of Delawares and Shawanees. The chief is a Shawanee woman, who is esteemed very rich — she entertains travelers — there were four of us in company, and for our use, her negro quarter was evacuated this night, which had a fire in the middle without any chimney. This woman has a large stock, and supplied us with milk. Here we also got corn for our horses at a very expensive price. . . . FRIDAY [February] 12 . . . We passed [the Delaware chief] Captain White Eye’s Town. . . . He told me that he intended to be religious, and have his children educated. He saw that their way of living would not answer much longer — game grew scarce — they could not much longer pretend to live by hunting, but must farm, &c. — But said, he could not attend to matters of religion now, for he intended to make a great hunt down Ohio, and take the skins himself to Philadelphia. 5. Killbuck to the governors of Pennsylvania, Maryland, and Virginia, December 1771. John Killbuck Jr., or Gelelemend, a Delaware headman, aired grievances on behalf of Ohio Delaware, Munsie, and Mahican Indians.

 Great numbers more of your people have come over the Great Mountains and settled throughout this country, and we are sorry to tell you, that several quarrels have happened between your people and ours, in which people have been killed on both sides, and that we now see the nations round us and your people ready to embroil in a quarrel, which gives our nations great concerns, as we, on our parts, want to live in friendship with you. As you have always told us, you have laws to govern your people by, -- but we do not see that you have; therefore, brethren, unless you can fall upon some method of governing your people who live between the Great Mountains and the Ohio River and who are now very numerous, it will be out of the Indians’ power to govern their young men, for we assure you the black clouds begin to gather fast in this country. . . . We find your people are very fond of our rich land. We see them quarrelling every day about land and burning one another’s houses, so that we do not know how soon they may come over the river Ohio and drive us from our villages, nor do we see you, brothers, take any care to stop them. 6. Aeneas MacKay to Pennsylvania governor John Penn, April 4, 1774. MacKay, a magistrate of Pennsylvania’s Westmoreland County, reported on Virginia’s effort to create a competing jurisdiction in the vicinity of Pittsburgh. Dr. John Connolly, appointed by Governor Dunmore as commander

 of the militia in Pittsburgh, was at the center of the controversy.

 Since the return of the Celebrated Doctor Connelly from Virginia last to this place, which he did on the 28th of March, our village is become the scene of anarchy and Confusion. . . . The Doctor now is in actual possession of the Fort, with a Body Guard of Militia about him, Invested, as we are told, with both Civil & military power, to put the Virginia Law in Force in these parts, and a considerable Number of the Inhabitants of these back Parts of this Country, Ready to join him on any emergency, every artifice are used to seduce the people, some by being promoted to Civil or military employments, and others with the promises of grants of Lands, on easy Terms, & the giddy headed mobs are so Infatuated as to suffer themselves to be carried away by these Insinuating Delusions. . . . The Indians are greatly alarmed at seeing parties of armed men patrolling through our streets Daily, not knowing but there is hostility intended against them and their country. Sources: (1, 2) E. B. O’Callaghan and Berthold Fernow, eds., Documents Relative to the Colonial History of the State of New York, 15 vols. (Albany, 1856–1887), 7: 690–694, 574; (4) David Jones, A Journal of Two Visits Made to Some Nations of Indians on the West Side of the River Ohio, in the Years 1772 and 1773 (Burlington, 1774 [rep. NY, 1971]); (5) K. G. Davies, ed., Documents of the American Revolution, 1770–1783, 19 vols. (Shannon and Dublin, 1972–1981), 3: 254–255; (6) Samuel Hazard, ed., Pennsylvania Archives, series 1, 12 vols. (Philadelphia: Joseph Severns & Co., 1856), 4: 484–486.

ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1.
John Bradstreet, a career British army officer, based his observations (source 1) on his wartime experiences in the West. William Johnson (source 2) had lived in close proximity to Iroquois Indians for many years. Compare their views: what do they agree upon, and where do they differ? 2. Charles Grignion’s engraving (source 3) appeared in print a short time after Pontiac’s Rebellion. How does it portray the Ohio Indians? Compare Grignion’s image with the descriptions in sources 1 and 2 and John Killbuck’s speech (source 5). What parallels or differences do you see? 3. What do you find most surprising about source 4? What evidence of European influence do you see in the Indian towns Jones describes? 4. Sources 5 and 6 describe the state of affairs on the upper Ohio shortly before the outbreak of Dunmore’s War. What concerns does Killbuck express? Why was Virginia’s willingness to organize a militia so important to the residents of the region? 
PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
Using these documents and what you have learned in Chapter 5, write a short essay that surveys British and Anglo-American attitudes toward the Ohio Indians and explores the contradictions between these attitudes and the reality of life in the Ohio country. 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 gather at the town of Chillicothe on the Scioto River. There they formed the Scioto Confederacy, which pledged to oppose any further expansion into the Ohio country. Meanwhile, in London, the idea that the Proclamation Line was only temporary gave way to the view that it should be permanent. Hillsborough, who became colonial secretary in 1768, adamantly opposed westward expansion, believing it would antagonize the Indians without benefitting the empire. Moreover, he owned vast Irish estates, and he was alarmed by the number of tenants who were leaving Ireland for America. To preserve Britain’s laboring class, as well as control costs, Hillsborough wanted to make the Proclamation Line permanent. For colonists who were already moving west to settle in large numbers, this shift in policy caused confusion and frustration. Eventually, like the Patriots along the seaboard, they would take matters into their own hands.

Parliament Wavers
 In Britain, the colonies’ nonimportation agreement was taking its toll. In 1768, the colonies had cut imports of British manufactures in half; by 1769, the mainland colonies had a trade surplus with Britain of £816,000. Hard-hit by these developments, British merchants and manufacturers petitioned Parliament to repeal the Townshend duties. Early in 1770, Lord North became prime minister. A witty man and a skillful politician, North designed a new compromise. Arguing that it was foolish to tax British exports to America (thereby raising their price and decreasing consumption), he persuaded Parliament to repeal most of the Townshend

 duties. However, North retained the tax on tea as a symbol of Parliament’s supremacy (Figure 5.2).

The Boston Massacre Even as Parliament was
 debating North’s repeal, events in Boston guaranteed that reconciliation between Patriots and Parliament would be hard to achieve. Between 1,200 and 2,000 troops had been stationed in Boston for a year and a half. Soldiers were also stationed in New York, Philadelphia, several towns in New Jersey, and various frontier outposts in these years, with a minimum of conflict or violence. But in Boston — a small port town on a tiny peninsula — the troops numbered 10 percent of the local population, and their presence wore on the locals. On the night of March 5, 1770, a group of nine British redcoats fired into a crowd and killed five townspeople. A subsequent trial exonerated the soldiers, but Boston’s Radical Whigs, convinced of a ministerial conspiracy against liberty, labeled the incident a “massacre” and used it to rally sentiment against imperial power. Sovereignty Debated When news of North’s compromise arrived in the colonies in the wake of the Boston Massacre, the reaction was mixed. Most of Britain’s colonists remained loyal to the empire, but five years of conflict had taken their toll. In 1765, American leaders had accepted Parliament’s authority; the Stamp Act Resolves had opposed only certain “unconstitutional” legislation. By 1770, the most outspoken Patriots — Benjamin Franklin in Pennsylvania, Patrick Henry in Virginia, and Samuel Adams in Massachusetts — repudiated parliamentary supremacy and claimed equality for the American assemblies within the empire. Franklin suggested that the colonies

 FIGURE 5.2 Imports from Britain Boycott periods

 Credit crisis

4.5
Repeal of
Townshend Act


4.0
3.5
3.0
2.5


Trade as a Political Weapon, 1763–1776


 Exports to Britain (£, millions)

Tea Act


Townshend Act
Colonial
 trade deficit

Stamp Act


2.0
1.5
1.0
0.5
















 Political upheaval did not affect the mainland colonies’ exports to Britain, which rose slightly over the period, but imports fluctuated greatly. The American boycott of 1765–1766 prompted a dip in imports, but the second boycott of 1768–1770 led to a sharp drop in imports of British textiles, metal goods, and ceramics. Imports of manufactures soared after the repeal of the Townshend duties, only to plummet when the First Continental Congress proclaimed a third boycott in 1774.

 CHAPTER 5

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776




Patriot Propaganda
 Silversmith Paul Revere issued this engraving of the confrontation between British redcoats and snowballthrowing Bostonians in the days after it occurred. To whip up opposition to the military occupation of their town, Revere and other Patriots labeled the incident “The Boston Massacre.” The shooting confirmed their Radical Whig belief that “standing armies” were instruments of tyranny. Library of Congress.

 were now “distinct and separate states” with “the same Head, or Sovereign, the King.” Franklin’s suggestion outraged Thomas Hutchinson, the American-born royal governor of Massachusetts. Hutchinson emphatically rejected the idea of “two independent legislatures in one and the same state.” He told the Massachusetts assembly, “I know of no line that can be drawn between the supreme authority of Parliament and the total independence of the colonies.” There the matter rested. The British had twice imposed revenue acts on the colonies, and American Patriots had twice forced a retreat. If Parliament

 insisted on a policy of constitutional absolutism by imposing taxes a third time, some Americans were prepared to pursue violent resistance. Nor did they flinch when reminded that George III condemned their agitation. As the Massachusetts House replied to Hutchinson, “There is more reason to dread the consequences TRACE CHANGE of absolute uncontrolled supreme OVER TIME power, whether of a nation or a What was Benjamin monarch, than those of total inde- Franklin’s position on colonial representation pendence.” Fearful of civil war, in 1765, and why had his Lord North’s ministry hesitated to view changed by 1770? force the issue.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Road to Independence,
1771–1776
 Repeal of the Townshend duties in 1770 restored harmony to the British Empire, but strong feelings and mutual distrust lay just below the surface. In 1773, those emotions erupted, destroying any hope of compromise. Within two years, the Americans and the British clashed in armed conflict. Despite widespread resistance among loyal colonists, Patriot legislators created provisional governments and military forces, the two essentials for independence.

A
Compromise Repudiated  Once aroused, political passions are not easily quieted. In Boston, Samuel Adams and other radical Patriots continued to warn Americans of imperial domination and, late in 1772, persuaded the town meeting to set up a committee of correspondence “to state the Rights of the Colonists of this Province.” Soon, eighty Massachusetts towns had similar committees. When British officials threatened to seize the Americans responsible for the burning of the customs vessel Gaspée and prosecute them in Britain, the Virginia House of Burgesses and several other assemblies set up their own committees of correspondence. These standing committees allowed Patriots to communicate with leaders in other colonies when new threats to liberty occurred. By 1774, among the colonies that would later declare independence, only Pennsylvania was without one.

The East India Company and the Tea Act These
 committees sprang into action when Parliament passed the Tea Act of May 1773. The act provided financial relief for the East India Company, a royally chartered private corporation that served as the instrument of British imperialism. The company was deeply in debt; it also had a huge surplus of tea as a result of high import duties, which led Britons and colonists alike to drink smuggled UNDERSTAND Dutch tea instead. The Tea Act POINTS OF VIEW gave the company a government Why did colonists react so loan and, to boost its revenue, strongly against the Tea Act, which imposed a small canceled the import duties on tea tax and actually lowered the company exported to Ireland the price of tea? and the American colonies. Now even with the Townshend duty of 3 pence a pound on tea, high-quality East India Company tea would cost less than the Dutch tea smuggled into the colonies by American merchants.

 Radical Patriots accused the British ministry of bribing Americans with the cheaper East India Company’s tea so they would give up their principled opposition to the tea tax. As an anonymous woman wrote to the Massachusetts Spy, “The use of [British] tea is considered not as a private but as a public evil . . . a handle to introduce a variety of . . . oppressions amongst us.” Merchants joined the protest because the East India Company planned to distribute its tea directly to shopkeepers, excluding American wholesalers from the trade’s profits. “The fear of an Introduction of a Monopoly in this Country,” British general Frederick Haldimand reported from New York, “has induced the mercantile part of the Inhabitants to be very industrious in opposing this Step and added Strength to a Spirit of Independence already too prevalent.”

The Tea Party and the Coercive Acts The Sons of
 Liberty prevented East India Company ships from delivering their cargoes in New York, Philadelphia, and Charleston. In Massachusetts, Royal Governor Hutchinson was determined to land the tea and collect the tax. To foil the governor’s plan, artisans and laborers disguised as Indians boarded three ships — the Dartmouth, the Eleanor, and the Beaver — on December 16, 1773, broke open 342 chests of tea (valued at about £10,000, or about $900,000 today), and threw them into the harbor. “This destruction of the Tea . . . must have so important Consequences,” John Adams wrote in his diary, “that I cannot but consider it as an Epoch in History.” The king was outraged. “Concessions have made matters worse,” George III declared. “The time has come for compulsion.” Early in 1774, Parliament passed four Coercive Acts to force Massachusetts to pay for the tea and to submit to imperial authority. The Boston Port Bill closed Boston Harbor to shipping; the Massachusetts Government Act annulled the colony’s charter and prohibited most town meetings; a new Quartering Act mandated new barracks for British troops; and the Justice Act allowed trials for capital crimes to be transferred to other colonies or to Britain. Patriot leaders throughout the colonies branded the measures “Intolerable” and rallied support for Massachusetts. In Georgia, a Patriot warned the “Freemen of the Province” that “every privilege you at present claim as a birthright, may be wrested from you by the same authority that blockades the town of Boston.” “The cause of Boston,” George Washington declared in Virginia, “now is and ever will be considered as the cause of America.” The committees of correspondence had created a firm sense of Patriot unity.

 CHAPTER 5

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


The Boston Tea Party
 Led by radical Patriots disguised as Mohawk Indians, Bostonians dumped the East India Company’s taxed tea into the harbor. The rioters made clear their “pure” political motives by punishing those who sought personal gain: one Son of Liberty who stole some of the tea was “stripped of his booty and his clothes together, and sent home naked.” Library of Congress.

 In 1774, Parliament also passed the Quebec Act, which allowed the practice of Roman Catholicism in Quebec. This concession to Quebec’s predominantly Catholic population reignited religious passions in New England, where Protestants associated Catholicism with arbitrary royal government. Because the act extended Quebec’s boundaries into the Ohio River Valley, it likewise angered influential land speculators in Virginia and Pennsylvania and ordinary settlers by the thousands (Map 5.4). Although the ministry did not intend the Quebec Act as a coercive measure, many colonists saw it as further proof of Parliament’s intention to control American affairs.

The Continental Congress Responds
 In response to the Coercive Acts, Patriot leaders convened a new continent-wide body, the Continental Congress. Twelve mainland colonies sent representatives. Four recently acquired colonies — Florida, Quebec, Nova Scotia, and Newfoundland — refused to send delegates, as did Georgia, where the royal governor controlled the legislature. The assemblies of Barbados, Jamaica, and the other sugar islands, although wary of

 British domination, were even more fearful of revolts by their predominantly African populations and therefore declined to attend. The delegates who met in Philadelphia in September 1774 had different agendas. Southern representatives, fearing a British plot “to overturn the constitution and introduce a system of arbitrary government,” advocated a new economic boycott. Independence-minded representatives from New England demanded political union and defensive military preparations. Many delegates from the Middle Atlantic colonies favored compromise. Led by Joseph Galloway of Pennsylvania, these men of “loyal principles” proposed a new political system similar to Benjamin Franklin’s proposal at the Albany Congress of 1754: each colony would retain its assembly to legislate on local matters, and a new continent-wide body would handle general American affairs. The king would appoint a president-general to preside over a legislative council selected by the colonial assemblies. Galloway’s plan failed by a single vote; a bare majority thought it was too conciliatory (American Voices, p. 172). Instead, the delegates demanded the repeal of the Coercive Acts and stipulated that British control





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

50°


 HUDSO

N ' S B AY C


 MAP 5.4

N


British Western Policy, 1763–1774


Gulf of
St. Lawrence


NY O M PA

Louisbourg


!


Montreal


!


!


 (MASS.)

 aw

 ke Superior La

 ren ce R.

Quebec
!


Lake M
 ichi gan

 n uro eH

 (VIRGINIA)

St.


La
 k

S PA N


AND MASS.)

L ak


 tario L. On rie eE

ISH LOUIS

O hi


 o

 Albany ! CONN.

 TRANSYLVANIA sipp i R.

Mis
 s is

 IANA

NORTH CAROLINA

 GEORGIA

! Charleston


BY SPAIN AND GEORGIA)

90°W


Gulf of Mexico


!
New York




N
40°


S


ATL A N T I C O CEAN



VANDALIA VIRGINIA

W


R.I.


MD. DEL.

SOUTH CAROLINA

E


N.H.
NEW
Boston YORK MASS. ! 
 PENN.

 (VIRGINIA) R.

L


Philadelphia
!N.J.


AND CONN.)

Port Royal


N




 300 miles

 The Proclamation of 1763 prohibited white settlement west of the Appalachian Mountains. Nonetheless, Anglo-American settlers and land speculators proposed the new colonies of Vandalia and Transylvania to the west of Virginia and North Carolina. The Quebec Act of 1774 designated most western lands as Indian reserves and vastly enlarged the boundaries of Quebec, dashing speculators’ hopes and eliminating the old sea-to-sea land claims of many seaboard colonies. The act especially angered New England Protestants, who condemned it for allowing French residents to practice Catholicism, and colonial political leaders, who protested its failure to provide Quebec with a representative assembly.

 300 kilometers

 Boundaries after Treaty of Paris, 1763 British trading company 13 Colonies Other British possessions Spain 30°N Quebec in 1763 Quebec in 1774 Proclamation Line of 1763 State boundaries including western claims Proposed western colonies

80°W


 be limited to matters of trade. It also approved a program of economic retaliation: Americans would stop importing British goods in December 1774. If Parliament did COMPARE AND not repeal the Coercive Acts by CONTRAST September 1775, the Congress Why did Parliament prefer vowed to cut off virtually all coloNorth’s solution to the Boston Tea Party to nial exports to Britain, Ireland, William Pitt’s? and the British West Indies. Ten years of constitutional conflict had culminated in a threat of all-out commercial warfare. A few British leaders still hoped for compromise. In January 1775, William Pitt, now sitting in the House of Lords as the Earl of Chatham, asked Parliament to renounce its power to tax the colonies and to recognize the Continental Congress as a lawful body. In return, he suggested, the Congress should acknowledge parliamentary supremacy and provide a permanent source of revenue to help defray the national debt. The British ministry rejected Pitt’s plan. Twice it had backed down in the face of colonial resistance; a third retreat was impossible. Branding the Continental Congress an illegal assembly, the ministry rejected

70°W


 Lord Dartmouth’s proposal to send commissioners to negotiate a settlement. Instead, Lord North set stringent terms: Americans must pay for their own defense and administration and acknowledge Parliament’s authority to tax them. To put teeth in these demands, North imposed a naval blockade on American trade with foreign nations and ordered General Gage to suppress dissent in Massachusetts. “Now the case seemed desperate,” the prime minister told Thomas Hutchinson, whom the Patriots had forced into exile in London. “Parliament would not — could not — concede. For aught he could see it must come to violence.”

The Rising of the Countryside
 The fate of the urban-led Patriot movement would depend on the colonies’ large rural population. Most farmers had little interest in imperial affairs. Their lives were deeply rooted in the soil, and their prime allegiance was to family and community. But imperial policies had increasingly intruded into the lives of farm families by sending their sons to war and raising their taxes. In 1754, farmers on Long Island, New York, had paid an average tax of 10 shillings; by 1756, thanks to

 CHAPTER 5

 the Great War for Empire, their taxes had jumped to 30 shillings.

 The Continental Association The boycotts of 1765 and 1768 raised the political consciousness of rural Americans. When the First Continental Congress established the Continental Association in 1774 to enforce a third boycott of British goods, it quickly set up a rural network of committees to do its work. In Concord, Massachusetts, 80 percent of the male heads of families and a number of single women signed a “Solemn League and Covenant” supporting nonimportation. In other farm towns, men blacked their faces, disguised themselves in blankets “like Indians,” and threatened violence against shopkeepers who traded “in rum, molasses, & Sugar, &c.” in violation of the boycott. Patriots likewise warned that British measures threatened the yeoman tradition of landownership. In Petersham, Massachusetts, the town meeting worried that new British taxes would drain “this People of the Fruits of their Toil.” Arable land was now scarce and expensive in older communities, and in new settlements merchants were seizing farmsteads for delinquent

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


 debts. By the 1770s, many northern yeomen felt personally threatened by British policies, which, a Patriot pamphlet warned, were “paving the way for reducing the country to lordships” (Table 5.3).

Southern Planters Fear Dependency Despite
 their higher standard of living, southern slave owners had similar fears. Many Chesapeake planters were deeply in debt to British merchants. Accustomed to being absolute masters on their slave-labor plantations and seeing themselves as guardians of English liberties, planters resented their financial dependence on British creditors and dreaded the prospect of political subservience to British officials. That danger now seemed real. If Parliament used the Coercive Acts to subdue Massachusetts, then it might turn next to Virginia, dissolving its representative assembly and assisting British merchants to seize debt-burdened properties. Consequently, the Virginia gentry supported demands by indebted yeomen farmers to close the law courts so that they could bargain with merchants over debts without the threat of legal action. “The spark of liberty is not yet extinct among our people,” declared one planter, “and if properly

 TABLE 5.3 Patriot Resistance, 1762–1776 Date

British Action


Patriot Response




Revenue Act


 Merchants complain privately



Proclamation Line


 Land speculators voice discontent



Sugar Act


 Merchants and Massachusetts legislature protest



Stamp Act


 Sons of Liberty riot; Stamp Act Congress; first boycott of British goods



Quartering Act


 New York assembly refuses to fund until 1767

1767–1768


 Townshend Act; military occupation of Boston

 Second boycott of British goods; harassment of pro-British merchants



 Royal commission to investigate Gaspée affair

 Committees of correspondence form



Tea Act


 Widespread resistance; Boston Tea Party



Coercive Acts; Quebec Act


 First Continental Congress; third boycott of British goods



 British raids near Boston; king’s Proclamation for Suppressing Rebellion and Sedition

 Armed resistance; Second Continental Congress; invasion of Canada; cutoff of colonial exports



 Military attacks led by royal governors in South

 Paine’s Common Sense; Declaration of Independence



AMERICAN VOICES
The Debate over Representation and Sovereignty 
 Speaking before the House of Commons, Benjamin Franklin declared that before 1763 Americans had paid little attention to the question of Parliament’s “right to lay taxes and duties” in the colonies. The reason was simple, Franklin said: “A right to lay internal taxes was never supposed to be in Parliament, as we are not represented there.” Franklin recognized that representation was central to the imperial debate. As the following selections show, the failure to solve the problem of representation, and the closely related issue of parliamentary sovereignty, led to the American rebellion.

Jared Ingersoll


Report on the Debates in Parliament (1765)
 Connecticut lawyer Jared Ingersoll (1722–1781) served as his colony’s agent, or lobbyist, in Britain. In this 1765 letter to the governor of Connecticut, Ingersoll summarizes the debate then under way in Parliament over the Stamp Act. When the act passed, he returned home to become the stamp distributor in Connecticut. A mob forced him to resign that post. Ingersoll later served as a vice-admiralty judge in Philadelphia and, during the Revolution, remained loyal to Britain.

 The principal Attention has been to the Stamp bill that has been preparing to Lay before Parliament for taxing America. The Point of the Authority of Parliament to impose such Tax I found on my Arrival here was so fully and Universally yielded [accepted], that there was not the least hopes of making any impressions that way. . . . I beg leave to give you a Summary of the Arguments which are made use of in favour of such Authority. The House of Commons, say they, is a branch of the supreme legislature of the Nation, and which in its Nature is supposed to represent, or rather to stand in the place of, the Commons, that is, of the great body of the people. . . . That this house of Commons, therefore, is now . . . a part of the Supreme unlimited power of the Nation, as in every State there must be some unlimited Power and Authority. . . . They say a Power to tax is a necessary part of every Supreme Legislative Authority, and that if they have not that Power over America, they have none, and then America is at once a Kingdom of itself. On the other hand those who oppose the bill say, it is true the Parliament have a supreme unlimited Authority over every Part and Branch of the Kings dominions and as well over Ireland as any other place. Yet [they say] we believe a British parliament will never think it prudent to tax Ireland [or America]. Tis true they say, that the Commons of England and of the

 British Empire are all represented in and by the house of Commons, but this representation is confessedly on all hands by Construction and Virtual [because most British subjects] . . . have no hand in choosing the representatives. . . . [They say further] that the Effects of this implied Representation here and in America must be infinitely different in the Article of Taxation. . . . By any Mistake an act of Parliament is made that prove injurious and hard the Member of Parliament here [in Britain] sees with his own Eyes and is moreover very accessible to the people. . . . [Also,] the taxes are laid equally by one Rule and fall as well on the Member himself as on the people. But as to America, from the great distance in point of Situation [they are not represented in the same way]. . . . [Finally, the opponents of the Act say] we already by the Regulations upon their trade draw from the Americans all that they can spare. . . . This Step [of taxation] should not take place until or unless the Americans are allowed to send Members to Parliament. Thus I have given you, I think, the Substance of the Arguments on both sides of that great and important Question of the right and also of the Expediency of taxing America by Authority of Parliament. . . . [But] upon a Division of the house upon the Question, there was about 250 to about 50 in favour of the Bill. Source: New Haven Colony Historical Society, Papers (1918), 9: 306–315.

Joseph Galloway


Plan of Union (1775)
 Speaker of the Pennsylvania assembly Joseph Galloway was a delegate to the First Continental Congress, where he proposed a plan that addressed the issue of representation. The colonies would remain British but operate under a continental government with the power to veto parliamentary laws that affected America. Radical Patriots in the Congress, who favored independence, prevented a vote

 on Galloway’s plan and suppressed mention of it in the records. Galloway remained loyal to the crown, fought on the British side in the War for Independence, and moved to England in 1778.

 If we sincerely mean to accommodate the difference between the two countries, . . . we must take into consideration a number of facts which led the Parliament to pass the acts complained of. . . . [You will recall] the dangerous situation of the Colonies from the intrigues of France, and the incursions of the Canadians and their Indian allies, at the commencement of the last war. . . . Great-Britain sent over her fleets and armies for their protection. . . . In this state of the Colonies, it was not unreasonable to expect that Parliament would have levied a tax on them proportionate to their wealth, . . . Parliament was naturally led to exercise the power which had been, by its predecessors, so often exercised over the Colonies, and to pass the Stamp Act. Against this act, the Colonies petitioned Parliament, and denied its authority . . . [declaring] that the Colonies could not be represented in that body. This justly alarmed the British Senate. It was thought and called by the ablest men [in] Britain, a clear and explicit declaration of the American Independence, and compelled the Parliament to pass the Declaratory Act, in order to save its ancient and incontrovertible right of supremacy over all the parts of the empire. . . . Having thus briefly stated the arguments in favour of parliamentary authority, . . . I am free to confess that the exercise of that authority is not perfectly constitutional in respect to the Colonies. We know that the whole landed interest of Britain is represented in that body, while neither the land nor the people of America hold the least participation in the legislative authority of the State. . . . Representation, or a participation in the supreme councils of the State, is the great principle upon which the freedom of the British Government is established and secured. I wish to see . . . the right to participate in the supreme councils of the State extended, in some form . . . to America . . . [and therefore] have prepared the draught of a plan for uniting America more intimately, in constitutional policy, with Great-Britain. . . . I am certain when dispassionately considered, it will be found to be the most perfect union in power and liberty with the Parent State, next to a representation in Parliament, and I trust it will be approved of by both countries.

The Plan
 That the several [colonial] assemblies shall [form an American union and] choose members for the grand council. . . . That the Grand Council . . . shall hold and exercise all the like rights, liberties and privileges, as are held and exercised by and in the House of Commons of Great-Britain. . . . That the President-General shall hold his office during the pleasure of the King, and his assent shall be requisite to all acts of the Grand Council, and it shall be his office and duty to cause them to be carried into execution. . . . That the President-General, by and with the advice and consent of the Grand-Council, hold and exercise all the legislative rights, powers, and authorities, necessary for regulating and administering all the general police and affairs of the colonies. . . . That the said President-General and the Grand Council, be an inferior and distinct branch of the British legislature, united and incorporated with it, . . . and that the assent of both [Parliament and the Grand Council] shall be requisite to the validity of all such general acts or statutes [that affect the colonies]. Source: Joseph Galloway, Historical and Political Reflections on the Rise and Progress of the American Rebellion (London, 1780), 70.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
According to Ingersoll, what were the main arguments of those in Parliament who opposed the Stamp Act? Did those opposing the Stamp Act agree with the act’s supporters that Parliament had the right to tax the colonies? 2. How did Galloway’s plan solve the problem of colonial representation in Parliament? How would the British ministers who advocated parliamentary supremacy have reacted to the plan? 3. The framers of the U.S. Constitution addressed the problem of dividing authority between state governments and the national government by allowing the states to retain legal authority over most matters and delegating limited powers to the national government. Could such a solution have been implemented in the British Empire? Why or why not? 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 fanned by the Gentlemen of influence will, I make no doubt, burst out again into a flame.”

Loyalists and Neutrals
 Yet in many places, the Patriot movement was a hard sell. In Virginia, Patriot leaders were nearly all wealthy planters, and many of their poorer neighbors regarded the movement with suspicion. In regions where great landowners became Patriots — the Hudson River Valley of New York, for example — many tenant farmers supported the king because they hated their landlords. Similar social conflicts prompted some Regulators in the North Carolina backcountry and many farmers in eastern Maryland to oppose the Patriots there. There were many reasons to resist the Patriot movement. Skeptics believed that Patriot leaders were subverting British rule only to advance their own selfish interests. Peter Oliver wrote of Samuel Adams, for example, “He was so thorough a Machiavilian, that he divested himself of every worthy Principle, & would stick at no Crime to accomplish his Ends.” Some “Gentlemen of influence” worried that resistance to Britain would undermine all political institutions and “introduce Anarchy and disorder and render life and property here precarious.” Their fears increased when the Sons of Liberty used intimidation and violence to uphold the boycotts. One well-to-do New Yorker complained, “No man can be in a more abject state of bondage than he whose Reputation, Property and Life are exposed to the discretionary violence . . . of the community.” As the crisis deepened, such men became Loyalists — so called because they remained loyal to the British crown. Many other colonists simply hoped to stay out of the fray. Some did so on principle: in New Jersey and Pennsylvania, thousands of pacifist Quakers and Germans resisted conscription and violence out of religious conviction. Others were ambivalent or confused about the political crisis unfolding around them. The delegate elected to New York’s Provincial Congress from Queen’s County, on Long Island, chose not to attend since “the people [he represented] seemed to be much inclined to remain peaceable and quiet.” More than three-fourths of Queen’s County voters, in fact, opposed sending any delegate at all. Many loyal or neutral colonists hoped, above all, to preserve their families’ property and independence, whatever the outcome of the imperial crisis. Historians estimate that some 15 to 20 percent of the white population — perhaps as many as 400,000

 colonists — were loyal to the crown. Some managed to avoid persecution, but many were pressured by their neighbors to join the boycotts and subjected to violence and humiliation if they refused. As Patriots took over the reins of local government throughout the colonies, Loyalists were driven out of their homes or forced into silence. At this crucial juncture, Patriots commanded the allegiance, or at least the acquiescence, of the majority of white Americans.

Violence East and West
 By 1774, British authority was wavering. At the headwaters of the Ohio, the abandonment of Fort Pitt left a power vacuum that was filled by opportunistic men, led by a royally appointed governor acting in defiance of his commission. In Massachusetts, the attempt to isolate and punish Boston and the surrounding countryside backfired as Patriots resisted military coercion. Violence resulted in both places, and with it the collapse of imperial control.

 Lord Dunmore’s War In the years since the end of Pontiac’s Rebellion, at least 10,000 people had traveled along Braddock’s and Forbes’s Roads to the headwaters of the Ohio River, where Fort Pitt had replaced Fort Duquesne during the Great War for Empire, and staked claims to land around Pittsburgh (Map 5.5). They relied for protection on Fort Pitt, which remained one of Britain’s most important frontier outposts. But the revenue crisis forced General Gage to cut expenses, and in October 1772, the army pulled down the fort’s log walls and left the site to the local population. Settler relations with the neighboring Ohio Indians were tenuous and illdefined, and the fort’s abandonment left them exposed and vulnerable. In the ensuing power vacuum, Pennsylvania and Virginia both claimed the region. Pennsylvania had the better claim on paper. It had organized county governments, established courts, and collected taxes there. But — in keeping with its pacifist Quaker roots — it did not organize a militia. In this decision, Virginia’s royal governor, the Earl of Dunmore, recognized an opportunity. Appointed to his post in 1771, Dunmore was an irascible and unscrupulous man who clashed repeatedly with the House of Burgesses. But when it suited him, he was just as willing to defy the crown. In 1773, he traveled to Pittsburgh, where, he later wrote, “the people flocked about me and beseeched me . . . to

 CHAPTER 5

 MAP 5.5

Fort Niagara
Fort Erie


 POTAWATOMI

 um

Ohi


 o R.

 ng ski Mu

 to Scio

.


R


R.


 SHAWNEE

 e

 an

Fort Pitt


 na

Po
 to m ac R

Philadelphia


R.
Delaware
Bay


.


Che


Mia
 mi R.

DE LA W AR

WYA
Fort Sandusky NDO T 
E


Fort Venango


Fort Miami


 MIAMI

 CA

 NE

 SE

Susqueh


 u Ma

.
 eR me

Fort
Presque Isle


 re R.

 ie Er ke Fort La Le Boeuf

 wa la

Fort Detroit


De


INA ABEG

Allegh n
 yR .

 ISH

M
IN
Monong GO ahel a R. 
 AN



Fort Ontario


Lake Ontario


Lake
Huron


The Ohio Country, 1774–1775


 sap

Lexington
Boonesborough


 appoint magistrates and officers of militia.” He organized a local militia; soon, men armed by Virginia were drilling near the ruins of Fort Pitt. In the summer of 1774, Dunmore took the next step. In defiance of both his royal instructions and the House of Burgesses, he called out Virginia’s militia and led a force of 2,400 men against the Ohio Shawnees, who had a long-standing claim to Kentucky as a hunting ground. They fought a single battle, at Point Pleasant; the Shawnees were defeated, and Dunmore and his militia forces claimed Kentucky as their own. A participant justified his actions shortly afterward: “When without a king,” he wrote, “[one] doeth according to the freedom of his own will.” Years of neglect left many colonists in the backcountry feeling abandoned by the crown. Dunmore’s War was their declaration of independence.

Armed Resistance in Massachusetts
 Meanwhile, as the Continental Congress gathered in Philadelphia in September 1774, Massachusetts was also defying British authority. In August, a Middlesex County Congress had urged Patriots to close the existing royal courts and to transfer their political allegiance to the popularly elected House of Representatives. Subsequently, armed crowds harassed Loyalists and ensured Patriot rule in most of New England. In response, General Thomas Gage, now the military governor of Massachusetts, ordered British troops in Boston in September 1774 to seize Patriot armories





Bay


 Braddock’s Road Forbes’ Road

Ohio R.


 e eak

 The erosion of British imperial authority caused chaos in the Ohio country. Pennsylvania and Virginia each claimed Pittsburgh and the surrounding countryside, while the Indian communities on the upper Ohio increasingly feared colonist aggression. Their fears were realized in the summer of 1774, when Lord Dunmore led a force of Virginia militia into the valley. After defeating a Shawnee force in the Battle of Point Pleasant, many Virginians began surveying and staking claims to land in the Kentucky bluegrass. In the summer of 1775, perhaps a dozen new towns were settled there, in violation of the Royal Proclamation of 1763 and the Quebec Act of 1774.

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


 100 miles

 100 kilometers

 in nearby Charlestown and Cambridge. An army of 20,000 militiamen quickly mobilized to safeguard other Massachusetts military depots. The Concord town meeting raised a defensive force, the famous Minutemen, to “Stand at a minutes warning in Case of alarm.” Increasingly, Gage’s authority was limited to Boston, where it rested on the bayonets of his 3,500 troops. Meanwhile, the Patriot-controlled Massachusetts assembly met in nearby Salem in open defiance of Parliament, collecting taxes, bolstering the militia, and assuming the responsibilities of government. In London, the colonial secretary, Lord Dartmouth, proclaimed Massachusetts to be in “open rebellion” and ordered Gage to march against the “rude rabble.” On the PLACE EVENTS night of April 18, 1775, Gage dis- IN CONTEXT patched 700 soldiers to capture What led to Dunmore’s colonial leaders and supplies at War, and why did western Concord. However, Paul Revere settlers support it? and a series of other riders warned Patriots in many towns, and at dawn, militiamen confronted the British regulars first at Lexington and then at Concord. Those first skirmishes took a handful of lives, but as the British retreated to Boston, militia from neighboring towns repeatedly ambushed them. By the end of the day, 73 British soldiers were dead, 174 wounded, and 26 missing. British fire had killed 49 Massachusetts militiamen and wounded 39. Twelve years of economic and constitutional conflict had ended in violence.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Second Continental Congress
Organizes for War
 A month later, in May 1775, Patriot leaders gathered in Philadelphia for the Second Continental Congress. As the Congress opened, 3,000 British troops attacked American fortifications on Breed’s Hill and Bunker Hill overlooking Boston. After three assaults and 1,000 casualties, they finally dislodged the Patriot militia. Inspired by his countrymen’s valor, John Adams exhorted the Congress to rise to the “defense of American liberty” by creating a continental army. He nominated George Washington to lead it. After bitter debate, the Congress approved the proposals, but, Adams lamented, only “by bare majorities.”

 Congress Versus King George Despite the bloodshed in Massachusetts, a majority in the Congress still hoped for reconciliation. Led by John Dickinson of Pennsylvania, these moderates won approval of a petition expressing loyalty to George III and asking for repeal of oppressive parliamentary legislation. But Samuel Adams, Patrick Henry, and other zealous Patriots drummed up support for a Declaration of the Causes and Necessities of Taking Up Arms. Americans dreaded the “calamities of civil war,” the declaration asserted, but were “resolved to die Freemen rather than to live [as] slaves.” George III failed to exploit the divisions among the Patriots; instead, in August 1775, he issued a Proclamation for Suppressing Rebellion and Sedition. Before the king’s proclamation reached America, the radicals in the Congress had won support for an invasion of Canada to prevent a British attack from the north. Patriot forces easily defeated the British at Montreal; but in December 1775, they failed to capture Quebec EXPLAIN CONSEQUENCES City and withdrew. Meanwhile, How did the violence American merchants waged the around Boston in the financial warfare promised at the spring of 1775 affect First Continental Congress by cutproceedings in the Second ting off exports to Britain and its Continental Congress? West Indian sugar islands. Parliament retaliated with the Prohibitory Act, which outlawed all trade with the rebellious colonies. Fighting in the South Skirmishes between Patriot and Loyalist forces now broke out in the southern colonies. In Virginia, Patriots ousted Governor Dunmore and forced him to take refuge on a British warship in Chesapeake Bay. Branding the rebels “traitors,” the governor organized two military forces: one white, the

 George III, 1771 King George III was a young man of twenty-seven when the American troubles began in 1765. Six years later, as this portrait by Johann Zoffany suggests, the king had aged. Initially, George had been headstrong and tried to impose his will on Parliament, but he succeeded only in generating political confusion and inept policy. He strongly supported Parliament’s attempts to tax the colonies and continued the war in America long after most of his ministers agreed that it had been lost. The Royal Collection © 2011 Her Majesty Queen Elizabeth II/The Bridgeman Art Library.

 Queen’s Own Loyal Virginians; and one black, the Ethiopian Regiment, which enlisted 1,000 slaves who had fled their Patriot owners. In November 1775, Dunmore issued a controversial proclamation promising freedom to black slaves and white indentured servants who joined the Loyalist cause. White planters denounced this “Diabolical scheme,” claiming it “point[ed] a dagger to their Throats.” A new rising of the black and white underclasses, as in Bacon’s Rebellion in the 1670s, seemed a possibility. In Fincastle County in southwestern Virginia, Loyalist planter John Hiell urged workers to support the king, promising “a Servant man” that soon “he and all the negroes would get their freedom.” Frightened by Dunmore’s aggressive tactics, Patriot yeomen and tenants called for a final break with Britain. In North Carolina, too, military clashes prompted demands for independence. Early in 1776, Josiah Martin, the colony’s royal governor, raised a Loyalist force of 1,500 Scottish Highlanders in the backcountry. In response, Patriots mobilized the lowcountry militia

 CHAPTER 5

The Problem of Empire, 1763–1776


 and, in February, defeated Martin’s army at the Battle of Moore’s Creek Bridge, capturing more than 800 Highlanders. Following this victory, radical Patriots in the North Carolina assembly told its representatives to the Continental Congress to join with “other Colonies in declaring Independence, and forming foreign alliances.” In May, the Virginia gentry followed suit: led by James Madison, Edmund Pendleton, and Patrick Henry, the Patriots met in convention and resolved unanimously to support independence.

 would include the Kentucky settlements. They had “Fought and bled” for the land in Dunmore’s War and now wanted to fight against the crown and its Indian allies in the Ohio country. Virginia agreed: in 1776, it organized six new frontier counties and sent arms and ammunition to Kentucky. In July, the Continental Congress followed suit, dispatching troops and arms to the Ohio River as well.

 Occupying Kentucky Beginning in the spring of 1775, in the wake of Dunmore’s War, independent parties of adventurers began to occupy the newly won lands of Kentucky. Daniel Boone led one group to the banks of the Kentucky River, where they established the town of Boonesborough; nearby was Lexington, named in honor of the Massachusetts town that had resisted the redcoats a few months earlier. The Shawnees and other Ohio Indians opposed the settlers, and colonists built their tiny towns in the form of stations to protect themselves — groups of cabins connected by palisades to form small forts. These western settlers had confused political loyalties. Many had marched under Dunmore and hoped to receive recognition for their claims from the crown. But as the rebellion unfolded, most recognized that the Patriots’ emphasis on liberty and equality squared with their view of the world. They soon petitioned Virginia’s rebel government, asking it to create a new county that

 As military conflicts escalated, Americans were divided in their opinions of King George III. Many blamed him for supporting oppressive legislation and ordering armed retaliation, but other influential colonists held out the hope that he might mediate their conflict with Parliament. John Dickinson, whose Letters did so much to arouse Patriot resistance in 1768, nevertheless believed that war with Great Britain would be folly. In July 1775, he persuaded Congress to send George III the Olive Branch Petition, which pleaded with the king to negotiate. John Adams, a staunch supporter of independence, was infuriated by Dickinson’s waffling. But Dickinson had many supporters, both inside and outside of Congress. For example, many of Philadelphia’s Quaker and Anglican merchants were neutrals or Loyalists. In response to their passivity, Patriot artisans in the city organized a Mechanics’ Association to protect America’s “just Rights and Privileges.”

Daniel Boone Escorting Settlers
Through the Cumberland Gap
 In 1775 Daniel Boone led a group of prospective settlers into Kentucky on behalf of Richard Henderson, a North Carolina judge and self-appointed proprietor of a land speculation venture called the Transylvania Colony. Henderson’s venture soon collapsed, but Boonesborough was one of perhaps a dozen towns founded in Kentucky in violation of crown policy that summer. Boone became a folk hero, and in the mid-nineteenth century George Caleb Bingham painted this memorable scene. Using biblical imagery (the woman on horseback recalls Mary riding into Bethlehem on a donkey) and dramatic lighting, Bingham portrays Boone as an agent of progress bringing civilization to a howling and dangerous wilderness. George Caleb Bingham, Daniel Boone Escorting Settlers Through the Cumberland Gap, 1851–52. Oil on Canvas, 36½ x 50¼". Mildred Lane Kemper Art Museum, Washington University in St. Louis. Gift of Nathanial Phillips, 1890.

 Thomas Paine’s Common Sense





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 With popular sentiment in flux, a single brief pamphlet helped tip the balance. In January 1776, Thomas Paine published Common Sense, a rousing call for independence and a republican form of government. Paine had served as a minor customs official in England until he was fired for joining a protest against low wages. In 1774, Paine migrated to Philadelphia, where he met Benjamin Rush and other Patriots who shared his republican sentiments. In Common Sense, Paine assaulted the traditional monarchical order in stirring language. “Monarchy and hereditary succession have laid the world in blood and ashes,” Paine proclaimed, leveling a personal attack at George III, “the hard hearted sullen Pharaoh of England.” Mixing insults with biblical quotations, Paine blasted the British system of “mixed government” that balanced power among the three estates of king, lords, and commoners. Paine granted that the system “was noble for the dark and slavish times” of the past, but now it yielded only “monarchical tyranny in the person of the king” and “aristocratical tyranny in the persons of the peers.” Paine argued for American independence by turning the traditional metaphor of patriarchal authority on its head: “Is it the interest of a man to be a boy all his life?” he asked. Within six months, Common Sense had gone through twenty-five editions and reached hundreds of thousands of people. “There is great talk of independence,” a worried New York Loyalist noted, “the unthinking multitude are mad for it. . . . A pamphlet called Common Sense has carried off . . .

 thousands.” Paine urged Americans to create independent republican states: “A government of our own is our natural right, ’tis time to part.”

Independence Declared
 Inspired by Paine’s arguments and beset by armed Loyalists, Patriot conventions urged a break from Britain. In June 1776, Richard Henry Lee presented Virginia’s resolution to the Continental Congress: “That these United Colonies are, and of right ought to be, free and independent states.” Faced with certain defeat, staunch Loyalists and anti-independence moderates withdrew from the Congress, leaving committed Patriots to take the fateful step. On July 4, 1776, the Congress approved the Declaration of Independence (see Documents, p. D-1). The Declaration’s main author, Thomas Jefferson of Virginia, had mobilized resistance to the Coercive Acts with the pamphlet A Summary View of the Rights of British America (1774). Now, in the Declaration, he justified independence and republicanism to Americans and the world by vilifying George III: “He has plundered our seas, ravaged our coasts, burned our towns, and destroyed the lives of our people.” Such a prince was a “tyrant,” Jefferson concluded, and “is unfit to be the ruler of a free people.” Employing the ideas of the European Enlightenment, Jefferson proclaimed a series of “self-evident” truths: “that all men are created equal”; that they possess the “unalienable rights” of “Life, Liberty, and the pursuit

Independence Declared
 In this painting by John Trumbull, Thomas Jefferson and the other drafters of the Declaration (John Adams of Massachusetts, Roger Sherman of Connecticut, Robert Livingston of New York, and Benjamin Franklin of Pennsylvania) present the document to John Hancock, the president of the Second Continental Congress. One Patriot observer reported that when the Declaration was read at a public meeting in New York City on July 10, a massive statue of George III was “pulled down by the Populace” and its 4,000 pounds of lead melted down to make “Musquet balls” for use against the British troops massed on Staten Island. Yale University Art Gallery/Art Resource, NY.

 CHAPTER 5

 of Happiness”; that government derives its “just powers from the consent of the governed” and can rightly be overthrown if it “becomes destructive of these ends.” By linking these doctrines of individual liberty, popular sovereignty (the principle that ultimate power lies in the hands of the electorate), and republican government with American independence, Jefferson established them as the defining political values of the new nation. For Jefferson, as for Paine, the pen proved mightier than the sword. The Declaration won wide support in France and Germany; at home, it sparked celebrations in rural hamlets and seaport cities, as crowds burned effigies and toppled statues of the king. On July 8, 1776, in Easton, Pennsylvania, a “great number of spectators” heard a reading of the Declaration, “gave their hearty assent with three loud huzzahs, and cried out, ‘May God long preserve and unite the Free and Independent States of America.’ ”

SUMMARY
Chapters 4 and 5 have focused on a short span of time — a mere two decades — and outlined the plot of a political drama. Act I of that drama, the Great War 
CHAPTER REVIEW

 for Empire discussed in Chapter 4, prompted British political leaders to implement a program of imperial reform and taxation. Act II, discussed in this chapter, is full of dramatic action, as colonial mobs riot, colonists chafe against restrictions on western lands, Patriot pamphleteers articulate ideologies of resistance, and British ministers search for compromise between claims of parliamentary sovereignty and assertions of colonial autonomy. Act III takes the form of tragedy: the once-proud British Empire dissolves into civil war, an imminent nightmare of death and destruction. Why did this happen? More than two centuries later, the answers still are not clear. Certainly, the lack of astute leadership in Britain was a major factor. But British leaders faced circumstances that limited their actions: a huge national debt and deep commitments to both a powerful fiscal-military state and the absolute supremacy of Parliament. Moreover, in America, decades of salutary neglect strengthened Patriots’ demands for political autonomy and economic opportunity. Artisans, farmers, and aspiring western settlers all feared an oppressive new era in imperial relations. The trajectories of their conflicting intentions and ideas placed Britain and its American possessions on course for a disastrous and fatal collision.

C H A P T E R


R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
TERMS TO KNOW

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
Sugar Act of 1764 (p. 155)
 vice-admiralty courts (p. 156) Stamp Act of 1765 (p. 157) virtual representation (p. 157) Quartering Act of 1765 (p. 157) Stamp Act Congress (p. 158) Sons of Liberty (p. 158) English common law (p. 159) natural rights (p. 159) Declaratory Act of 1766 (p. 160) Townshend Act of 1767 (p. 161) nonimportation movement (p. 161)

Key People
 committees of correspondence (p. 168) Tea Act of May 1773 (p. 168) Coercive Acts (p. 168) Continental Congress (p. 169) Continental Association (p. 171) Dunmore’s War (p. 175) Minutemen (p. 175) Second Continental Congress (p. 176) Declaration of Independence (p. 178) popular sovereignty (p. 179)

George Grenville (p. 155)
John Dickinson (p. 159)
Charles Townshend (p. 160)
Lord North (p. 166)
Samuel Adams (p. 166)
Lord Dunmore (p. 174)
Thomas Paine (p. 178)
Thomas Jefferson (p. 178)






 PART 3

CHAPTER REVIEW

REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. As British administrators sought to increase colo-

 nial revenues and tighten administrative control, what might have led them to pursue a less confrontational course with the colonies? What factors do you think are most important in explaining the failure of compromise?

 2. What kinds of provocation caused colonists to riot

 or otherwise act directly, even violently, in defense of their interests? How did common law, Enlightenment, and republican ideas shape their thinking as they took action?

MAKING CONNECTIONS

 as alternatives to independence? Why did Patriots reject them? Consider the events listed under “Work, Exchange, and Technology” and “Politics and Power” for the period 1763– 1776 on the thematic timeline on page 149. How important were the linkages between economic developments and political ones in these years?

THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE
Chapter 4 pre- 
 sented a turbulent era, marked by social and cultural conflict and imperial warfare, during which the regions of British North America were disparate and without unity. Yet by 1776 — only thirteen years after the Treaty of Paris ending the Great War for Empire — thirteen of Britain’s mainland colonies were prepared to unite in a Declaration of Independence. What happened in that intervening time to strengthen and deepen colonists’ sense of common cause? As they drew together to resist imperial authority, what political and cultural resources did they have in common?

MORE TO EXPLORE

 3. What compromises were proposed in the colonies

VISUAL EVIDENCE
Return to the Paul Revere 
 engraving of the Boston Massacre on page 167. This image was an instrument of political propaganda. What features of the image are most important to its political purpose? Consider his depiction of both the soldiers and the townspeople. Look, too, at the buildings surrounding the crowd, especially the Custom House on the right. List the ways in which Revere invokes the idea of tyranny in this image.

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

David Armitage, The Declaration of Independence: A
 Global History (2007). Traces the international impact of the Declaration. Jack P. Greene and J. R. Pole, eds., A Companion to the American Revolution (2000). A useful compendium of short essays on topics related to the Revolution. Woody Holton, Forced Founders (1999). Considers the coming of the Revolution in Virginia.

 Maya Jasanoff, Liberty’s Exiles (2011). A compelling narrative of Loyalist experiences in the Revolution. Andrew O’Shaughnessy, The Men Who Lost America (2013). A British view of the crisis. Liberty! The American Revolution (PBS video) and its companion Web site: pbs.org/ktca/liberty/. A useful overview of the Revolutionary movement.

 CHAPTER 5

 TIMELINE

CHAPTER REVIEW

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.



 Proclamation Line limits white settlement



Sugar Act and Currency Act
 Colonists oppose vice-admiralty courts



 Stamp Act imposes direct tax Quartering Act requires barracks for British troops Stamp Act Congress meets Americans boycott British goods



 First compromise: Stamp Act repealed Declaratory Act passed



 Townshend duties



 Second American boycott



 Second compromise: partial repeal of Townshend Act Boston Massacre



 Committees of correspondence form



 Tea Act leads to Boston Tea Party



 Coercive Acts punish Massachusetts Dunmore’s War against the Shawnees Continental Congress meets Third American boycott



 General Gage marches to Lexington and Concord Second Continental Congress creates Continental army Lord Dunmore recruits Loyalist slaves Patriots invade Canada and skirmish with Loyalists in South Western settlers occupy Kentucky



 Thomas Paine’s Common Sense Declaration of Independence

KEY TURNING POINTS:
The Boston Tea Party (1773), the Coercive Acts (1774), and the first Continental Congress (1774). What did Parliament hope to achieve with the Coercive Acts? How did the decision to convene a continent-wide congress demonstrate the failure of Parliament’s efforts? 




Making War and
Republican Governments
1776–1789


C H A P T E R
THE TRIALS OF WAR, 1776–1778
War in the North Armies and Strategies Victory at Saratoga The Perils of War Financial Crisis Valley Forge 
THE PATH TO VICTORY, 1778–1783
The French Alliance War in the South The Patriot Advantage Diplomatic Triumph 
CREATING REPUBLICAN INSTITUTIONS, 1776–1787
The State Constitutions: How Much Democracy? Women Seek a Public Voice The War’s Losers: Loyalists, Native Americans, and Slaves The Articles of Confederation Shays’s Rebellion 
THE CONSTITUTION OF 1787
The Rise of a Nationalist Faction The Philadelphia Convention The People Debate Ratification 


W


 hen Patriots in Frederick IDENTIFY THE BIG IDEA County, Maryland, demanded How revolutionary was the Amerhis allegiance to their cause in ican Revolution? What political, 1776, Robert Gassaway would have none social, and economic changes did it of it. “It was better for the poor people to produce, and what stayed the same? lay down their arms and pay the duties and taxes laid upon them by King and Parliament than to be brought into slavery and commanded and ordered about [by you],” he told them. The story was much the same in Farmington, Connecticut, where Patriot officials imprisoned Nathaniel Jones and seventeen other men for “remaining neutral.” In Pennsylvania, Quakers accused of Loyalism were rounded up, jailed, and charged with treason, and some were hanged for aiding the British cause. Everywhere, the outbreak of fighting in 1776 forced families to choose the Loyalist or the Patriot side. The Patriots’ control of most local governments gave them an edge in this battle. Patriot leaders organized militia units and recruited volunteers for the Continental army, a ragtag force that surprisingly held its own on the battlefield. “I admire the American troops tremendously!” exclaimed a French officer. “It is incredible that soldiers composed of every age, even children of fifteen, of whites and blacks, almost naked, unpaid, and rather poorly fed, can march so well and withstand fire so steadfastly.” Military service created political commitment, and vice versa. Many Patriot leaders encouraged Americans not only to support the war but also to take an active role in government. As more people did so, their political identities changed. Previously, Americans had lived within a social world dominated by the links of family, kinship, and locality. Now, the abstract bonds of citizenship connected them directly to more distant institutions of government. “From subjects to citizens the difference is immense,” remarked South Carolina Patriot David Ramsay. By repudiating monarchical rule and raising a democratic army, the Patriots launched the age of republican revolutions. Soon republicanism would throw France into turmoil and inspire revolutionaries in Spain’s American colonies. The independence of the Anglo-American colonies, remarked the Venezuelan political leader Francisco de Miranda, who had been in New York and Philadelphia at the end of the American Revolution, “was bound to be . . . the infallible preliminary to our own [independence movement].” The Patriot uprising of 1776 set in motion a process that gradually replaced an Atlantic colonial system that spanned the Americas with an American system of new nations.

 General Washington, 1780 By war’s end, George Washington was a hero on both sides of the

 Atlantic. This engraving, printed in Paris in 1780, shows him with various British bills and declarations in tatters at his feet while he holds copies of the Declaration of Independence and the Treaty of Alliance with France. In the background of this vaguely Orientalized scene, a black slave — presumably William Lee, Washington’s valet and constant companion during the Revolution — saddles his horse. Anne S. K. Brown

Military Collection, Brown University Library.






 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Trials of War, 1776–1778
 The Declaration of Independence appeared just as the British launched a full-scale military assault. For two years, British troops manhandled the Continental army. A few inspiring American victories kept the rebellion alive, but during the winters of 1776 and 1777, the Patriot cause hung in the balance.

 Once the British resorted to military force, few Europeans gave the rebels a chance. The population of Great Britain was 11 million; the colonies, 2.5 million, 20 percent of whom were enslaved Africans. Moreover, the British government had access to the immense wealth generated by the South Atlantic System and the emerging Industrial Revolution. Britain also had the most powerful navy in the world, a standing army of 48,000 Britons plus thousands of German (Hessian) soldiers, and the support of thousands of American Loyalists and powerful Indian coalitions. In the Carolinas, the Cherokees resisted colonists’ demands for their lands by allying with the British, as did four of the six Iroquois nations of New York (Map 6.1). In the Ohio country, Shawnees and their allies, armed by the British, attacked the new Kentucky settlements. By contrast, the Americans were economically and militarily weak. They lacked a strong central government and a reliable source of tax revenue. Their new Continental army, commanded by General George Washington, consisted of 18,000 poorly trained and inexperienced recruits. To demonstrate Britain’s military superiority, the prime minister, Lord North, ordered General William Howe to capture New York City. His strategy was to seize control of the Hudson River and thereby isolate the radical Patriots in New England from the colonies to the south. As the Second Continental Congress declared independence in Philadelphia in July 1776, Howe landed 32,000 troops — British regulars and German mercenaries — outside New York City. In August 1776, UNDERSTAND Howe defeated the Americans in POINTS OF VIEW the Battle of Long Island and Why was control of New forced their retreat to Manhattan York City Britain’s first military objective in the Island. There, Howe outflanked emerging war? Washington’s troops and nearly trapped them. Outgunned and outmaneuvered, the Continental army again retreated, eventually crossing the Hudson River to New Jersey.

Nova
Scotia


MASS. VT. N.H.
o ntari L. O 
L.


War in the North


Halifax


BRITISH CANADA

Boston
NEW YORK

MASS. CONN.

Newport


N


RHODE ISLAND

E


W


 ie Er

S


New York
Philadelphia
 PENNSYLVANIA

NEW JERSEY DELAWARE

ATLANTIC OCEAN

 MARYLAND

 VIRGINIA

Norfolk


NORTH CAROLINA

Wilmington


SOUTH CAROLINA

Savannah




 300 miles 300 kilometers

 Loyalist strongholds Strongly contested areas Indians: Loyalist or neutral Patriot strongholds

Charles Town
 GEORGIA



 A scattering of loyalists could be found in many areas of Patriot strength.

 MAP 6.1 Patriot and Loyalist Strongholds Patriots were in the majority in most of the thirteen mainland colonies and used their control of local governments to funnel men, money, and supplies to the rebel cause. Although Loyalists could be found in every colony, their strongholds were limited to Nova Scotia, eastern New York, New Jersey, and certain areas in the South. However, most Native American peoples favored the British cause and bolstered the power of Loyalist militias in central New York (see Map 6.3) and in the Carolina backcountry.

 By December, the British army had pushed the rebels across New Jersey and over the Delaware River into Pennsylvania. From the Patriots’ perspective, winter came just in time. Following eighteenth-century custom, the British halted their military campaign for the cold months, allowing the Americans to catch them off guard. On Christmas night 1776, Washington crossed the Delaware River and staged a successful surprise attack on Trenton, New Jersey, where he forced the surrender of 1,000 German soldiers. In early January 1777, the Continental army won a small victory at nearby Princeton (Map 6.2). But these minor triumphs could

 CHAPTER 6

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789


 American forces



Montreal
'Fort St. John


 British forces



 30 kilometers



NEW YORK

NEW YORK

CONN. PENNSYLVANIA

Kingston '
Oct. 15
Fort Montgomery
Oct. 6 '
West
R.
Point  a nn a eh

Su s


 qu

R.


'Bennington
Aug.15


 MASS.

 CONN.

(


NEW JERSEY

NEW HAMPSHIRE

R.I.


New York


R.


Germantown
Oct. 4 '
Brandywine Creek
'
Philadelphia
Sept. 11


 re la wa

D


 e

(


R.




Fort
Burgoyne
 Stanwix surrenders Saratoga ' Oct. 17 ' Oriskany Aug. 6 Albany Fort Herkimer

(




 30 miles

Hudso n R.




'Fort Ticonderoga
Connectic
 ut

(


Fort
Oswego


 MAINE

 VERMONT

Housatoni
 c R.

Lake Ontario


Burgoyne


BR ITIS H

Lake
Huron


 n R.

 British victory

NEW JERSEY

Morristown


Fort Lee
''


White Plains
' Oct. 28–Nov. 1


' Princeton
Jan. 3, 1777


'
Trenton
Dec. 26, 1776


E


W
S


 DEL.

Harlem
Heights


' Long Island
Aug. 27–30


N


 MARYLAND

Chesapeake
Bay


Ho
 we

'


 CANADA nce R. r re ge aw . L t. Le t S S

Hu ds o


 American victory

Delaware


'


ATLANTIC OCEAN

ATLANTIC OCEAN





 100 miles 100 kilometers

 MAP 6.2 The War in the North, 1776–1777 In 1776, the British army drove Washington’s forces across New Jersey into Pennsylvania. The Americans counterattacked successfully at Trenton and Princeton and then set up winter headquarters in Morristown. In 1777, British forces stayed on the offensive. General Howe attacked the Patriot capital, Philadelphia, from the south and captured it in early October. Meanwhile, General Burgoyne and Colonel St. Leger launched simultaneous invasions from Canada. With the help of thousands of New England militiamen, American troops commanded by General Horatio Gates defeated Burgoyne in August at Bennington, Vermont, and in October at Saratoga, New York, the military turning point in the war.

 not mask British military superiority. “These are the times,” wrote Thomas Paine, “that try men’s souls.”

Armies and Strategies
 Thanks in part to General Howe, the rebellion survived. Howe had opposed the Coercive Acts of 1774 and still hoped for a political compromise. So he did not try to destroy the American army but instead tried to show its weakness and persuade the Continental

 Congress to give up the struggle. Howe’s restrained tactics cost Britain the opportunity to nip the rebellion in the bud. For his part, Washington acted cautiously to avoid a major defeat: “On our Side the War should be defensive,” he told Congress. His strategy was to draw the British away from the seacoast, extend their lines of supply, and sap their morale. Congress had promised Washington a regular force of 75,000 men, but the Continental army never reached even a third of that number. Yeomen, refusing to be





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Battle of Princeton
 Black smoke from burning buildings partially obscures the sun as the muzzle flash from an American cannon lights up the battlefield. Pursued by Cornwallis after his surprise attack and victory at nearby Trenton, Washington (on horseback to the right of the flag) confronted three regiments of redcoats at Princeton. The Americans had an advantage in numbers and put the British to flight, but only after withstanding the bayonet charge depicted in the right-center of William Mercer’s painting. Courtesy of the Historical Society of Pennsylvania Collection Atwater Kent Museum of Philadelphia.

 “Haras’d with callouts” that took them away from their families and farms, would serve only in local militias. When the Virginia gentry imposed a military draft and three years of service on propertyless men — the “Lazy fellows who lurk about and are pests to Society” — they resisted so fiercely that the legislature had to pay them substantial bounties and agree to shorter terms of service. The IDENTIFY CAUSES Continental soldiers recruited in What factors made it difMaryland by General William ficult for the Continental Congress to create an Smallwood were poor American effective army? youths and older foreign-born men, often British ex-convicts and former indentured servants. Most enlisted for the $20 cash bonus (about $2,000 today) and the promise of 100 acres of land. Molding such recruits into an effective fighting force was nearly impossible. Inexperienced soldiers panicked in the face of British attacks; thousands deserted, unwilling to submit to the discipline of military life. The soldiers who stayed resented the contempt

 their officers had for the “camp followers,” the women who made do with the meager supplies provided to feed and care for the troops. General Philip Schuyler of New York complained that his troops were “destitute of provisions, without camp equipage, with little ammunition, and not a single piece of cannon.” The Continental army was not only poorly supplied but was also held in suspicion by Radical Whig Patriots, who believed that a standing army was a threat to liberty. Even in wartime, they preferred militias to a professional fighting force. Given these handicaps, Washington and his army were fortunate to have escaped an overwhelming defeat.

Victory at Saratoga
 After Howe failed to achieve an overwhelming victory, Lord North and his colonial secretary, Lord George Germain, launched another major military campaign in 1777. Isolating New England remained the primary goal. To achieve it, Germain planned a three-pronged

 CHAPTER 6

 attack converging on Albany, New York. General John Burgoyne would lead a large contingent of regulars south from Quebec, Colonel Barry St. Leger and a force of Iroquois would attack from the west, and General Howe would lead troops north from New York City. Howe instead decided to attack Philadelphia, the home of the Continental Congress, hoping to end the rebellion with a single decisive blow. But instead of marching quickly across New Jersey, Howe loaded his troops onto boats and sailed up the Chesapeake Bay to attack Philadelphia from the south. The plan worked. Howe’s troops easily outflanked the American positions along Brandywine Creek in Delaware and, in late September, marched triumphantly into Philadelphia. However, the capture of the rebels’ capital did not end the uprising; the Continental Congress, determined to continue the struggle, fled to the countryside. Howe’s slow campaign against Philadelphia contributed to the defeat of Burgoyne’s army at Saratoga. Burgoyne’s troops had at first advanced quickly, overwhelming the American defenses at Fort Ticonderoga in early July and driving south toward the Hudson River. Then they stalled. Burgoyne — nicknamed “Gentleman Johnny” — was used to high living and had fought in Europe in a leisurely fashion; believing his large army would easily dominate the rebels, he stopped early each day to pitch comfortable tents and eat elaborate dinners with his officers. The American troops led by General Horatio Gates also slowed Burgoyne’s progress by felling huge trees in his path and raiding British supply lines to Canada. At summer’s end, Burgoyne’s army of 6,000 British and German troops and 600 Loyalists and Indians was stuck near Saratoga, New York. Desperate for food and horses, in August the British raided nearby Bennington, Vermont, but were beaten back by 2,000 American militiamen. Patriot forces in the Mohawk Valley also threw St. Leger and the Iroquois into retreat. Making matters worse, the British commander in New York City recalled 4,000 troops he had sent toward Albany and ordered them to Philadelphia to bolster Howe’s force. While Burgoyne waited in vain for help, thousands of Patriot militiamen from Massachusetts, New Hampshire, and New York joined Gates, blocking Burgoyne in a series of skirmishes that finally gave the British no avenue of escape. The Patriots “swarmed around the army like birds of prey,” reported an English sergeant, and in October 1777, they forced Burgoyne to surrender. The victory at Saratoga was the turning point of the war. The Patriots captured more than 5,000 British

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789


Joseph Brant
 Mohawk chief Thayendanegea, known to whites as Joseph Brant, was a devout member of the Church of England and helped to translate the Bible into the Mohawk language. Brant persuaded four of the six Iroquois nations to support Britain in the war. In 1778 and 1779, he led Iroquois warriors and Tory rangers in devastating attacks on American settlements in the Wyoming Valley of Pennsylvania and Cherry Valley in New York. In this 1797 portrait, artist Charles Willson Peale has portrayed Brant with European features. Independence National Historic Park.

 troops and ensured the diplomatic success of American representatives in Paris, who won a military alliance with France.

The Perils of War
 The Patriots’ triumph at Saratoga was tempered by wartime difficulties. A British naval blockade cut off supplies of European manufactures and disrupted the New England fishing industry; meanwhile, the British occupation of Boston, New York, and Philadelphia reduced trade. As Patriots, along with unemployed artisans and laborers, moved to the countryside, New York City’s population declined from 21,000 to 10,000. The British blockade cut tobacco exports in the Chesapeake, so planters grew grain to sell to the contending armies. All across the land, farmers and artisans adapted to a war economy. With goods now scarce, governments requisitioned military supplies directly from the people. In 1776, Connecticut officials asked the citizens of Hartford to





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

American Militiamen
 Beset by continuing shortages of cloth, the Patriot army dressed in a variety of uniforms and fabrics. This German engraving, taken from a drawing by a Hessian officer, shows two American militiamen (one of them barefoot) wearing hunting shirts and trousers made of ticking, the strong linen fabric often used to cover mattresses and pillows. Anne S. K. Brown Military Collection, Brown University.

 provide 1,000 coats and 1,600 shirts, and soldiers echoed their pleas. After losing all his shirts “except the one on my back” in the Battle of Long Island, Captain Edward Rogers told his wife that “the making of Cloath . . . must go on.” Patriot women responded; in Elizabeth, New Jersey, they promised “upwards of 100,000 yards of linnen and woolen cloth.” Other women assumed the burdens of farmwork while their men were away at war and acquired a taste for decision making. “We have sow’d our oats as you desired,” Sarah Cobb Paine wrote to her absent husband. “Had I been master I should have planted it to Corn.” Their selfesteem boosted by wartime activities, some women expected greater legal rights in the new republican society. Still, goods remained scarce and pricey. Hardpressed consumers assailed shopkeepers as “enemies, extortioners, and monopolizers” and called for government regulation. But when the New England states imposed price ceilings in 1777, many farmers and

 artisans refused to sell their goods. Ultimately, a government official admitted, consumers had to pay the higher market prices “or submit to starving.” The fighting endangered tens of thousands of civilians. A British officer, Lord Rawdon, favored giving “free liberty to the soldiers to ravage [the country] at will, that these infatuated creatures may feel what a calamity war is.” As British and American armies marched back and forth across New Jersey, they forced Patriot and Loyalist families to flee their homes to escape arrest — or worse. Soldiers and partisans looted farms, and disorderly troops harassed and raped women and girls. “An army, even a friendly one, are a dreadful scourge to any people,” wrote one Connecticut soldier. “You cannot imagine what devastation and distress mark their steps.” The war divided many farm communities. Patriots formed committees of safety to collect taxes and seized the property of those who refused to pay. “Every Body submitted to our Sovereign Lord the Mob,” lamented a Loyalist preacher. In parts of Maryland, the number of “nonassociators” — those who refused to join either side — was so large that they successfully defied Patriot mobs. “Stand off you dammed rebel sons of bitches,” shouted Robert Davis of Anne Arundel County, “I will shoot you if you come any nearer.”

Financial Crisis
 Such defiance exposed the weakness of Patriot governments. Most states were afraid to raise taxes, so officials issued bonds to secure gold or silver from wealthy individuals. When those funds ran out, individual states financed the war by issuing so much paper money — some $260 million all told — that it lost worth, and most people refused to accept it at face value. In North Carolina, even tax collectors eventually rejected the state’s currency. The finances of the Continental Congress collapsed, too, despite the efforts of Philadelphia merchant Robert Morris, the government’s chief treasury official. Because the Congress lacked the authority to impose taxes, Morris relied on funds requisitioned from the states, but the states paid late or not at all. So Morris secured loans from France and Holland and sold Continental loan certificates to some thirteen thousand firms and individuals. All the while, the Congress was issuing paper money — some $200 million between 1776 and 1779 — which, like state currencies, quickly fell in value. In 1778, a family needed $7 in Continental bills to buy goods worth $1 in gold or silver. As the exchange rate deteriorated — to 42 to 1 in

 CHAPTER 6

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789


Paper Currency
 Testifying to their independent status, the new state governments printed their own currencies. Rejecting the English system of pounds and shillings, Virginia used the Spanish gold dollar as its basic unit of currency, although the equivalent in English pounds is also shown. Initially, $1,200 was equal to £360 — a ratio of 3.3 to 1. By 1781, Virginia had printed so much paper money to pay its soldiers and wartime expenses that the value of its currency had depreciated. It now took $40 in Virginia currency to buy the same amount of goods as £1 sterling. The American Numismatic Society.

 1779, 100 to 1 in 1780, and 146 to 1 in 1781 — it sparked social upheaval. In Boston, a mob of women accosted merchant Thomas Boyleston, “seazd him by his Neck,” and forced him to sell his wares at traditional prices. In rural Ulster County, New York, women told the committee of safety to lower food prices or “their husbands and sons shall fight no more.” As morale crumbled, Patriot leaders feared the rebellion would collapse.

Valley Forge
 Fears reached their peak during the winter of 1777. While Howe’s army lived comfortably in Philadelphia, Washington’s army retreated 20 miles to Valley Forge, where 12,000 soldiers and hundreds of camp followers suffered horribly. “The army . . . now begins to grow sickly,” a surgeon confided to his diary. “Poor food — hard lodging — cold weather — fatigue — nasty clothes — nasty cookery. . . . Why are we sent here to starve and freeze?” Nearby farmers refused to help. Some were pacifists, Quakers and German sectarians unwilling to support either side. Others looked out for their own families, selling grain for gold from British quartermasters but refusing depreciated Continental currency. “Such a dearth of public spirit, and want of public virtue,” lamented Washington. By spring, more than 200 officers had resigned, 1,000 hungry soldiers had deserted, and another 3,000 had died from malnutrition and disease. That winter at Valley Forge took as many American lives as had two years of fighting. In this dark hour, Baron von Steuben raised the readiness of the American army. A former Prussian military officer, von Steuben was one of a handful of republican-minded foreign aristocrats who joined the American cause. Appointed as inspector general of the

 Continental army, he instituted a strict drill system and encouraged officers to become more professional. Thanks to von Steuben, the smaller army that emerged from Valley Forge in the spring of 1778 was a much tougher and better-disciplined force.

The Path to Victory,
1778–1783
 Wars are often won by astute diplomacy, and so it was with the War of Independence. The Patriots’ prospects improved dramatically in 1778, when the Continental Congress concluded a military alliance with France, the most powerful nation in Europe. The alliance gave the Americans desperately needed money, supplies, and, eventually, troops. And it confronted Britain with an international war that challenged its domination of the Atlantic and Indian oceans.

The French Alliance
 France and America were unlikely partners. France was Catholic and a monarchy; the United States was Protestant and a federation of republics. From 1689 to 1763, the two peoples had been enemies: New Englanders had brutally uprooted the French population from Acadia (Nova Scotia) in 1755, and the French and their Indian allies had raided British settlements. But the Comte de Vergennes, the French foreign minister, was determined to avenge the loss of Canada during the Great War for Empire (see Chapter 4) and persuaded King Louis XVI to provide the rebellious colonies with a secret loan and much-needed gunpowder. When





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 news of the rebel victory at Saratoga reached Paris in December 1777, Vergennes sought a formal alliance. Benjamin Franklin and other American diplomats craftily exploited France’s rivalry with Britain to win an explicit commitment to American independence. The Treaty of Alliance of February 1778 specified that once France entered the war, neither partner would sign a separate peace without the “liberty, sovereignty, and independence” of the United States. In return, the Continental Congress agreed to recognize any French conquests in the West Indies. “France and America,” warned Britain’s Lord Stormont, “were indissolubly leagued for our destruction.” The alliance gave new life to the Patriots’ cause. “There has been a great change in this state since the news from France,” a Patriot soldier reported from Pennsylvania. Farmers — “mercenary wretches,” he called them — “were as eager for Continental Money now as they were a few weeks ago for British gold.” Its confidence bolstered, the Continental Congress addressed the demands of the officer corps. Most officers were gentlemen who equipped themselves and raised volunteers; in return, they insisted on lifetime military pensions at half pay. John Adams condemned the officers for “scrambling for rank and pay like apes for nuts,” but General Washington urged the Congress to grant the pensions: “The salvation of the cause depends upon it.” The Congress reluctantly granted the officers half pay, but only for seven years. Meanwhile, the war had become unpopular in Britain. At first, George III was determined to crush the rebellion. If America won independence, he warned Lord North, “the West Indies must follow them. Ireland would soon follow the same plan and be a separate state, then this island would be reduced to itself, and soon would be a poor island indeed.” Stunned by the defeat at Saratoga, EXPLAIN however, the king changed his CONSEQUENCES mind. To thwart an American alliWhat were the most ance with France, he authorized important results of the Patriot victory at Saratoga? North to seek a negotiated settlement. In February 1778, North persuaded Parliament to repeal the Tea and Prohibitory Acts and, amazingly, to renounce its power to tax the colonies. But the Patriots, now allied with France and committed to independence, rejected North’s overture.

War in the South
 The French alliance did not bring a rapid end to the war. When France entered the conflict in June 1778, it hoped to seize all of Britain’s sugar islands. Spain,

 which joined the war against Britain in 1779, aimed to regain Florida and the fortress of Gibraltar at the entrance to the Mediterranean Sea.

 Britain’s Southern Strategy For its part, the British government revised its military strategy to defend the West Indies and capture the rich tobacco- and ricegrowing colonies: Virginia, the Carolinas, and Georgia. Once conquered, the ministry planned to use the Scottish Highlanders in the Carolinas and other Loyalists to hold them. It had already mobilized the Cherokees and Delawares against the land-hungry Americans and knew that the Patriots’ fears of slave uprisings weakened them militarily (Map 6.3). As South Carolina Patriots admitted to the Continental Congress, they could raise only a few recruits “by reason of the great proportion of citizens necessary to remain at home to prevent insurrection among the Negroes.” The large number of slaves in the South made the Revolution a “triangular war,” in which African Americans constituted a strategic problem for Patriots and a tempting, if dangerous, opportunity for the British. Britain actively recruited slaves to its cause. The effort began with Dunmore’s controversial proclamation in November 1775 recruiting slaves to his Ethiopian Regiment (see Chapter 5). In 1779, the Philipsburg Proclamation declared that any slave who deserted a rebel master would receive protection, freedom, and land from Great Britain. Together, these proclamations led some 30,000 African Americans to take refuge behind British lines. George Washington initially barred blacks from the Continental army, but he relented in 1777. By war’s end, African Americans could enlist in every state but South Carolina and Georgia, and some 5,000 — slave and free — fought for the Patriot cause (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 192). It fell to Sir Henry Clinton — acutely aware of the role slaves might play — to implement Britain’s southern strategy. From the British army’s main base in New York City, Clinton launched a seaborne attack on Savannah, Georgia. Troops commanded by Colonel Archibald Campbell captured the town in December 1778. Mobilizing hundreds of blacks to transport supplies, Campbell moved inland and captured Augusta early in 1779. By year’s end, Clinton’s forces and local Loyalists controlled coastal Georgia and had 10,000 troops poised for an assault on South Carolina. In 1780, British forces marched from victory to victory (Map 6.4). In May, Clinton forced the surrender of Charleston, South Carolina, and its garrison of 5,000 troops. Then Lord Charles Cornwallis assumed control of the British forces and, at Camden, defeated an

 CHAPTER 6

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789


 MAP 6.3 American forces

(


, 1779


 d dhea Bro y R.

 hR

 g

 hen

 i Leh

(Ft. Augusta


.
 na R han qu e Su s

Al
 le g

( Wilkes-Barre
.


R.


 l R.

.
Minisink


Wa
 llki l

Cr
.
 h

.


.


TS. YM

EN GH

( West Point
(


 CONN.

 n R.

Fren
 c

W B
Kingston  st Ea

Del




Forty Ft.


 r.

 American force commanded by General Horatio Gates, the hero of Saratoga. Only 1,200 Patriot militiamen joined Gates at Camden, a fifth of the number at Saratoga. Cornwallis took control of South Carolina, and hundreds of African Americans fled to freedom behind British lines. The southern strategy was working. Then the tide of battle turned. Thanks to another republican-minded European aristocrat, the Marquis de Lafayette, France finally dispatched troops to the American mainland. A longtime supporter of the American cause, Lafayette persuaded King Louis XVI to send General Comte de Rochambeau and 5,500 men

( (Ft. Anne


 r.

 r

(


 tB

Pittsburgh


Pot
 om ac

May
–J
 ul

 nt

Newtown
%%
Aug. 29, 1779 '
Ft. Sullivan
Tioga%
S ul
 liva n, 1

W es


( Ft. Kittanning


 100 kilometers



Hu d s o


 % Catherine’s Town

 est B

NEW YORK
Unadilla % on, 
I R O Q U O I S


 PENNSYLVANIA

 100 miles

(
(


.


Venango




R


R
 ar e aw

 eR e se

%Conewango


Old Fort


Ft. Stanwix
Ft. Dayton
 ohawk R. Schenectady M Oneida % Canajonarie Ft. Herkimer % Onondaga Cherry SchoharieAlbany Valley MASS.

Chemung


 n Ge

 ie Er ke La

Monongah
 ela R

 i R. M



(Ft. Oswego


Cayuga
Canadasaga
Canandaigua % % %


Genesee %
Castle


S


.


Ft. George


( Ft. Niagara


E


 dy R

 VIRGINIA

 50 miles

N


 an

Boonesborough




 50 kilometers

( Redstone


R.
 ha

( Ft. Massac


 gS

.


(Louisville)




Pittsburgh


Kan
 aw gR .

Bi


 yR

(Ft. Nelson


(


(Ft. Randolph


Lic
 ki n

 Harrod’s Town en R. Gre

Lake Ontario


W


 ck ntu Ke

Kask
 ask ia

R.


R.


 ia m

 W a bash R.

.


Illin
 o pi



.


 ip



 mR

 i ss



(


Oh i o R.


 ( Ft. McIntosh

Ft. Henry


 SHAWNEE y

C l ar k


Vincennes
(Ft. Sackville)
17, 1778
'Dec.
Feb. 25, 1779


 rk Cla 79 b. e F

Ft. Jefferson


 ng u ski Mu

V i r g i n i a


.
 to R

R
 is

Sci o


 MIAMI

 b y

 PENNSYLVANIA

 DE

 c.

(


C l a i m e d


Misso u r i R .
Cahokia
July 9, 1778
Prairie
 du Rocher Kaskaskia July 4, 1778

LAW AR

R. HURON
e . ee –D eR . m e k t u a c Ma O Ka n k Ft. Miami n, i l to Oct. 24, 1778 Ham 
S


A


E


St


( Ft. St. Joseph


E


W


 LE

N


 ie Er ke

 ny

La


 ghe

(


 hR osep . .J

 ll e

Ft. Detroit


Lake
Michigan


 AL

 ' American victory

Miss


 Many Indian peoples remained neutral, but others, fearing land-hungry Patriot farmers, used British-supplied guns to raid American settlements. To thwart attacks by militant Shawnees, Cherokees, and Delawares, a Patriot militia led by George Rogers Clark captured the British fort and supply depot at Vincennes on the Wabash River in February 1779. To the north, Patriot generals John Sullivan and James Clinton defeated proBritish Indian forces near Tioga (on the New York–Pennsylvania border) in August 1779 and then systematically destroyed villages and crops throughout the lands of the Iroquois.

 OTTAWA

 British forces

Cl
 i

Native Americans and the
War in the West, 1778–1779


Stony
Point


Morristown


New
York


Easton


 American forces ' American victory % Indian village ( British forts Tory and Indian raids

 to Newport, Rhode Island, in 1780. There, they threatened the British forces holding New York City.

Guerrilla Warfare in the Carolinas Meanwhile,
 Washington dispatched General Nathanael Greene to recapture the Carolinas, where he found “a country that has been ravaged and plundered by both friends and enemies.” Greene put local militiamen, who had been “without discipline and addicted to plundering,” under strong leaders and unleashed them on less mobile British forces. In October 1780, Patriot militia defeated a regiment of Loyalists at King’s Mountain, South Carolina, taking about one thousand prisoners.



THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN
The Black Soldier’s Dilemma 
 For African American slaves, the Revolution offered no clear path to freedom. Some slaves agreed to fight for Britain because of its promise to liberate slaves who fought against their masters. While some were freed, many others died fighting, were forced into servitude in the army, or even sold into slavery in the West Indies. Patriots at first refused the service of black soldiers, then enlisted them in small numbers, but always upheld the property rights of masters.

 1. Dunmore’s Proclamation, 1775. Virginia’s Governor Dunmore issued this proclamation in response to the emerging rebellion and formed his recruits into the so-called Ethiopian Regiment.

 To defeat such unreasonable Purposes . . . that the Peace, and good Order of this Colony may be again restored . . . I have thought fit to issue this my Proclamation, hereby declaring, that until the aforesaid good Purposes can be obtained, I do in Virtue of the Power and Authority to me given, by His majesty, determine to execute Martial Law, and cause the same to be executed throughout this Colony: and to the end that Peace and good Order may the sooner be [effected], I do require every Person capable of bearing Arms, to [resort] to His majesty’s standard, or be looked upon as Traitors to His [majesty] . . . I do hereby further declare all indentured Servants, Negroes, or others, (appertaining to Rebels,) free that are able and willing to bear Arms, they joining His majesty’s Troops as soon as may be, for the more speedily reducing this Colony to a proper Sense of their Duty. 2. Virginia’s response to Dunmore’s Proclamation, 1775. A month later, Virginia’s General Assembly issued the following response.

 WHEREAS lord Dunmore, by his proclamation, dated on board the ship William, off Norfolk, the 7th day of November 1775, hath offered freedom to such ablebodied slaves as are willing to join him, and take up arms, against the good people of this colony, giving thereby encouragement to a general insurrection . . . it is enacted, that all negro or other slaves, conspiring to rebel or make insurrection, shall suffer death. . . . We think it proper to declare, that all slaves who have been, or shall be seduced, by his lordship’s proclamation, or other arts, to desert their masters’ service, and take up arms against the inhabitants of this colony, shall be liable to such punishment as shall hereafter be directed by the General Convention. . . . [A]ll such, who have taken this unlawful and wicked step, may return in safety to their duty, and escape the punishment due their crimes. . . . And we do

 farther earnestly recommend it to all humane and benevolent persons in this colony to explain and make known this our offer of mercy to those unfortunate people. 3. Runaway advertisement, 1775. Titus — or, as he was later known, Captain Tye of the Ethiopian Regiment — abandoned his Delaware master in response to Dunmore’s Proclamation.

Source: Courtesy American Antiquarian Society.


 4. Report of Bernardo de Gálvez, 1780. Fighting against the British in support of the Patriots, Louisiana governor Bernardo de Gálvez raised a mixed regiment, almost half of whom were slaves and free people of color from New Orleans. He praised their efforts in this report of his campaign.

 No less deserving of eulogy are the companies of Negroes and free Mulattoes who were continually occupied in the outposts, in false attacks, and discoveries, exchanging shots with the enemy . . . conduct[ing] themselves with as much valor and generosity as the whites. 5. Boston King gains his freedom, 1783. In 1780, Boston King, like many other southern slaves, escaped to the British army. Here he describes his experiences at war’s end.

 About this time, peace was restored between America and Great Britain which diffused universal joy among all

 parties except us, who had escaped slavery and taken refuge in the English army; for a report prevailed at NewYork that all the slaves, in number two thousand, were to be delivered up to their masters, altho’ some of them had been three or four years among the English. This dreadful rumour filled us with inexpressible anguish and terror, especially when we saw our old masters coming from Virginia, North-Carolina and other parts and seizing upon slaves in the streets of New-York, or even dragging them out of their beds. Many of the slaves had very cruel masters, so that the thought of returning home with them embittered life to us. For some days we lost our appetite for food, and sleep departed from our eyes. The English had compassion upon us in the day of our distress, and issued out a Proclamation importing “That all slaves should be free who had taken refuge in the British lines and claimed the sanction and privileges of the Proclamations respecting the security and protection of Negroes.” In consequence of this, each of us received a certificate from the commanding officer at New-York, which dispelled our fears and filled us with joy and gratitude. 6. Jehu Grant is re-enslaved, 1778. Jehu Grant of Narragansett, Rhode Island, was owned by a Loyalist. In August 1777 he escaped and joined the Patriot side; ten months later, his master tracked him down and reclaimed him. In 1837 Grant applied for a pension from the U.S. government and supplied the following narrative of his experience. His application was denied.

 [I] enlisted as a soldier but was put to the service of a teamster in the summer and a waiter in the winter . . . I was then grown to manhood, in the full vigor and strength of life, and heard much about the cruel and arbitrary things done by the British. Their ships lay within a few miles of my master’s house, which stood near the shore, and I was confident that my master traded with them, and I suffered much from fear that I should be sent aboard a ship of war. This I disliked. But when I saw liberty poles and the people all engaged for the support of freedom, I could not but like and be pleased with such thing (God forgive me if I sinned in so feeling). And living on the borders of Rhode Island, where whole

 companies of colored people enlisted, it added to my fears and dread of being sold to the British. These considerations induced me to enlist into the American army, where I served faithful about ten months, when my master found and took me home. Had I been taught to read or understand the precepts of the Gospel, “Servants obey your master,” I might have done otherwise, notwithstanding the songs of liberty that saluted my ear, thrilled through my heart. Sources: (1) Lord Dunmore’s Proclamation, Learn NC, North Carolina Digital History “Revolutionary North Carolina,” www.learnnc.org; (2) J. N. Brenaman, A History of Virginia Conventions (Richmond: J. L. Hill Printing Company, 1902), p. 30; (4) Thomas Truxtun Moebs, Black Soldiers-Black Sailors-Black Ink: Research Guide on African-Americans in U. S. Military History, 1526–1900 (Chesapeake Bay, Paris: Moebs Publishing Company, 1994), 1125; (5) Boston King, Book of Negroes (New York, 1783), in Simon Schama, Rough Crossings: Britain, the Slaves and the American Revolution (New York: HarperCollins, 2006), 107, 150; (6) Jehu Grant, To Hon. J. L. Edwards, Commissioner of Pension, 1836, in The Revolution Remembered: Eyewitness Accounts of the War for Independence, ed. John C. Dann (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1980), 27–28.

ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1.
Why was Dunmore willing to offer freedom to slaves (source 1) when they were a recognized form of property under the British Empire? What assumptions about the loyalties of slaves underlie the response of the Virginia assembly (source 2)? 2. Why might Louisiana governor Bernardo de Gálvez (source 4) have made a point of praising the contributions of black soldiers to the Patriot cause? 3. Compare the runaway ad for Titus (source 3) and the narratives of Boston King and Jehu Grant (sources 5 and 6). What goals did British officers hope to achieve in their relations with slaves? What Patriot values trumped slaves’ individual liberties during and after the war? 
PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
Considering these sources along with the chapter contents and what you’ve learned in class, write a short essay that explains how the presence of slaves created a “triangular war” in the South, assesses the choices that individual slaves had to make during the Revolution, and considers how the differences in the institution of slavery between northern and southern colonies shaped slaves’ experiences in the war. 


 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 in e

R.
 es

AI NT U

O


Yorktown
Oct. 1781


G


17 81


,


 li s

 allis,

C o rnw






,1




Fo
 rc e



.


 on

R
 ah

 rn

 is,

 si

 al

 nn va

Co


 ll wa

)


Wilmington


 a tigu An om ( Fr

.


SOUTH CAROLINA

Charleston '
May 1780


 GEORGIA

7 81


R.


Aug. 1780


 e

R
 ar

 e nte Sa

' Camden


 d, 1

,1
 es t Ga

NORTH CAROLINA

(From West Indies)


'


Kings Mt.
Oct. 1780


F
Cape


'


Sa


Guilford Court House


 w 8 rn 0 – Co 17 8 Charlotte

Cowpens
Jan. 1781


Augusta


' March 1781


H oo


E




U


ATL A N T I C O C E AN

 e,

 BL

 s,

De
 ss

M


'


 VIRGINIA

 ra

 an

E


W
S


Richmond


 ene Gre

E


Chesapeake
Bay


G


Mo
 rg

D
 RI

N


 te

Ja
 m

Charlottesville


 JERSEY

 DELAWARE

 et ay

Pro
 cl a ma t io

R.


 n hi as W

L af


 nL

 n

 ha

R.


Ka


 aw

 MARYLAND

 n, o gt NEW

Ba


 ac om

Po
 t

 of 1 763

 100 kilometers

Rochambeau


O


 rra

York


G ra
 ve s -H

 100 miles

 NS



Philadelphia


R.




 h io



.


 PENNSYLVANIA

 British victory

New York




 American victory

NEW YORK

.


 ood,

 French forces

'
'




Su


 British forces

 aR



 ann ueh sq

Delaware R


 American forces





B


 is r it

 h

 va In

Savannah
Dec. 1778 '


 MAP 6.4 The War in the South, 1778–1781 Britain’s southern military strategy started well. British forces captured Savannah in December 1778, took control of Georgia during 1779, and vanquished Charleston in May 1780. Over the next eighteen months, brutal warfare between the British troops and Loyalist units and the Continental army and militia raged in the interior of the Carolinas and ended in a stalemate. Hoping to break the deadlock, British general Charles Cornwallis carried the battle into Virginia in 1781. A FrancoAmerican army led by Washington and Lafayette, with the help of the French fleet under Admiral de Grasse, surrounded Cornwallis’s forces on the Yorktown Peninsula and forced their surrender.

 American guerrillas commanded by the “Swamp Fox,” General Francis Marion, also won a series of small but fierce battles. Then, in January 1781, General Daniel Morgan led an American force to a bloody victory at Cowpens, South Carolina. In March, Greene’s soldiers fought Cornwallis’s seasoned army to a draw at North Carolina’s Guilford Court House. Weakened by this

 war of attrition, the British general decided to concede the Carolinas to Greene and seek a decisive victory in Virginia. There, many Patriot militiamen had refused to take up arms, claiming that “the Rich wanted the Poor to fight for them.” Exploiting these social divisions, Cornwallis moved easily through the Tidewater region of Virginia in the

 CHAPTER 6

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789




Francis Marion Crossing the Pedee River
 Francis Marion was a master of the ferocious guerrilla fighting that characterized the war in South Carolina. Though Patriot general Horatio Gates had little confidence in him, Marion led an irregular militia brigade in several successful attacks. After chasing Marion into a swamp, British general Banastre Tarleton declared, “As for this damned old fox, the Devil himself could not catch him.” Soon Patriots began calling Marion the Swamp Fox. In 1851, William T. Ranney painted Marion (on horseback in a white shirt and blue coat) and his men crossing the Pedee River in flatboats. Ranney included an unidentified (and possibly fictionalized) black oarsman. Amon Carter Museum, Fort Worth, Texas, William T. Ranney (1813–1857). Marion Crossing the Peedee, oil on canvas, 1850.

 early summer of 1781. Reinforcements sent from New York and commanded by General Benedict Arnold, the infamous Patriot traitor, bolstered his ranks. As Arnold and Cornwallis sparred with an American force led by Lafayette near the York Peninsula, Washington was informed that France had finally sent its powerful West Indian fleet to North America, and he devised an audacious plan. Feigning an assault on New York City, he secretly marched General Rochambeau’s army from Rhode Island to Virginia. Simultaneously, the French fleet took control of Chesapeake Bay. By the time the British discovered Washington’s scheme, Cornwallis was surrounded, his 9,500-man army outnumbered 2 to 1 on land and cut off from reinforcement or retreat by sea. In a hopeless position, Cornwallis surrendered at Yorktown in October 1781. The Franco-American victory broke the resolve of the British government. “Oh God! It is all over!” Lord

 North exclaimed. Isolated diplomatically in Europe, stymied militarily in America, and lacking public support at home, the British ministry gave up active prosecution of the war on the American mainland.

IDENTIFY CAUSES
What were the keys to the Patriot victory in the South? 
The Patriot Advantage
 How could mighty Britain, victorious in the Great War for Empire, lose to a motley rebel army? The British ministry pointed to a series of blunders by the military leadership. Why had Howe not ruthlessly pursued Washington’s army in 1776? Why had Howe and Burgoyne failed to coordinate their attacks in 1777? Why had Cornwallis marched deep into the Patriotdominated state of Virginia in 1781?



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 Historians acknowledge British mistakes, but they also attribute the rebels’ victory to French aid and the inspired leadership of George Washington. Astutely deferring to elected officials, Washington won the support of the Continental Congress and the state governments. Confident of his military abilities, he pursued a defensive TRACE CHANGE strategy that minimized casualties OVER TIME and maintained the morale of his Despite being at a clear disadvantage at the start officers and soldiers through five of the war, the American difficult years of war. Moreover, the Patriots won. Why? Patriots’ control of local governments gave Washington a greater margin for error than the British generals had. Local militiamen provided the edge in the 1777 victory at Saratoga and forced Cornwallis from the Carolinas in 1781. In the end, it was the American people who decided the outcome, especially the one-third of the white colonists who were zealous Patriots. Tens of thousands of these farmers and artisans accepted Continental bills in payment for supplies, and thousands of soldiers took them as pay, even as the currency literally depreciated in their pockets. Rampant inflation meant that every paper dollar held for a week lost value, imposing a hidden “currency tax” on those who accepted the paper currency. Each individual tax was small — a few pennies on each dollar. But as millions of dollars changed hands multiple times, the currency taxes paid by ordinary citizens financed the American military victory.

Diplomatic Triumph
 After Yorktown, diplomats took two years to conclude a peace treaty. Talks began in Paris in April 1782, but the French and Spanish, still hoping to seize a West Indian island or Gibraltar, stalled for time. Their tactics infuriated American diplomats Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John Jay. So the Americans negotiated secretly with the British, prepared if necessary to ignore the Treaty of Alliance and sign a separate peace. British ministers were equally eager: Parliament wanted peace, and they feared the loss of a rich sugar island. Consequently, the American diplomats secured extremely favorable terms. In the Treaty of Paris, signed in September 1783, Great Britain formally recognized American independence and relinquished its claims to lands south of the Great Lakes and east of the Mississippi River. The British negotiators did not insist on a separate territory for their Indian allies. “In endeavouring to assist you,” a Wea Indian complained to a British general, “it seems we have wrought our own ruin.” The Cherokees were forced to relinquish claims to 5 million

 acres — three-quarters of their territory — in treaties with Georgia, the Carolinas, and Virginia, while New York and the Continental Congress pressed the Iroquois and Ohio Indians to cede much of their land as well. British officials, like those of other early modern empires, found it easy to abandon allies they had never really understood (America Compared, p. 197). The Paris treaty also granted Americans fishing rights off Newfoundland and Nova Scotia, prohibited the British from “carrying away any negroes or other property,” and guaranteed freedom of navigation on the Mississippi to American citizens “forever.” In return, the American government allowed British merchants to pursue legal claims for prewar debts and encouraged the state legislatures to return confiscated property to Loyalists and grant them citizenship. In the Treaty of Versailles, signed simultaneously, Britain made peace with France and Spain. Neither American ally gained very much. Spain reclaimed Florida from Britain, but not the strategic fortress at Gibraltar. France received the Caribbean island of Tobago, small consolation for a war that had sharply raised taxes and quadrupled France’s national debt. Just six years later, cries for tax relief and political liberty would spark the French Revolution. Only Americans profited handsomely; the treaties gave them independence and access to the trans-Appalachian west.

Creating Republican
Institutions, 1776–1787
 When the Patriots declared independence, they confronted the issue of political authority. “Which of us shall be the rulers?” asked a Philadelphia newspaper. The question was multifaceted. Would power reside in the national government or the states? Who would control the new republican institutions: traditional elites or average citizens? Would women have greater political and legal rights? What would be the status of slaves in the new republic?

The State Constitutions:
How Much Democracy?
 In May 1776, the Second Continental Congress urged Americans to reject royal authority and establish republican governments. Most states quickly complied. “Constitutions employ every pen,” an observer noted. Within six months, Virginia, Maryland, North Carolina, New Jersey, Delaware, and Pennsylvania had all ratified

AMERICA C O M PA R E D

 China’s Growing Empire

 As Britain was losing control of its multiethnic empire in North America, China’s Qing [pronounced Ching] dynasty was consolidating its authority over borderlands peoples during the eighteenth century. And just as Europeans relied on ethnographic descriptions of Native Americans to understand the peoples and territories they hoped to control, Chinese authorities used ethnographic manuals that included prose, poetry, and illustrations to make sense of their new subjects. These excerpts from a set of “Miao albums” illustrate the cultural characteristics they observed in, or ascribed to, one such group of these nonChinese (or non-Han) peoples.

Bulong (Basket-Repairing) Zhongjia


Gedou Miao


 The Bulong Zhongjia are located in Dinfan and Guangshun Districts. Their customs are similar to those of the Kayou. For them, the New Year begins in the twelfth month. They greet it by striking a bronze drum. When they dig in the ground and find a drum, they consider it to be the legacy of Zhuge Liang [an ancient Chinese hero claimed as a forebear]. The rich must pay a high price to buy the drum. At funerals, cattle are butchered and dressed, and relatives and friends are invited. Drinking from the “ox horn of happiness,” the guests often get drunk and sometimes even wind up killing each other. The host does not usually eat meat but only fish and shrimp. After burial, the grave is covered by an umbrella. By nature the Bulong are alert and fierce. When coming and going they carry sharp knives. They will avenge even an angry look.

 The Gedou Miao are found in Zhenyuan, Shibing, and Huangping. They are as good at hunting as the Turen. Women wear their hair up, inclined toward one side, with a comb inserted. Their short tunics are collarless, and their skirts do not reach beyond the knee. They embroider in five colors on the bust and the sleeves, and ornament themselves with seashells [shaped] like silkworm cocoons, stringing them together like real pearls. If a man is injured by one of their poisoned arrows he will die immediately. They are not, however, given to thievery.

Nong (Agricultural) Miao


 The Nong Miao are located in the Zhenfeng District, which once belonged to Guangxi. . . . Men shave their heads and dress just like Han people. Women wear short tunics and long skirts, and cover their heads with colorful scarves. They still follow Miao customs. Their nature is fierce and cruel; they enjoy killing.

 new constitutions, and Connecticut and Rhode Island had revised their colonial charters to delete references to the king. Republicanism meant more than ousting the king. The Declaration of Independence stated the principle of popular sovereignty: governments derive “their just powers from the consent of the governed.” In the heat of revolution, many Patriots gave this clause a further democratic twist. In North Carolina, the backcountry farmers of Mecklenburg County told their delegates to the state’s constitutional convention to “oppose

 Source: From The Art of Ethnography: A Chinese “Miao Album,” translated by David M. Deal and Laura Hostetler (Seattle: University of Washington Press, 2006). Reprinted by permission of the University of Washington Press.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
What attributes seemed especially meaningful to the authors of these descriptions? 2. Why would the authors have singled out the particular qualities that are remarked upon here? How does this compare to the ways in which the British viewed their Native Americans? 
 everything that leans to aristocracy or power in the hands of the rich.” In Virginia, voters elected a new assembly in 1776 that, an eyewitness remarked, “was composed of men not quite so well dressed, nor so politely educated, nor so highly born” as colonial-era legislatures (Figure 6.1).

 To see a longer excerpt of the Mecklenburg delegates’ document, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 FIGURE 6.1 North 1765–1775

36%


47%


1783–1790


17%


12% 26%


62%


South
1765–1775
1783–1790


52%


36%
28%


Over £5,000


12%


42%


30%


£2,000– £5,000


Under £2,000


 Pennsylvania’s Controversial Constitution This democratic impulse flowered in Pennsylvania, thanks to a coalition of Scots-Irish farmers, Philadelphia artisans, and Enlightenment-influenced intellectuals. In 1776, these insurgents ousted every officeholder of the Penn family’s proprietary government, abolished property ownership as a qualification for voting, and granted all taxpaying men the right to vote and hold office. The Pennsylvania constitution of 1776 also created a unicameral (one-house) legislature with complete power; there was no governor to exercise a veto. Other provisions mandated a system of elementary education and protected citizens from imprisonment for debt. Pennsylvania’s democratic constitution alarmed many leading Patriots. From Boston, John Adams denounced the unicameral legislature as “so democratical that it must produce confusion and every evil work.” COMPARE AND Along with other conservative CONTRAST Patriots, Adams wanted to restrict What aspects of the office holding to “men of learning, Pennsylvania constitution leisure and easy circumstances” were most objectionable to Adams, and what did he and warned of oppression under advocate instead? majority rule: “If you give [ordinary citizens] the command or preponderance in the . . . legislature, they will vote all property out of the hands of you aristocrats.” Tempering Democracy To counter the appeal of the Pennsylvania constitution, Adams published Thoughts on Government (1776). In that treatise, he adapted the British Whig theory of mixed government (a sharing of power among the monarch, the House of Lords, and the Commons) to a republican society. To disperse authority and preserve liberty, he insisted on separate institutions: legislatures would make laws, the executive would administer them, and the judiciary would

Middling Men Enter the Halls of Government,
1765–1790
 Before the Revolution, wealthy men (with assets of £2,000 or more, as measured by tax lists and probate records) dominated most colonial assemblies. The power of money was especially apparent in the southern colonies, where representatives worth at least £5,000 formed a majority of the legislators. However, in the new American republic, the proportion of middling legislators (yeomen farmers and others worth less than £2,000) increased dramatically, especially in the northern states. Adapted from Jackson T. Main, “Government by the People: The American Revolution and the Democratization of the Legislatures,” by Jackson T. Main in William and Mary Quarterly, series 3, 23 (1966). Used by permission of William and Mary Quarterly, Omohundro Institute of Early History and Culture.

 enforce them. Adams also demanded a bicameral (twohouse) legislature with an upper house of substantial property owners to offset the popular majorities in the lower one. As further curbs on democracy, he proposed an elected governor with veto power and an appointed — not elected — judiciary. Conservative Patriots endorsed Adams’s governmental system. In New York’s constitution of 1777, property qualifications for voting excluded 20 percent of white men from assembly elections and 60 percent from casting ballots for the governor and the upper house. In South Carolina, elite planters used property rules to disqualify about 90 percent of white men from office holding. The 1778 constitution required candidates for governor to have a debt-free estate of £10,000 (about $700,000 today), senators to be worth £2,000, and assemblymen to own property valued at £1,000. Even in traditionally democratic Massachusetts, the 1780 constitution, authored primarily by Adams, raised property qualifications for voting and office holding and skewed the lower house toward eastern, mercantile interests. The political legacy of the Revolution was complex. Only in Pennsylvania and Vermont were radical Patriots able to create truly democratic institutions. Yet in all the new states, representative legislatures had acquired more power, and average citizens now had greater power at the polls and greater influence in the halls of government.

Women Seek a Public Voice
 The extraordinary excitement of the Revolutionary era tested the dictum that only men could engage in politics. Men controlled all public institutions — legislatures, juries, government offices — but upperclass women engaged in political debate and, defying

 CHAPTER 6

 men’s scorn, filled their letters, diaries, and conversations with opinions on public issues. “The men say we have no business [with politics],” Eliza Wilkinson of South Carolina complained in 1783. “They won’t even allow us liberty of thought, and that is all I want.” As Wilkinson’s remark suggests, most women did not insist on civic equality with men; many sought only an end to restrictive customs and laws. Abigail Adams demanded equal legal rights for married women, who under common law could not own property, enter into contracts, or initiate lawsuits. The war bonds she purchased had to be held in a trust run by a male relative. “Men would be tyrants” if they continued to hold such power over women, Adams declared to her husband, John, criticizing him and other Patriots for “emancipating all nations” from monarchical despotism while “retaining absolute power over Wives.” Most politicians ignored women’s requests, and most men insisted on traditional sexual and political prerogatives. Long-married husbands remained patriarchs who dominated their households, and even young men who embraced the republican ideal of “companionate marriage” did not support legal equality for their wives and daughters. Except in New Jersey, which until 1807 allowed unmarried and widowed female property holders to vote, women remained disenfranchised. In the new American republic, only white men enjoyed full citizenship. Nevertheless, the republican belief in an educated citizenry created opportunities for some women. In her 1779 essay “On the Equality of the Sexes,” Judith Sargent Murray argued that men and women had equal capacities for memory and that women had superior imaginations. She conceded that most women were inferior to men in judgment and reasoning, but only from lack of training: “We can only reason from what we know,” she argued, and most women had been denied “the opportunity of acquiring knowledge.” That situation changed in the 1790s, when the attorney general of Massachusetts declared that girls had an equal right to schooling under the state constitution. By 1850, the literacy rates of women and men in the northeastern states were equal, and educated women again challenged their subordinate legal and political status.

 The War’s Losers: Loyalists, Native Americans, and Slaves The success of republican institutions was assisted by the departure of as many as 100,000 Loyalists, many of whom suffered severe financial losses. Some Patriots demanded revolutionary justice: the seizure of

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789




Judith Sargent Murray
 Judith Sargent Murray was perhaps the most accomplished female essayist of the Revolutionary era. Publishing under various pen names, she advocated for economic independence and better educational opportunities for women. Two years before Mary Wollstonecraft’s A Vindication of the Rights of Woman (1792), she published “On the Equality of the Sexes” in the Massachusetts Magazine. Her letter books, which run to twenty volumes, were discovered only in 1984; the Judith Sargent Murray Society (jsmsociety.com) is now transcribing and indexing them for publication. This striking portrait by John Singleton Copley hints at her intelligence and sardonic wit. Terra Foundation for American Art, Chicago/Art Resource, NY.

 all Loyalist property and its distribution to needy Americans. But most officials were unwilling to go so far. When state governments did seize Loyalist property, they often auctioned it to the highest bidders; only rarely did small-scale farmers benefit. In the cities, Patriot merchants replaced Loyalists at the top of the eco- IDENTIFY CAUSES nomic ladder, supplanting a tradi- What impact did republitional economic elite — who often can ideals have on gender invested profits from trade in real roles and expectations durestate — with republican entre- ing the Revolutionary era? preneurs who tended to promote new trading ventures and domestic manufacturing. This shift facilitated America’s economic development in the years to come.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 Though the Revolution did not result in widespread property redistribution, it did encourage yeomen, middling planters, and small-time entrepreneurs to EXPLAIN believe that their new republican CONSEQUENCES governments would protect their How did the Revolutionary property and ensure widespread commitment to liberty and access to land. In western counthe protection of property ties, former Regulators demanded affect enslaved African Americans and western that the new governments be Indians? more responsive to their needs; beyond the Appalachians, thousands of squatters who had occupied lands in Kentucky and Tennessee expected their claims to be recognized and lands to be made available on easy terms. If the United States were to secure the loyalty of westerners, it would have to meet their needs more effectively than the British Empire had. This meant, among other things, extinguishing Native American claims to land as quickly as possible.

 At war’s end, George Washington commented on the “rage for speculating” in Ohio Valley lands. “Men in these times, talk with as much facility of fifty, a hundred, and even 500,000 Acres as a Gentleman formerly would do of 1000 acres.” “If we make a right use of our natural advantages,” a Fourth of July orator observed, “we soon must be a truly great and happy people.” Native American land claims stood as a conspicuous barrier to the “natural advantages” he imagined. For southern slaveholders, the Revolution was fought to protect property rights, and any sentiment favoring slave emancipation met with violent objections. When Virginia Methodists called for general emancipation in 1785, slaveholders used Revolutionary principles to defend their right to human property. They “risked [their] Lives and Fortunes, and waded through Seas of Blood” to secure “the Possession of [their] Rights of Liberty and Property,” only to hear of “a very subtle and daring Attempt” to “dispossess us of a very important Part of our Property.” Emancipation would bring “Want, Poverty, Distress, and Ruin to the Free Citizen.” The liberties coveted by ordinary white Americans bore hard on the interests of Native Americans and slaves.

The Articles of Confederation


A
Black Loyalist Pass, 1783  White Patriots claimed their freedom by fighting against the British; thousands of black slaves won their liberty by fighting for them. This pass certifies that Cato Rammsay (actually Ramsey), “a Negro, resorted to the British Lines” in search of the freedom promised by Virginia royal governor Dunmore and British commander Henry Clinton to slaves who escaped from Patriot owners. Now age forty-five and a “slim fellow,” Ramsey had escaped from his owner, John Ramsey of Norfolk, Virginia, in 1776, probably fleeing to Dunmore’s ships. Seven years later, he ended up in New York, reunited with his wife, China Godfrey (thirty-five), and their three children: James (twenty), Betsey (fifteen), and Nelly Ramsey (ten), who had fled subsequently from other owners. As the British evacuated New York in 1783, Ramsey and his family were free “to go to Nova-Scotia,” where they worked as farmers. Nova Scotia Archives and Records Management.

 As Patriots embraced independence in 1776, they envisioned a central government with limited powers. Carter Braxton of Virginia thought the Continental Congress should “regulate the affairs of trade, war, peace, alliances, &c.” but “should by no means have authority to interfere with the internal police [governance] or domestic concerns of any Colony.” That idea informed the Articles of Confederation, which were approved by the Continental Congress in November 1777. The Articles provided for a loose union in which “each state retains its sovereignty, freedom, and independence.” As an association of equals, each state had one vote regardless of its size, population, or wealth. Important laws needed the approval of nine of the thirteen states, and changes in the Articles required unanimous consent. Though the Confederation had significant powers on paper — it could declare war, make treaties with foreign nations, adjudicate disputes between the states, borrow and print money, and requisition funds from the states “for the common defense or general welfare” — it had major weaknesses as well. It had neither a chief executive nor a judiciary. Though it could make treaties, it could not enforce their provisions, since the states remained sovereign. Most important, it lacked the power to tax either the states or the people.

 CHAPTER 6

 Although the Congress exercised authority from 1776 — raising the Continental army, negotiating the treaty with France, and financing the war — the Articles won formal ratification only in 1781. The delay stemmed from conflicts over western lands. The royal charters of Virginia, Massachusetts, Connecticut, and other states set boundaries stretching to the Pacific Ocean. States without western lands — Maryland and Pennsylvania — refused to accept the Articles until the land-rich states relinquished these claims to the Confederation. Threatened by Cornwallis’s army in 1781, Virginia gave up its claims, and Maryland, the last holdout, finally ratified the Articles (Map 6.5).

 Continuing Fiscal Crisis By 1780, the central government was nearly bankrupt, and General Washington called urgently for a national tax system; without one, he warned, “our cause is lost.” Led by Robert Morris, who became superintendent of finance in 1781, nationalist-minded Patriots tried to expand the Confederation’s authority. They persuaded Congress to charter the Bank of North America, a private institution in Philadelphia, arguing that its notes would stabilize the inflated Continental currency. Morris also created a central bureaucracy to manage the Confederation’s finances and urged Congress to enact a 5 percent import tax. Rhode Island and New York rejected the tax proposal. His state had opposed British import duties, New York’s representative declared, and it would not accept them from Congress. To raise revenue, Congress looked to the sale of western lands. In 1783, it asserted that the recently signed Treaty of Paris had extinguished the Indians’ rights to those lands and made them the property of the United States. The Northwest Ordinance By 1784, more than thirty thousand settlers had already moved to Kentucky and Tennessee, despite the uncertainties of frontier warfare, and after the war their numbers grew rapidly. In that year, the residents of what is now eastern Tennessee organized a new state, called it Franklin, and sought admission to the Confederation. To preserve its authority over the West, Congress refused to recognize Franklin. Subsequently, Congress created the Southwest and Mississippi Territories (the future states of Tennessee, Alabama, and Mississippi) from lands ceded by North Carolina and Georgia. Because these cessions carried the stipulation that “no regulation . . . shall tend to emancipate slaves,” these states and all those south of the Ohio River allowed human bondage. However, the Confederation Congress banned slavery north of the Ohio River. Between 1784 and

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789




 1787, it issued three important ordinances organizing the “Old Northwest.” The Ordinance of 1784, written by Thomas Jefferson, established the principle that territories could COMPARE AND become states as their populations CONTRAST grew. The Land Ordinance of In what ways did the 1785 mandated a rectangular- Confederation function grid system of surveying and effectively, and what were specified a minimum price of $1 its greatest failings? an acre. It also required that half of the townships be sold in single blocks of 23,040 acres each, which only large-scale speculators could afford, and the rest in parcels of 640 acres each, which restricted their sale to well-to-do farmers (Map 6.6). Finally, the Northwest Ordinance of 1787 created the territories that would eventually become the states of Ohio, Indiana, Illinois, Michigan, and Wisconsin. The ordinance prohibited slavery and earmarked funds from land sales for the support of schools. It also specified that Congress would appoint a governor and judges to administer each new territory until the population reached 5,000 free adult men, at which point the citizens could elect a territorial legislature. When the population reached 60,000, the legislature could devise a republican constitution and apply to join the Confederation. The land ordinances of the 1780s were a great and enduring achievement of the Confederation Congress. They provided for orderly settlement and the admission of new states on the basis of equality; there would be no politically dependent “colonies” in the West. But they also extended the geographical division between slave and free areas that would haunt the nation in the coming decades. And they implicitly invalidated Native American claims to an enormous swath of territory — a corollary that would soon lead the newly independent nation, once again, into war.

 Shays’s Rebellion Though many national leaders were optimistic about the long-term prospects of the United States, postwar economic conditions were grim. The Revolution had crippled American shipping and cut exports of tobacco, rice, and wheat. The British Navigation Acts, which had nurtured colonial commerce, now barred Americans from legal trade with the British West Indies. Moreover, low-priced British manufactures (and some from India as well) were flooding American markets, driving urban artisans and wartime textile firms out of business.

 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Claimed by U.S.
& Great Britain
 upe L. S rior

 VERMONT

(Claimed by
N.H. & N.Y.
Ceded 1791)


N O R T H W E S T


 o L. Ontari

.
 eR nc

 MAINE (part of MASS.)

NEW YORK

NEW HAMPSHIRE

Susquehanna R.


 MASSACHUSETTS

Claimed by
MASS.
Ceded to N.Y., Claimed by CONN. 
 rie L. E

Claimed by
 CONN. and VA. Ceded 1784–1786

RHODE ISLAND CONNECTICUT

 PENNSYLVANIA

T E R R I T O R Y


Western Reserve
 Claimed by CONN. Ceded 1800 Claimed by Virginia Ceded 1784

Missour
 iR .

O hi


 DELAWARE

Claimed by North Carolina
Ceded 1790
 (TENNESSEE)

E


W


 MARYLAND

S


ATLANTIC OCEAN

Cumberland
Gap


)


NORTH CAROLINA

 iss

 Boundary of territory ceded by New York, 1782 Boundary of territory ceded by Virginia, 1784 Original thirteen states after their cessions States without land claims

SOUTH CAROLINA

Claimed by S.C.
Ceded 1787
Claimed by Georgia
Ceded 1802


N


 VIRGINIA

 i s si

 p pi

R.


Ceded by Spain
 to France 1800

NEW JERSEY

.
 oR

Ceded by Virginia 1789
 (KENTUCKY)

 LOUISIANA

Arkans
 as R .

L.
Michig a  n

Claimed by
 MASS. and VA. Ceded 1784–1785

 ron Hu L.

Claimed by Virginia
Ceded 1784


St.
La
 wr e

C A N A D A


M




 GEORGIA

Ceded by Spain


 SPANISH

 Land claims

 FL

 OR

D


A


Gulf of Mexico






I






 400 miles 400 kilometers

 MAP 6.5 The Confederation and Western Land Claims, 1781–1802 The Congress formed by the Articles of Confederation had to resolve conflicting state claims to western lands. For example, the territories claimed by New York and Virginia on the basis of their royal charters overlapped extensively. Beginning in 1781, the Confederation Congress and, after 1789, the U.S. Congress persuaded all of the states to cede their western claims, creating a “national domain” open to all citizens. In the Northwest Ordinance (1787), the Congress divided the domain north of the Ohio River into territories and set up democratic procedures by which they could eventually join the Union as states. South of the Ohio River, the Congress allowed the existing southern states to play a substantial role in settling the ceded lands.

 The fiscal condition of the state governments was dire, primarily because of war debts. Well-to-do merchants and landowners (including Abigail Adams) had invested in state bonds during the war; others had speculated in debt certificates, buying them on the cheap from hard-pressed farmers and soldiers. Now

 creditors and speculators demanded that the state governments redeem the bonds and certificates quickly and at full value, a policy that would require tax increases and a decrease in the amount of paper currency. Most legislatures — now including substantial numbers of middling farmers and artisans — refused. Instead they

 CHAPTER 6

 Northwest Ordinance, 1787, with final state boundaries

 Land Ordinance, 1785, with final sectional division

R.


 WISCONSIN

 MICHIGAN

 NORTHWEST ( Ft. Detroit

 1st Range

 2nd Range

 4th Range

 3rd Range

 6 miles

L. E


 rie



TERRITORY ILLINOIS
Mi 
 INDIANA



 OHIO

 s s o u r i R.

 1/2 section (320 acres)

O hi


 o

R.


 1/4 section (160 acres)

 80 acres 40 acres each

Detail of Section
 1 sq. mile (640 acres)





 2 miles 2 kilometers



































































 schools

Detail of Township
 36 sq. miles

 Farms in an old eastern survey area: Baltimore County, Md.

 Farms in a rectangular survey area: Muskingum County, Ohio



 1 mile 1 mile

 pi

 6 miles

 ip

 ron Hu L.

 iss

L.
Michigan 

Ft. Michilimackinac
Mi
 ss

Baseline


VIRGINIA PENNSYLVANIA

(


 5th Range

 CANADA

 per L. Su ior

 6th Range

 7th Range

The Seven Ranges
First Area Survey


 MINNESOTA



Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789






 2 miles 2 kilometers

 MAP 6.6 Land Division in the Northwest Territory Throughout the Northwest Territory, government surveyors imposed a rectangular grid on the landscape, regardless of the local topography, so that farmers bought neatly defined tracts of land. The right-angled property lines in Muskingum County, Ohio (lower left), contrasted sharply with those in Baltimore County, Maryland (lower right), where — as in most of the eastern and southern states — boundaries followed the contours of the land.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 authorized new issues of paper currency and allowed debtors to pay private creditors in installments. Although wealthy men deplored these measures as “intoxicating Draughts of Liberty” that destroyed “the just rights of creditors,” such political intervention prevented social upheaval. In Massachusetts, however, the new constitution placed power in the hands of a mercantile elite that owned the bulk of the state’s war bonds. Ignoring the interests of ordinary citizens, the legislature increased taxes fivefold to pay off wartime debts — and it stipulated that they be paid in hard currency. Even for substantial farmers, this was a crushing burden. When cash-strapped farmers could not pay both their taxes and their debts, creditors threatened lawsuits. Debtor Ephraim Wetmore heard a rumor that merchant Stephan Salisbury “would have my Body Dead or Alive in case I did not pay.” To protect their livelihoods, farmers called extralegal conventions to protest high taxes and property seizures. Then mobs of angry farmers, including men of high status, closed the courts by force. “[I] had no Intensions to Destroy the Publick Government,” declared Captain Adam Wheeler, a former town selectman; his goal was simply to prevent “Valuable and Industrious members of Society [being] dragged from their families to prison” because of their debts. These crowd actions grew into a full-scale revolt led by Captain Daniel Shays, a Continental army veteran. As a revolt against taxes imposed by an unresponsive government, Shays’s Rebellion resembled American resistance to the British Stamp Act. Consciously linking themselves to the Patriot movement, Shays’s men placed pine twigs in their hats just as Continental troops had done. “The people have turned against their teachers the doctrines which were inculcated to effect the late revolution,” complained Fisher Ames, a conservative Massachusetts lawmaker. Some of the radical Patriots of 1776 likewise condemned the Shaysites: “[Men who] would lessen the Weight of Government lawfully PLACE EVENTS exercised must be Enemies to our IN CONTEXT happy Revolution and Common How did the Shaysites Liberty,” charged Samuel Adams. draw on the Revolution for inspiration? To put down the rebellion, the Massachusetts legislature passed the Riot Act, and wealthy bondholders equipped a formidable fighting force, which Governor James Bowdoin used to disperse Shays’s ragtag army during the winter of 1786–1787. Although Shays’s Rebellion failed, it showed that many middling Patriot families felt that American

 oppressors had replaced British tyrants. Massachusetts voters turned Governor Bowdoin out of office, and debt-ridden farmers in New York, northern Pennsylvania, Connecticut, and New Hampshire closed courthouses and forced their governments to provide economic relief. British officials in Canada predicted the imminent demise of the United States; and American leaders urged purposeful action to save their republican experiment. Events in Massachusetts, declared nationalist Henry Knox, formed “the strongest arguments possible” for the creation of “a strong general government.”

The Constitution of 1787
 These issues ultimately led to the drafting of a national constitution. From its creation, the U.S. Constitution was a controversial document, both acclaimed for solving the nation’s woes and condemned for perverting its republican principles. Critics charged that republican institutions worked only in small political units — the states. Advocates replied that the Constitution extended republicanism by adding another level of government elected by the people. In the new two-level political federation created by the Constitution, the national government would exercise limited, delegated powers, and the existing state governments would retain authority over all other matters.

The Rise of a Nationalist Faction
 Money questions — debts, taxes, and tariffs — dominated the postwar political agenda. Americans who had served the Confederation as military officers, officials, and diplomats viewed these issues from a national perspective and advocated a stronger central government. George Washington, Robert Morris, Benjamin Franklin, John Jay, and John Adams wanted Congress to control foreign and interstate commerce and tariff policy. However, lawmakers in Massachusetts, New York, and Pennsylvania — states with strong commercial traditions — insisted on controlling their own tariffs, both to protect their artisans from low-cost imports and to assist their merchants. Most southern states opposed tariffs because planters wanted to import British textiles and ironware at the lowest possible prices. Nonetheless, some southern leaders became nationalists because their state legislatures had cut taxes and refused to redeem state war bonds. Such policies, lamented wealthy bondholder Charles Lee of Virginia, led taxpayers to believe they would “never be compelled

 CHAPTER 6

 to pay” the public debt. Creditors also condemned state laws that “stayed” (delayed) the payment of mortgages and other private debts. “While men are madly accumulating enormous debts, their legislators are making provisions for their nonpayment,” complained a South Carolina merchant. To undercut the democratic majorities in the state legislatures, creditors joined the movement for a stronger central government. Spurred on by Shays’s Rebellion, nationalists in Congress secured a resolution calling for a convention to revise the Articles of Confederation. Only an “efficient plan from the Convention,” a fellow nationalist wrote to James Madison, “can prevent anarchy first & civil convulsions afterwards.”

The Philadelphia Convention
 In May 1787, fifty-five delegates arrived in Philadelphia. They came from every state except Rhode Island, where the legislature opposed increasing central authority. Most were strong nationalists; forty-two had served in the Confederation Congress. They were also educated and propertied: merchants, slaveholding planters, and “monied men.” There were no artisans, backcountry settlers, or tenants, and only a single yeoman farmer. Some influential Patriots missed the convention. John Adams and Thomas Jefferson were serving as American ministers to Britain and France, respectively. The Massachusetts General Court rejected Sam Adams as a delegate because he opposed a stronger national government, and his fellow firebrand from Virginia, Patrick Henry, refused to attend because he “smelt a rat.” The absence of experienced leaders and contraryminded delegates allowed capable younger nationalists to set the agenda. Declaring that the convention would “decide for ever the fate of Republican Government,” James Madison insisted on increased national authority. Alexander Hamilton of New York likewise demanded a strong central government to protect the republic from “the imprudence of democracy.”

 The Virginia and New Jersey Plans The delegates elected George Washington as their presiding officer and voted to meet behind closed doors. Then — momentously — they decided not to revise the Articles of Confederation but rather to consider the so-called Virginia Plan, a scheme for a powerful national government devised by James Madison. Just thirty-six years old, Madison was determined to fashion national political institutions run by men of high character. A graduate of Princeton, he had read classical and

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789


 modern political theory and served in both the Confederation Congress and the Virginia assembly. Once an optimistic Patriot, Madison had grown discouraged because of the “narrow ambition” and outlook of state legislators. Madison’s Virginia Plan differed from the Articles of Confederation in three crucial respects. First, the plan rejected state sovereignty in favor of the “supremacy of national authority,” including the power to overturn state laws. Second, it called for the national government to be established by the people (not the states) and for national laws to operate directly on citizens of the various states. Third, the plan proposed a three-tier election system in which ordinary voters would elect only the lower house of the national legislature. This lower house would then select the upper house, and both houses would appoint the executive and judiciary. From a political perspective, Madison’s plan had two fatal flaws. First, most state politicians and

James Madison, Statesman
 Throughout his long public life, Madison kept the details of his private life to himself. His biography, he believed, should be a record of his public accomplishments, not his private affairs. Future generations celebrated him not as a great man (like Hamilton or Jefferson) or as a great president (like Washington), but as an original and incisive political thinker. The chief architect of the U.S. Constitution and the Bill of Rights, Madison was the preeminent republican political theorist of his generation. Mead Art Museum, Amherst College, Amherst, Massachusetts, Bequest of Herbert L. Pratt (Class of 1895) # 1945.82.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 citizens resolutely opposed allowing the national government to veto state laws. Second, the plan based representation in the lower house on population; this provision, a Delaware delegate warned, would allow the populous states to “crush the small ones whenever they stand in the way of their ambitious or interested views.” So delegates from Delaware and other small states rallied behind a plan devised by William Paterson of New Jersey. The New Jersey Plan gave the Confederation the power to raise revenue, control commerce, and make binding requisitions on the states. But it preserved the states’ control of their own laws and guaranteed their equality: as in the Confederation Congress, each state would have one vote in a unicameral legislature. Delegates from the more populous states vigorously opposed this provision. After a month-long debate on the two plans, a bare majority of the states agreed to use Madison’s Virginia Plan as the basis of discussion. This decision raised the odds that the convention would create a more powerful national government. Outraged by this prospect, two New York delegates, Robert Yates and John Lansing, accused their colleagues of exceeding their mandate to revise the Articles and left the convention. The remaining delegates met six days a week during the summer of 1787, debating both high principles and practical details. Experienced politicians, they looked for a plan that would be acceptable to most citizens and existing political interests. Pierce Butler of South Carolina invoked a classical Greek precedent: “We must follow the example of Solon, who gave the Athenians not the best government he could devise but the best they would receive.”

 The Great Compromise As the convention grappled with the central problem of the representation of large and small states, the Connecticut delegates suggested a possible solution. They proposed that the national legislature’s upper chamber (the Senate) have two members from each state, while seats in the lower chamber (the House of Representatives) be apportioned by population (determined every ten years by a national census). After bitter debate, delegates from the populous states reluctantly accepted this “Great Compromise.” Other state-related issues were quickly settled by restricting (or leaving ambiguous) the extent of central authority. Some delegates opposed a national system of courts, predicting that “the states will revolt at such encroachments” on their judicial authority.

 This danger led the convention to vest the judicial power “in one supreme Court” and allow the new national legislature to decide whether to establish lower courts within the states. The convention also refused to set a property requirement for voting in national elections. “Eight or nine states have extended the right of suffrage beyond the freeholders,” George Mason of Virginia pointed out. “What will people there say if they should be disfranchised?” Finally, the convention specified that state legislatures would elect members of the upper house, or Senate, and the states would select the electors who would choose the president. By allowing states to have important roles in the new constitutional system, the delegates hoped that their citizens would accept limits on state sovereignty.

 Negotiations over Slavery The shadow of slavery hovered over many debates, and Gouverneur Morris of New York brought it into view. To safeguard property rights, Morris wanted life terms for senators, a property qualification for voting in national elections, and a strong president with veto power. Nonetheless, he rejected the legitimacy of two traditional types of property: the feudal dues claimed by aristocratic landowners and the ownership of slaves. An advocate of free markets and personal liberty, Morris condemned slavery as “a nefarious institution.” Many slave-owning delegates from the Chesapeake region, including Madison and George Mason, recognized that slavery contradicted republican principles and hoped for its eventual demise. They supported an end to American participation in the Atlantic slave trade, a proposal the South Carolina and Georgia delegates angrily rejected. Unless the importation of African slaves continued, these rice planters and merchants declared, their states “shall not be parties to the Union.” At their insistence, the convention denied Congress the power to regulate immigration — and so the slave trade — until 1808 (American Voices, p. 208). The delegates devised other slavery-related compromises. To mollify southern planters, they wrote a “fugitive clause” that allowed masters to reclaim enslaved blacks (or white indentured servants) who fled to other states. But in acknowledgment of the antislavery sentiments of Morris and other northerners, the delegates excluded the words slavery and slave from the Constitution; it spoke only of citizens and “all other Persons.” Because slaves lacked the vote, antislavery delegates wanted their census numbers excluded when apportioning seats in Congress.

 CHAPTER 6

 Southerners — ironically, given that they considered slaves property — demanded that slaves be counted in the census the same as full citizens, to increase the South’s representation. Ultimately, the delegates agreed that each slave would count as three-fifths of a free person for purposes of representation and taxation, a compromise that helped southern planters dominate the national government until 1860.

 National Authority Having addressed the concerns of small states and slave states, the convention created a powerful national government. The Constitution declared that congressional legislation was the “supreme” law of the land. It gave the new government the power to tax, raise an army and a navy, and regulate foreign and interstate commerce, with the authority to make all laws “necessary and proper” to implement those and other provisions. To assist creditors and establish the new government’s fiscal integrity, the Constitution required the United States to honor the existing national debt and prohibited the states from issuing paper money or enacting “any Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts.” The proposed constitution was not a “perfect production,” Benjamin Franklin admitted, as he urged the delegates to sign it in September 1787. But the great statesman confessed his astonishment at finding “this system approaching so near to perfection.” His colleagues apparently agreed; all but three signed the document.

The People Debate Ratification
 The procedure for ratifying the new constitution was as controversial as its contents. Knowing that Rhode Island (and perhaps other states) would reject it, the delegates did not submit the Constitution to the state legislatures for their unanimous consent, as required by the Articles of Confederation. Instead, they arbitrarily — and cleverly — declared that it would take effect when ratified by conventions in nine of the thirteen states. As the constitutional debate began in early 1788, the nationalists seized the initiative with two bold moves. First, they called themselves Federalists, suggesting that they supported a federal union — a loose, decentralized system — and obscuring their commitment to a strong national government. Second, they launched a coordinated campaign in pamphlets and newspapers to explain and justify the Philadelphia constitution.

Making War and Republican Governments, 1776–1789




 The Antifederalists The opponents of the Constitution, called by default the Antifederalists, had diverse backgrounds and motives. Some, like Governor George Clinton COMPARE AND of New York, feared that state gov- CONTRAST ernments would lose power. Rural How did the Constitudemocrats protested that the pro- tion, in its final form, posed document, unlike most differ from the plan that state constitutions, lacked a decla- James Madison originally ration of individual rights; they proposed? also feared that the central government would be run by wealthy men. “Lawyers and men of learning and monied men expect to be managers of this Constitution,” worried a Massachusetts farmer. “[T]hey will swallow up all of us little folks . . . just as the whale swallowed up Jonah.” Giving political substance to these fears, Melancton Smith of New York argued that the large electoral districts prescribed by the Constitution would restrict office holding to wealthy men, whereas the smaller districts used in state elections usually produced legislatures “composed principally of respectable yeomanry.” John Quincy Adams agreed: if only “eight men” would represent Massachusetts, “they will infallibly be chosen from the aristocratic part of the community.” Smith summed up the views of Americans who held traditional republican values. To keep government “close to the people,” they wanted the states to remain small sovereign republics tied together only for trade and defense — not the “United States” but the “States United.” Citing the French political philosopher Montesquieu, Antifederalists argued that republican institutions were best suited to small polities. “No extensive empire can be governed on republican principles,” declared James Winthrop of Massachusetts. Patrick Henry worried that the Constitution would recreate British rule: high taxes, an oppressive bureaucracy, a standing army, and a “great and mighty President . . . supported in extravagant munificence.” As another Antifederalist put it, “I had rather be a free citizen of the small republic of Massachusetts than an oppressed subject of the great American empire.” Federalists Respond In New York, where ratification was hotly contested, James Madison, John Jay, and Alexander Hamilton defended the proposed constitution in a series of eighty-five essays written in 1787 and 1788, collectively titled The Federalist. This work influenced political leaders throughout the country and subsequently won acclaim as an important treatise of practical republicanism. Its authors denied that a

AMERICAN VOICES

The First National
 Debate over Slavery

 In this part of the text, we trace the impact of republican ideology on American politics and society. What happened when republicanism collided head-on with the well-established practice of slavery? After the Revolution, the Massachusetts courts abolished slavery, but in 1787, slavery was legal in the rest of the Union and was the bedrock of social order and agricultural production in the southern states. A look at the debates on the issue of the African slave trade at the Philadelphia convention and in a state ratifying convention shows that slavery was an extremely divisive issue at the birth of the nation — a dark cloud threatening the bright future of the young republic.

The Constitutional Convention
 Slavery was not a major topic of discussion at the Philadelphia convention, but it surfaced a number of times, notably in the important debate over representation (which produced the three-fifths clause). A discussion of the Atlantic slave trade began when Luther Martin, a delegate from Maryland, proposed a clause allowing Congress to impose a tax on or prohibit the importation of slaves.

 Mr. Martin proposed to vary article 7, sect. 4 so as to allow a prohibition or tax on the importation of slaves. . . . [He believed] it was inconsistent with the principles of the Revolution, and dishonorable to the American character, to have such a feature [promoting the slave trade] in the Constitution. Mr. [John] Rutledge [of South Carolina declared that] religion and humanity had nothing to do with this question. Interest alone is the governing principle with nations. The true question at present is whether the Southern states shall or shall not be parties to the Union. . . . Mr. [Oliver] Ellsworth [of Connecticut] was for leaving the clause as it stands. Let every state import what it pleases. The morality or wisdom of slavery are considerations belonging to the states themselves. . . . The old Confederation had not meddled with this point, and he did not see any greater necessity for bringing it within the policy of the new one. Mr. [Charles C.] Pinckney [said] South Carolina can never receive the plan [for a new constitution] if it prohibits the slave trade. In every proposed extension of the powers of Congress, that state has expressly and watchfully excepted that of meddling with the importation of Negroes. . . . Mr. [Roger] Sherman [of Connecticut] was for leaving the clause as it stands. He disapproved of the slave trade; yet, as the states were now possessed of the right

 to import slaves, . . . and as it was expedient to have as few objections as possible to the proposed scheme of government, he thought it best to leave the matter as we find it. Col. [George] Mason [of Virginia stated that] this infernal trade originated in the avarice of British merchants. The British government constantly checked the attempts of Virginia to put a stop to it. The present question concerns not the importing states alone, but the whole Union. . . . Maryland and Virginia, he said, had already prohibited the importation of slaves expressly. North Carolina had done the same in substance. All this would be in vain if South Carolina and Georgia be at liberty to import. The Western people are already calling out for slaves for their new lands, and will fill that country with slaves, if they can be got through South Carolina and Georgia. Slavery discourages arts and manufactures. The poor despise labor when performed by slaves. They prevent the immigration of whites, who really enrich and strengthen a country. . . . Every master of slaves is born a petty tyrant. They bring the judgment of Heaven on a country. As nations cannot be rewarded or punished in the next world, they must be in this. By an inevitable chain of causes and effects, Providence punishes national sins by national calamities. . . . He held it essential, in every point of view, that the general government should have power to prevent the increase of slavery. Mr. Ellsworth, as he had never owned a slave, could not judge of the effects of slavery on character. He said, however, that if it was to be considered in a moral light, we ought to go further, and free those already in the country. . . . Let us not intermeddle. As population increases, poor laborers will be so plenty as to render slaves useless. Slavery, in time, will not be a speck in our country. . . . Gen. [Charles C.] Pinckney [argued that] South Carolina and Georgia cannot do without slaves. As to

 Virginia, she will gain by stopping the importations. Her slaves will rise in value, and she has more than she wants. It would be unequal to require South Carolina and Georgia to confederate on such unequal terms. . . . He contended that the importation of slaves would be for the interest of the whole Union. The more slaves, the more produce to employ the carrying trade; the more consumption also; and the more of this, the more revenue for the common treasury. . . . [He] should consider a rejection of the [present] clause as an exclusion of South Carolina from the Union. Source: Max Farrand, ed., The Records of the Federal Convention of 1787 (New Haven: Yale University Press, 1911), 2: 364–365, 369–372.

The Massachusetts Ratifying Convention
 In Philadelphia, the delegates agreed on a compromise: they gave Congress the power to tax or prohibit slave imports, as Luther Martin had proposed, but withheld that power for twenty years. In the Massachusetts convention, the delegates split on this issue and on many others. They ratified the Constitution by a narrow margin, 187 to 168.

 Mr. Neal (from Kittery) [an Antifederalist] went over the ground of objection to . . . the idea that slave trade was allowed to be continued for 20 years. His profession, he said, obliged him to bear witness against any thing that should favor the making merchandize of the bodies of men, and unless his objection was removed, he could not put his hand to the constitution. Other gentlemen said, in addition to this idea, that there was not even a proposition that the negroes ever shall be free: and Gen. Thompson exclaimed — “Mr. President, shall it be said, that after we have established our own independence and freedom, we make slaves of others? Oh! Washington . . . he has immortalized himself! but he holds those in slavery who have a good right to be free as he is. . . .” On the other side, gentlemen said, that the step taken in this article, towards the abolition of slavery, was one of the beauties of the constitution. They observed, that in the confederation there was no provision whatever for its ever being abolished; but this constitution provides, that Congress may after twenty years, totally annihilate the slave trade. . . .

 Mr. Heath (Federalist): . . . I apprehend that it is not in our power to do any thing for or against those who are in slavery in the southern states. No gentleman within these walls detests every idea of slavery more than I do: it is generally detested by the people of this commonwealth, and I ardently hope that the time will soon come, when our brethren in the southern states will view it as we do, and put a stop to it; but to this we have no right to compel them. Two questions naturally arise: if we ratify the Constitution, shall we do any thing by our act to hold the blacks in slavery or shall we become the partakers of other men’s sins? I think neither of them: each state is sovereign and independent to a certain degree, and they have a right, and will regulate their own internal affairs, as to themselves appears proper. . . . We are not in this case partakers of other men’s sins. . . . The federal convention went as far as they could; the migration or immigration &c. is confined to the states, now existing only, new states cannot claim it. Congress, by their ordnance for erecting new states, some time since, declared that there shall be no slavery in them. But whether those in slavery in the southern states, will be emancipated after the year 1808, I do not pretend to determine: I rather doubt it. Source: Jonathan Elliot, ed., The Debates . . . on the Adoption of the Federal Constitution (Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott, 1836), 1: 103–105, 107, 112, 117.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
At the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia, what were the main arguments for and against federal restrictions on the Atlantic slave trade? How do you explain the position taken by the Connecticut delegates in Philadelphia and Mr. Heath in the Massachusetts debate? 2. What argument does George Mason, a Virginia slave owner, make in favor of prohibiting the Atlantic slave trade? 3. What evidence of regional tensions appears in the documents? Several men from different states — Mason from Virginia, Ellsworth from Connecticut, and Heath from Massachusetts — offered predictions about the future of slavery. How accurate were they? 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 centralized government would lead to domestic tyranny. Drawing on Montesquieu’s theories and John Adams’s Thoughts on Government, Madison, Jay, and Hamilton pointed out that authority would be divided among the president, a bicameral legislature, and a judiciary. Each branch of government would “check and balance” the others and so preserve liberty. In “Federalist No. 10,” Madison challenged the view that republican governments only worked in small polities, arguing that a large state would better protect republican liberty. It was “sown in the nature of man,” Madison wrote, for individuals to seek power and form factions. Indeed, “a landed interest, a manufacturing interest, a mercantile interest, a moneyed interest, with many lesser interests, grow up of necessity in civilized nations.” A free society should welcome all factions but keep any one of them from becoming dominant — something best achieved in a large republic. “Extend the sphere and you take in a greater variety of parties and interests,” Madison concluded, inhibiting the formation of a majority eager “to invade the rights of other citizens.”

 The Constitution Ratified The delegates debating these issues in the state ratification conventions included untutored farmers and middling artisans as well as educated gentlemen. Generally, backcountry delegates were Antifederalists, while those from coastal areas were Federalists. In Pennsylvania, Philadelphia merchants and artisans joined commercial farmers to ratify the Constitution. Other early Federalist successes came in four less populous states — Delaware, New Jersey, Georgia, and Connecticut — where delegates hoped that a strong national government would offset the power of large neighboring states (Map 6.7). The Constitution’s first real test came in January 1788 in Massachusetts, a hotbed of Antifederalist sentiment. Influential Patriots, including Samuel Adams and Governor John Hancock, opposed the new constitution, as did many followers of Daniel Shays. But Boston artisans, who wanted tariff protection from British imports, supported ratification. To win over other delegates, Federalist leaders assured the convention that they would recommend a national bill of MAP 6.7 Ratifying the Constitution of 1787

L.
Superior 

 MAINE (part of MASS.)

L.
Michigan 

 ron Hu L.

NEW HAMPSHIRE
June 21, 1788 L. Ontario 
L.


MASSACHUSETTS
Feb. 7, 1788 RHODE ISLAND May 29, 1790 
NEW YORK
July 26, 1788 
 e

Eri


PENNSYLVANIA
Dec. 12, 1787 
CONNECTICUT
Jan. 9, 1788 
E


NEW JERSEY
Dec. 18, 1787 VIRGINIA June 26, 1788 
.
 pi R sip

Mi
 ssi s

O hi


 oR

Tennessee
District




SOUTH CAROLINA
May 23, 1788 GEORGIA Jan. 2, 1788 
S


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

MARYLAND
Apr. 28, 1788 NORTH CAROLINA Nov. 21, 1789 
W


DELAWARE
Dec. 7, 1787 
.


Kentucky
District


N




 200 miles 200 kilometers

Votes at District Level
 With date of ratification by state convention Delegates in support of ratification Delegates opposed to ratification Districts evenly divided No returns

 In 1907, geographer Owen Libby mapped the votes of members of the state conventions that ratified the Constitution. His map showed that most delegates from seaboard or commercial farming districts (which sent many delegates to the conventions) supported the Constitution, while those from sparsely represented, subsistenceoriented backcountry areas opposed it. Subsequent research has confirmed Libby’s socioeconomic interpretation of the voting patterns in North and South Carolina and in Massachusetts. However, other states’ delegates were influenced by different factors. For example, in Georgia, delegates from all regions voted for ratification.

 CHAPTER 6

 rights. By a close vote of 187 to 168, the Federalists carried the day. Spring brought Federalist victories in Maryland, South Carolina, and New Hampshire, reaching the nine-state quota required for ratification. But it took the powerful arguments advanced in The Federalist and more promises of a bill of rights to secure the Constitution’s adoption in the essential states of Virginia and New York. The votes were again close: 89 to 79 in Virginia and 30 to 27 in New York. Testifying to their respect for popular sovereignty and majority rule, most Americans accepted the verdict of the ratifying conventions. “A decided majority” of the New Hampshire assembly had opposed the “new system,” reported Joshua Atherton, but now they said, “It is adopted, let us try it.” In Virginia, Patrick Henry vowed to “submit as a quiet citizen” and fight for amendments “in a constitutional way.” Unlike in France, where the Revolution of 1789 divided the society into irreconcilable factions for generations, the American Constitutional Revolution of 1787 created a national republic that enjoyed broad popular support. Federalists celebrated their triumph by organizing great processions in the seaport cities. By marching in an orderly fashion — in conscious contrast to the riotous Revolutionary mobs — Federalist-minded citizens affirmed their allegiance to a self-governing but elite-ruled republican nation.

CHAPTER REVIEW

SUMMARY
In this chapter, we examined the unfolding of two related sets of events. The first was the war between Britain and its rebellious colonies that began in 1776 and ended in 1783. The two great battles of Saratoga (1777) and Yorktown (1781) determined the outcome of that conflict. Surprisingly, given the military might of the British Empire, both were American victories. These triumphs testify to the determination of George Washington, the resilience of the Continental army, and support for the Patriot cause from hundreds of local militias and tens of thousands of taxpaying citizens. This popular support reflected the Patriots’ second success: building effective institutions of republican government. These elected institutions of local and state governance evolved out of colonial-era town meetings and representative assemblies. They were defined in the state constitutions written between 1776 and 1781, and their principles informed the first national constitution, the Articles of Confederation. Despite the challenges posed by conflicts over suffrage, women’s rights, and fiscal policy, these self-governing political institutions carried the new republic successfully through the war-torn era and laid the foundation for the Constitution of 1787, the national charter that endures today. 
C H A P T E R


R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
KEY TERMS

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
Battle of Long Island (1776)
 (p. 184) Battle of Saratoga (1777) (p. 187) Valley Forge (p. 189) Philipsburg Proclamation (p. 190) Battle of Yorktown (1781) (p. 195) currency tax (p. 196) Treaty of Paris of 1783 (p. 196) Pennsylvania constitution of 1776 (p. 198)

KEY PEOPLE
mixed government (p. 198) Articles of Confederation (p. 200) Northwest Ordinance of 1787 (p. 201) Shays’s Rebellion (p. 204) Virginia Plan (p. 205) New Jersey Plan (p. 206) Federalists (p. 207) Antifederalists (p. 207) Federalist No. 10 (p. 210) 
General George Washington
 (p. 184) General William Howe (p. 184) General Horatio Gates (p. 187) Robert Morris (p. 188) Baron von Steuben (p. 189) Judith Sargent Murray (p. 199) James Madison (p. 205)





 PART 3

CHAPTER REVIEW

REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. What were the principal reasons that Great Britain,

 despite its enormous military advantages, lost the War for Independence?

 2. The war had wrenching effects on the American

 economy. What economic problems became especially acute during wartime? How did the states and the Second Continental Congress attempt to address them?

MAKING CONNECTIONS

 resent the true spirit of the American Revolution. Which of these competing visions of national identity do you think was right? Why?

Consider the
 events listed under “Work, Exchange, and Technology” and “Politics and Power” for the period 1776– 1787 on the thematic timeline on page 149. How did war debt and inflation influence the development of political institutions during these years?

THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

In Chapter 5, we
 saw the way that protests against imperial policy grew until colonists chose to declare their independence rather than submit to Parliament’s authority. By 1787, the problems created by the Revolutionary War forced leaders of the newly independent states to consider plans for their own powerful central government. What problems led nationalists to believe such a step was necessary? How did Antifederalists draw on Revolutionary ideas to make their case against the Constitution? What claims did nationalists make in response to dampen Antifederalist fears?

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE

MORE TO EXPLORE

 3. Federalists and Antifederalists both claimed to rep-

 Look again at Map 6.5 on page 202 showing western land claims in the 1780s. If these claims had not been ceded to the Continental Congress, what would have been the likely result? Why was it so important to the survival of the Confederation that individual states give up their claims to these western lands?

VISUAL EVIDENCE

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

Colin G. Calloway, The American Revolution in Indian
 Country (1995). Tracks the experiences of numerous Native American communities in the Revolution. Saul Cornell, The Other Founders (1999). Explores the ideas and legacy of the Antifederalists. John C. Dann, ed., The Revolution Remembered (1980). Contains vivid eyewitness accounts of the Revolution.

 Pauline Maier, Ratification (2010). A compelling narrative of the debate over the Constitution. Michael McDonnell, The Politics of War (2007). A penetrating account of Virginia’s mobilization for war. Leonard Richards, Shays’s Rebellion (2003). A persuasive interpretation of the rebellion’s participants and motives.

 CHAPTER 6

 TIMELINE



CHAPTER REVIEW

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.

 Second Continental Congress declares independence Howe forces Washington to retreat from New York and New Jersey Pennsylvania approves democratic state constitution John Adams publishes Thoughts on Government



 Articles of Confederation create central government Howe occupies Philadelphia (September) Gates defeats Burgoyne at Saratoga (October)



 Franco-American alliance (February) Lord North seeks political settlement Congress rejects negotiations British adopt southern strategy British capture Savannah (December)

1778–1781


 Severe inflation of Continental currency



 British and American forces battle in Georgia



 Clinton seizes Charleston (May) French troops land in Rhode Island



 Cornwallis invades Virginia (April), surrenders at Yorktown (October) States finally ratify Articles of Confederation



 Treaty of Paris (September 3) officially ends war

1784–1785


 Congress enacts political and land ordinances for new states



 Nationalists hold convention in Annapolis, Maryland Shays’s Rebellion roils Massachusetts



 Congress passes Northwest Ordinance Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia

1787–1788


 Jay, Madison, and Hamilton write The Federalist Eleven states ratify U.S. Constitution

KEY TURNING POINTS:
Gates defeats Burgoyne at Saratoga (1777), the Franco-American 
 alliance (1778), and Cornwallis surrenders at Yorktown (1781). How were these three events linked? How important was the French alliance to the Patriot victory?





Hammering Out a
Federal Republic
1787–1820


C H A P T E R
THE POLITICAL CRISIS OF THE 1790S
The Federalists Implement the Constitution Hamilton’s Financial Program Jefferson’s Agrarian Vision The French Revolution Divides Americans The Rise of Political Parties 
A REPUBLICAN EMPIRE IS BORN
Sham Treaties and Indian Lands Migration and the Changing Farm Economy The Jefferson Presidency Jefferson and the West 
THE WAR OF 1812 AND THE TRANSFORMATION OF POLITICS
Conflict in the Atlantic and the West The War of 1812 The Federalist Legacy 


L


 ike an earthquake, the American IDENTIFY THE BIG IDEA Revolution shook the European What was required to make the monarchical order, and its afterUnited States a strong, viable, indeshocks reverberated for decades. By “crependent republic in its early years, ating a new republic based on the rights of and how did debates over the Conthe individual, the North Americans introstitution shape relations between duced a new force into the world,” the the national government and the eminent German historian Leopold von states? Ranke warned the king of Bavaria in 1854, a force that might cost the monarch his throne. Before 1776, “a king who ruled by the grace of God had been the center around which everything turned. Now the idea emerged that power should come from below [from the people].” Other republican-inspired upheavals — England’s Puritan Revolution of the 1640s and the French Revolution of 1789 — ended in political chaos and military rule. Similar fates befell many Latin American republics that won independence from Spain in the early nineteenth century. But the American states escaped both anarchy and dictatorship. Having been raised in a Radical Whig political culture that viewed standing armies and powerful generals as instruments of tyranny, General George Washington left public life in 1783 to manage his plantation, astonishing European observers but bolstering the authority of elected Patriot leaders. “’Tis a Conduct so novel,” American painter John Trumbull reported from London, that it is “inconceivable to People [here].” The great task of fashioning representative republican governments absorbed the energy and intellect of an entire generation and was rife with conflict. Seeking to perpetuate the elite-led polity of the colonial era, Federalists celebrated “natural aristocrats” such as Washington and condemned the radical republicanism of the French Revolution. In response, Jefferson and his Republican followers claimed the Fourth of July as their holiday and “we the people” as their political language. “There was a grand democrat procession in Town on the 4th of July,” came a report from Baltimore: “All the farmers, tanners, black-smiths, shoemakers, etc. were there . . . and afterwards they went to a grand feast.” Many people of high status worried that the new state governments were too attentive to the demands of such ordinary workers and their families. When considering a bill, Connecticut conservative Ezra Stiles grumbled, every elected official “instantly thinks how it will affect his constituents” rather than how it would enhance the general welfare. What Stiles criticized as irresponsible, however, most Americans welcomed. The concerns of ordinary citizens were now paramount, and traditional elites trembled.

 An Emblem of America, 1800 In the first years of independence, citizens of the United States

 searched for a symbolic representation of their new nation. This engraving shows many of the choices: Should the symbol of “America” have an ideological meaning, as in the Goddess of Liberty? Or should it enshrine national heroes, as in the stone Memorial to Washington? Or should America’s symbol be found among its unique features, such as Niagara Falls (pictured in the background) or the presence of Africans and Indians (as represented by the black youth to the right and the spear-brandishing figure in front of the falls)? Or, finally, should its symbol be the national flag? Courtesy of the John Carter Brown Library at Brown University.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Political Crisis
 of the 1790s The final decade of the eighteenth century brought fresh challenges for American politics. The Federalists split into two factions over financial policy and the French Revolution, and their leaders, Alexander Hamilton and Thomas Jefferson, offered contrasting visions of the future. Would the United States remain an agricultural nation governed by local officials, as Jefferson hoped? Or would Hamilton’s vision of a strong national government and an economy based on manufacturing become reality?

The Federalists Implement
 the Constitution The Constitution expanded the dimensions of political life by allowing voters to choose national leaders as well as local and state officials. The Federalists swept the election of 1788, winning forty-four seats in the House of Representatives; only eight Antifederalists won election. As expected, members of the electoral college chose George Washington as president. John Adams received the second-highest number of electoral votes and became vice president.

 Devising the New Government Once the military savior of his country, Washington now became its political father. At age fifty-seven, the first president possessed great personal dignity and a cautious personality. To maintain continuity, he adopted many of the administrative practices of the Confederation and asked Congress to reestablish the existing executive departments: Foreign Affairs (State), Finance (Treasury), and War. To head the Department of State, Washington chose Thomas Jefferson, a fellow Virginian and an experienced diplomat. For secretary of the treasury, he turned to Alexander Hamilton, a lawyer and his former military aide. The president designated Jefferson, Hamilton, and Secretary of War Henry Knox as his cabinet, or advisory body. The Constitution mandated a supreme court, but the Philadelphia convention gave Congress the task of creating a national court system. The Federalists wanted strong national institutions, and the Judiciary Act of 1789 reflected their vision. The act established a federal district court in each state and three circuit courts to hear appeals from the districts, with the Supreme Court having the final say. The Judiciary Act also specified that

 cases arising in state courts that involved federal laws could be appealed to the Supreme Court. This provision ensured that federal judges would have the final say on the meaning of the Constitution.

 The Bill of Rights The Federalists kept their promise to add a declaration of rights to the Constitution. James Madison, now a member of the House of Representatives, submitted nineteen amendments to the First Congress; by 1791, ten had been approved by Congress and ratified by the states. These ten amendments, known as the Bill of Rights, safeguard fundamental personal rights, including freedom of speech and religion, and mandate legal procedures, such as trial by jury. By protecting individual citizens, the amendments eased Antifederalists’ fears of an oppressive national government and secured the legitimacy of the Constitution. They also addressed the issue of federalism: the proper balance between the authority of the national and state governments. But that question was constantly contested until the Civil War and remains important today.

 Hamilton’s Financial Program George Washington’s most important decision was choosing Alexander Hamilton as secretary of the treasury. An ambitious self-made man of great intelligence, Hamilton married into the Schuyler family, influential Hudson River Valley landowners, and was a prominent lawyer in New York City. At the Philadelphia convention, he condemned the “democratic spirit” and called for an authoritarian government and a president with near-monarchical powers. As treasury secretary, Hamilton devised bold policies to enhance national authority and to assist financiers and merchants. He outlined his plans in three pathbreaking reports to Congress: on public credit (January 1790), on a national bank (December 1790), and on manufactures (December 1791). These reports outlined a coherent program of national mercantilism — government-assisted economic development.

Public Credit: Redemption and Assumption The
 financial and social implications of Hamilton’s “Report on the Public Credit” made it instantly controversial. Hamilton asked Congress to redeem at face value the $55 million in Confederation securities held by foreign and domestic investors (Figure 7.1). His reasons were simple: As an underdeveloped nation, the United States needed good credit to secure loans from Dutch and

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820




 Hamilton’s system of public credit (millions of dollars)

Debts Assets
 $75.6 million in bonds sold mostly to the wealthy, creating a permanent national debt Total debt

$42.4
 National war debt (redemption of Confederation securities)

+


$21.5
 War debts assumed from states

+ $11.7
Owed to
 foreigners

Excise and
 other revenue

$1.2 +


 $4.4 = $5.6 million gross revenue

Customs
 revenue

$4.6


 Annual interest owed to bondholders on debt

$1.0


 Net revenue for gov’t spending

 FIGURE 7.1 Hamilton’s Fiscal Structure, 1792 As treasury secretary, Alexander Hamilton established a national debt by issuing government bonds and using the proceeds to redeem Confederation securities and assume the war debts of the states. To pay the annual interest due on the bonds, he used the revenue from excise taxes and customs duties. Hamilton deliberately did not attempt to redeem the bonds because he wanted to tie the interests of the wealthy Americans who owned them to the new national government.

 British financiers. However, Hamilton’s redemption plan would give enormous profits to speculators, who had bought up depreciated securities. For example, the Massachusetts firm of Burrell & Burrell had paid $600 for Confederation notes with a face value of $2,500; it stood to reap a profit of $1,900. Such windfall gains offended a majority of Americans, who condemned the speculative practices of capitalist financiers. Equally controversial was Hamilton’s proposal to pay the Burrells and other note holders with new interest-bearing securities, thereby creating a permanent national debt. Patrick Henry condemned this plan “to erect, and concentrate, and perpetuate a large monied interest” and warned that it would prove “fatal to the existence of American liberty.” James Madison demanded that Congress recompense those who originally owned Confederation securities: the thousands of shopkeepers, farmers, and soldiers who had bought or accepted them during the dark days of the war. However, it would have been difficult to trace the original owners; moreover, nearly half the members of the House of Representatives owned Confederation securities and would profit personally from Hamilton’s plan. Melding practicality with self-interest, the House rejected Madison’s suggestion.

 Hamilton then proposed that the national government further enhance public credit by assuming the war debts of the states. This assumption plan, costing $22 mil- UNDERSTAND POINTS lion, also favored well-to-do cred- OF VIEW itors such as Abigail Adams, who Why did Hamilton believe had bought depreciated Massa- a national debt would chusetts government bonds with strengthen the United a face value of $2,400 for only a States and help to ensure few hundred dollars and would its survival? reap a windfall profit. Still, Adams was a long-term investor, not a speculator like Assistant Secretary of the Treasury William Duer. Knowing Hamilton’s intentions in advance, Duer and his associates secretly bought up $4.6 million of the war bonds of southern states at bargain rates. Congressional critics condemned Duer’s speculation. They also pointed out that some states had already paid off their war debts; in response, Hamilton promised to reimburse those states. To win the votes of congressmen from Virginia and Maryland, the treasury chief arranged another deal: he agreed that the permanent national capital would be built along the Potomac River, where suspicious southerners could easily watch its operations. Such astute bargaining gave Hamilton the votes he needed to enact his redemption and assumption plans.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Creating a National Bank In December 1790,
 Hamilton asked Congress to charter the Bank of the United States, which would be jointly owned by private stockholders and the national government. Hamilton argued that the bank would provide stability to the specie-starved American economy by making loans to merchants, handling government funds, and issuing bills of credit — much as the Bank of England had done in Great Britain. These potential benefits persuaded Congress to grant Hamilton’s bank a twenty-year charter and to send the legislation to the president for his approval. At this critical juncture, Secretary of State Thomas Jefferson joined with James Madison to oppose Hamilton’s financial initiatives. Jefferson charged that Hamilton’s national bank was unconstitutional. “The incorporation of a Bank,” Jefferson told President Washington, was not a power expressly “delegated to the United States by the Constitution.” Jefferson’s argument rested on a strict interpretation of the Constitution. Hamilton preferred a loose interpretation; he told Washington that Article 1, Section 8, empowered Congress to make “all Laws which shall be necessary and proper” to carry out the provisions of the Constitution. Agreeing with Hamilton, the president signed the legislation. Raising Revenue Through Tariffs Hamilton now sought revenue to pay the annual interest on the national debt. At his insistence, Congress imposed excise taxes, including a duty on whiskey distilled in the United States. These taxes would yield $1 million a year. To raise another $4 million to $5 million, the treasury secretary proposed higher tariffs on foreign imports. Although Hamilton’s “Report on Manufactures” (1791)

 urged the expansion of American manufacturing, he did not support high protective tariffs that would exclude foreign products. Rather, he advocated moderate revenue tariffs that would pay the interest on the debt and other government expenses. Hamilton’s scheme worked brilliantly. As American trade increased, customs revenue rose steadily and paid down the national debt. Controversies notwithstanding, the treasury secretary had devised a strikingly modern and successful fiscal system; as entrepreneur Samuel Blodget Jr. declared in 1801, “the country prospered beyond all former example.”

 Jefferson’s Agrarian Vision Hamilton paid a high political price for his success. As Washington began his second four-year term in 1793, Hamilton’s financial measures had split the Federalists into bitterly opposed factions. Most northern Federalists supported the treasury secretary, while most southern Federalists joined a group headed by Madison and Jefferson. By 1794, the two factions had acquired names. Hamiltonians remained Federalists; the allies of Madison and Jefferson called themselves Democratic Republicans or simply Republicans. Thomas Jefferson spoke for southern planters and western farmers. Well-read in architecture, natural history, agricultural science, and political theory, Jefferson embraced the optimism of the Enlightenment. He believed in the “improvability of the human race” and deplored the corruption and social divisions that threatened its progress. Having seen the poverty of laborers in British factories, Jefferson doubted that wageworkers had the economic and political independence needed to sustain a republican polity.

Two Visions of America
 Thomas Jefferson (left) and Alexander Hamilton confront each other in these portraits, as they did in the political battles of the 1790s. Jefferson was pro-French, Hamilton pro-British. Jefferson favored farmers and artisans; Hamilton supported merchants and financiers. Jefferson believed in democracy and rule by legislative majorities; Hamilton argued for strong executives and judges. Still, in the contested presidential election of 1800, Hamilton (who detested candidate Aaron Burr) threw his support to Jefferson and secured the presidency for his longtime political foe. The White House Historical Association (White House Collection). / Yale University Art Gallery/Art Resource, NY.

 CHAPTER 7

 Jefferson therefore set his democratic vision of America in a society of independent yeomen farm families. “Those who labor in the earth are the chosen people of God,” he wrote. The grain and meat from their homesteads would feed European nations, which “would manufacture and send us in exchange our clothes and other comforts.” Jefferson’s notion of an international division of labor resembled that proposed by Scottish economist Adam Smith in The Wealth of Nations (1776). To see a longer excerpt of Jefferson’s Notes on the State of Virginia, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.

 Turmoil in Europe brought Jefferson’s vision closer to reality. The French Revolution began in 1789; four years later, the First French Republic (1792–1804) went to war against a British-led coalition of monarchies. As fighting disrupted European farming, wheat prices leaped from 5 to 8 shillings a bushel and remained high for twenty years, bringing substantial profits to Chesapeake and Middle Atlantic farmers. “Our farmers have never experienced such prosperity,” remarked one observer. Simultaneously, a boom in the export of raw cotton, fueled by the invention of the cotton gin and the mechanization of cloth production in Britain, boosted the economies of Georgia and South Carolina. As Jefferson had hoped, European markets brought prosperity to American agriculture.

The French Revolution
Divides Americans
 American merchants profited even more handsomely from the European war. In 1793, President Washington issued a Proclamation of Neutrality, allowing U.S. citizens to trade with all belligerents. As neutral carriers, American merchant ships claimed a right to pass through Britain’s naval blockade of French ports, and American firms quickly took over the lucrative sugar trade between France and its West Indian islands. Commercial earnings rose spectacularly, averaging $20 million annually in the 1790s — twice the value of cotton and tobacco exports. As the American merchant fleet increased from 355,000 tons in 1790 to 1.1 million tons in 1808, northern shipbuilders and merchants provided work for thousands of shipwrights, sailmakers, dockhands, and seamen. Carpenters, masons, and cabinetmakers in Boston, New York, and Philadelphia easily found work building warehouses

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820




 and fashionable “Federal-style” town houses for newly affluent merchants.

 Ideological Politics As Americans profited from Europe’s struggles, they argued passionately over its ideologies. Most Americans had welcomed the French Revolution (1789–1799) because it abolished feudalism and established a constitutional monarchy. The creation of the First French Republic was more controversial. Many applauded the end of the monarchy and embraced the democratic ideology of the radical Jacobins. Like the Jacobins, they formed political clubs and began to address one another as “citizen.” However, Americans with strong religious beliefs condemned the new French government for closing Christian churches and promoting a rational religion based on “natural morality.” Fearing social revolution at home, wealthy Americans condemned revolutionary leader Robespierre and his followers for executing King Louis XVI and three thousand aristocrats. Their fears were well founded, because Hamilton’s economic COMPARE AND policies quickly sparked a domes- CONTRAST tic insurgency. In 1794, western How did Jefferson’s idea of Pennsylvania farmers mounted an agrarian republic differ the so-called Whiskey Rebellion from the economic vision to protest Hamilton’s excise tax on put forward by Alexander Hamilton? spirits (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 220). This tax had cut demand for the corn whiskey the farmers distilled and bartered for eastern manufactures. Like the Sons of Liberty in 1765 and the Shaysites in 1786, the Whiskey Rebels assailed the tax collectors who sent the farmers’ hardearned money to a distant government. Protesters waved banners proclaiming the French revolutionary slogan “Liberty, Equality, Fraternity!” To deter popular rebellion and uphold national authority, President Washington raised a militia force of 12,000 troops and dispersed the Whiskey Rebels. Jay’s Treaty Britain’s maritime strategy intensified political divisions in America. Beginning in late 1793, the British navy seized 250 American ships carrying French sugar and other goods. Hoping to protect merchant property through diplomacy, Washington dispatched John Jay to Britain. But Jay returned with a controversial treaty that ignored the American claim that “free ships make free goods” and accepted Britain’s right to stop neutral ships. The treaty also required the U.S. government to make “full and complete compensation” to British merchants for pre–Revolutionary War debts owed by American citizens. In return, the

THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN
The Social Life of Alcohol 
 Alcohol was ubiquitous in post-Revolutionary America. Expensive wines and distilled spirits traveled through the channels of Atlantic trade; molasses was imported from the West Indies and distilled into rum in American port towns; and cider, beer, and whiskey were produced on a small scale everywhere in the countryside. Taverns were centers of social and political activity. Alcohol both mirrored and reinforced the economic and geographical divisions in American life.

 1. James Newport’s ad in the Pennsylvania Gazette, 1790.

JAMES NEWPORT,
At his Wine, Spirit and Cordial Stores, in Second street, at the upper corner of Carter’s alley, has, by Wholesale and Retail, MADEIRA, Sherry, Lisbon, Teneriffe, Malaga, Fayal, and Port Wines, Jamaica spirits, Antigua rum, Philadelphia ditto, Holland gin, Philadelphia ditto, very excellent, in cases, Coniac [sic] brandy, American ditto, good flavor, choice shrub. CORDIALS, &c. Anniseed water, clove water, all-fours, Cinnamon water, prime wine and rum colouring, wine bitters. Spirits of wine. Retail Stores and Tavern-keepers will in particular, find their interest in buying here, the articles being all the best in their kind, and selling at the most reduced prices. Philadelphia, April 30, 1790. 3. Anonymous, The Toast, c. 1810–1815. 
Source: John Nugent Collection, Newburgh, Indiana.




 2. Benjamin Chew on providing alcohol to his slaves, 1794. The instructions of a prominent Philadelphia lawyer and landowner to his overseer about giving rum to his slaves during the harvest.

 I have written . . . to let you have [illegible] Rum & other necessaries for the Harvest. But as these articles are so [illegible] dear I must recommend it to you to be as sparing of them as possible. . . . I must rely on you good man [to conduct] the Business. . . . I would have you let the People have a little Rum — let them be cautious in using too much Spirits during Harvest — it will be well to mix some molasses with water to drink — it is very wholesome & much recommended. . . . I need not caution you that a great deal depends upon your own proper attention to yourself and that you are careful of good Conduct during Harvest.

4. John Lewis Krimmel, Village Tavern, 1814. This
 painting of a postman arriving at a Pennsylvania tavern with letters and newspapers reminds us that taverns were not merely places to drink.

Source: John Lewis Krimmel (American, 1786–1821) Village Tavern, 1813–1814,
 oil on canvas, 167∕8 x 22½ inches, Toledo Museum of Art (Toledo, Ohio) Purchased with funds from the Florence Scott Libbey Bequest in Memory of her Father, Maurice A. Scott. 1954.13. Photo Credit: Photography Incorporated, Toledo.

 5. Public notice from the Pennsylvania Gazette, 1794. Here, a tavern serves as the gathering place for citizens interested in nominating candidates for election to office.

THE INHABITANTS
of the County of Chester, are hereby requested to meet at the Centre house, kept by Abraham Marshall, in West Bradford, on FRIDAY the 10th Day of October next, at 10 o’clock, A. M. in order to form a TICKET for the ensuing Election. 6. Tom the Tinker demands compliance, July 23, 1794. During the Whiskey Rebellion, “Tom the Tinker” pinned this notice to a tree near John Reed’s distillery. Reed had it published in a Pittsburgh newspaper. 
 In taking a survey of the troops under my direction in the late expedition against that insolent exciseman, John Neville, I find there were a great number of delinquents, even among those who carry on distilling. It will, therefore, be observed that I, Tom the Tinker, will not suffer any certain class or set of men to be excluded [from] the service of this my district, when notified to attend on any expedition carried on in order to obstruct the execution of the excise law, and obtain a repeal thereof. And I do declare on my solemn word, that if such delinquents do not come forth on the next alarm, with equipments, and give their assistance in opposing the

 execution and obtaining a repeal of the excise law, he or they will be deemed as enemies and stand opposed to virtuous principles of republican liberty, and shall receive punishment according to the nature of the offense. And whereas, a certain John Reed, now resident in Washington, and being at his place near Pittsburgh, called Reedsburgh, and having a set of stills employed at said Reedsburgh, entered on the excise docket, contrary to the will and good pleasure of his fellow citizens, and came not forth to assist in the suppression of the execution of said law, by aiding and assisting in the late expedition, have, by delinquency, manifested his approbation to the execution of the aforesaid law, is hereby charged forthwith to cause the contents of this paper, without adding or diminishing, to be published in the Pittsburgh Gazette, the ensuing week, under the no less penalty than the consumption of his distillery. Given under my hand, this 19th day of July, one thousand seven hundred and ninety-four. Sources: (1) James Newport, Pennsylvania Gazette, May 5, 1790; (2) Chew Family Papers, Box 773, ff. 25, 10, Historical Society of Pennsylvania; (5) Pennsylvania Gazette, October 1, 1794; (6) Pennsylvania Archives, 2nd ser., 4:61–62 (Harrisburg: E. K. Meyers, State Printer, 1890).

ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1.
Who is the intended audience for an advertisement like James Newport’s (source 1)? How many Atlantic ports of call are represented in the products he advertises? 2. The two paintings (sources 3 and 4), set in the interiors of a private home and a tavern, depict mostly men. What have they gathered for in each case? Village Tavern is set during the War of 1812. How does that fact influence your interpretation of the scene? What do you think the woman and child are doing in the tavern? 3. Village Tavern (source 4) and the ad calling for a political gathering (source 5) both suggest the way that politics and drinking often mixed. How might the fact that taverns were gathering places for political discussion and decision making have influenced outcomes? 4. What concerns does Benjamin Chew express in his correspondence with his overseer (source 2)? Given those worries, why do you think he provides rum to his slaves at all? 5. Tom the Tinker expressed the collective will of whiskey distillers in western Pennsylvania during the Whiskey Rebellion (source 6). Why would it have been important to enforce unanimous action during the uprising? 
PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
Considering everything you know about the trade and consumption of alcohol, social stratification in the early republic, and differences between urban and rural communities, write a short essay that considers the ways in which taverns and alcohol helped unite people in some ways while differentiating or dividing them in others. 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Whiskey Rebellion, 1794
 This painting of Washington reviewing the militia forces that would march against the Whiskey Rebels in western Pennsylvania expresses a Federalist vision of hierarchy (in the form of officers on horseback) and order (represented by the ranks of troops). The reality was messier: militia was called up from four states, but when volunteers were too few the states resorted to a draft, which prompted protests and riots. In the end, the militia force of more than 12,000 men was larger than the Continental army itself through much of the Revolution. Upon its approach, the rebellion evaporated. Twenty-four men were indicted for treason; two were sentenced to hang, but Washington pardoned them to encourage peaceful reconciliation. The Granger Collection, New York.

 agreement allowed Americans to submit claims for illegal seizures and required the British to remove their troops and Indian agents from the Northwest Territory. Despite Republican charges that Jay’s Treaty was too conciliatory, the Senate ratified it in 1795, but only by the two-thirds majority required by the Constitution. As long as the Federalists were in power, the United States would have a pro-British foreign policy.

The Haitian Revolution The French Revolution
 inspired a revolution closer to home that would also impact the United States. The wealthy French plantation colony of Saint-Domingue IDENTIFY CAUSES in the West Indies was deeply How did events abroad divided: a small class of elite plantduring the 1790s sharpen ers stood atop the population of political divisions in the 40,000 free whites and dominated United States? the island’s half million slaves. In

 between, some 28,000 gens de couleur — free men of color — were excluded from most professions, forbidden from taking the names of their white relatives, and prevented from dressing and carrying themselves like whites. The French Revolution intensified conflict between planters and free blacks, giving way to a massive slave uprising in 1791 that aimed to abolish slavery. The uprising touched off years of civil war, along with Spanish and British invasions. In 1798, black Haitians led by Toussaint L’Ouverture — himself a former slave-owning planter — seized control of the country. After five more years of fighting, in 1803 SaintDomingue became the independent nation of Haiti: the first black republic in the Atlantic World. The Haitian Revolution profoundly impacted the United States. In 1793, thousands of refugees — planters, slaves, and free blacks alike — fled the island and traveled to Charleston, Norfolk, Baltimore,

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 horrifying paradox, a perversion of the republican ideal (America Compared, p. 224).

The Rise of Political Parties


Toussaint L’Ouverture, Haitian Revolutionary
 and Statesman The American Revolution of 1776 constituted a victory for republicanism; the Haitian revolt of the 1790s represented a triumph of liberty over slavery and a demand for racial equality. After leading the black army that ousted French planters and British invaders from Haiti, Toussaint formed a constitutional government in 1801. A year later, when French troops invaded the island, he negotiated a treaty that halted Haitian resistance in exchange for a pledge that the French would not reinstate slavery. Subsequently, the French seized Toussaint and imprisoned him in France, where he died in 1803. Snark/Art Resource, NY.

 Philadelphia, and New York, while newspapers detailed the horrors of the unfolding war. Many slaveholders panicked, fearful that the “contagion” of black liberation would undermine their own slave regimes. U.S. policy toward the rebellion presented a knotty problem. The first instinct of the Washington administration was to supply aid to the island’s white population. Adams — strongly antislavery and no friend of France — changed course, aiding the rebels and strengthening commercial ties. Jefferson, though sympathetic to moral arguments against slavery, was himself a southern slaveholder; he was, moreover, an ardent supporter of France. When he became president, he cut off aid to the rebels, imposed a trade embargo, and refused to recognize an independent Haiti. For many Americans, an independent nation of liberated citizen-slaves was a

 The appearance of Federalists and Republicans marked a new stage in American politics — what historians call the First Party System. Colonial legislatures had factions based on family, ethnicity, or region, but they did not have organized political parties. Nor did the new state and national constitutions make any provision for political societies. Indeed, most Americans believed that parties were dangerous because they looked out for themselves rather than serving the public interest. But a shared understanding of the public interest collapsed in the face of sharp conflicts over Hamilton’s fiscal policies. Most merchants and creditors supported the Federalist Party, as did wheat-exporting slaveholders in the Tidewater districts of the Chesapeake. The emerging Republican coalition included southern tobacco and rice planters, debt-conscious western farmers, Germans and Scots-Irish in the southern backcountry, and subsistence farmers in the Northeast. Party identity crystallized in 1796. To prepare for the presidential election, Federalist and Republican leaders called caucuses in Congress and conventions in the states. They also mobilized popular support by organizing public festivals and processions: the Federalists held banquets in February to celebrate Washington’s birthday, and the Republicans marched through the streets on July 4 to honor the Declaration of Independence. In the election, voters gave Federalists a majority in Congress and made John Adams president. Adams continued Hamilton’s pro-British foreign policy and strongly criticized French seizures of American merchant ships. When the French foreign minister Talleyrand solicited a loan and a bribe from American diplomats to stop the seizures, Adams charged that Talleyrand’s agents, whom he dubbed X, Y, and Z, had insulted America’s honor. In response to the XYZ Affair, Congress cut off trade with France in 1798 and authorized American privateering (licensing private ships to seize French vessels). This undeclared maritime war curtailed American trade with the French West Indies and resulted in the capture of nearly two hundred French and American merchant vessels.

The Naturalization, Alien, and Sedition Acts of
 1798 As Federalists became more hostile to the French Republic, they also took a harder line against their Republican critics. When Republican-minded



AMERICA C O M PA R E D
The Haitian Revolution and the Problem of Race 
 The slave uprising on the French island of Saint-Domingue triggered international war, created a refugee crisis, and ended with the creation of a new republic. The American Revolution did all these things as well, yet the United States did not support either the rebellion or the republic of Haiti.

 Savannah City Council’s Resolution in Response to the Haitian Uprising, 1795

 Excerpts from the Constitution of 1801 Established by the Central Assembly of Saint-Domingue

 Whereas, from the mischiefs which the people of St. Domingo, and other French islands, have experienced, from the insurrection of their Negroes and People of Colour, the precautions taken by the people of South Carolina . . . to prevent the importation or landing of any such Negroes or Mulattoes amongst them, and the information the Citizens now assembled have received, that a vessel is now lying at Cockspur, recently from Kingston, with near one hundred Negroes on board, whose landing may be dangerous to the inhabitants of this state, with the daily expectation of many more; therefore, to prevent the evils that may arise from suffering people of this description, under any pretense whatever, from being introduced amongst us, the Citizens pledge themselves unanimously to support the City Council in any salutary measures they may adopt[.]

 Article 1. – Saint-Domingue in its entire expanse, and Samana, La Tortue, La Gonave, Les Cayemites, L’Ile-aVache, La Saone and other adjacent islands form the territory of a single colony, which is part of the French Empire, but ruled under particular laws. . . . Article 3. – There cannot exist slaves on this territory, servitude is therein forever abolished. All men are born, live and die free and French. Article 4. – All men, regardless of color, are eligible to all employment. Article 5. – There shall exist no distinction other than those based on virtue and talent, and other superiority afforded by law in the exercise of a public function. The law is the same for all whether in punishment or in protection.

Source: Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture, Manuscripts, Archives and
 Rare Books Division, Image ID 1243998, digitalgallery.nypl.org.

Source: Haitian Constitution of 1801 (English), The Louverture Project,
 thelouvertureproject.org.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
How does the first document express the fears of American slaveholders? Why do you suppose the Savannah City Council perceived Haitian refugees to be a danger? 
 2. How does the excerpt from the 1801 Constitution echo themes of the American Revolution? What differences do you see? Comparing the second document to the first, how would you say that the two revolutions impacted views of race in Georgia and in Haiti?

 immigrants from Ireland vehemently attacked Adams’s policies, a Federalist pamphleteer responded in kind: “Were I president, I would hang them for otherwise they would murder me.” To silence the critics, the Federalists enacted three coercive laws limiting individual rights and threatening the fledgling party system. The Naturalization Act lengthened the residency requirement for American citizenship from five to fourteen years, the Alien Act authorized the deportation of foreigners, and the Sedition Act prohibited the publication of insults or malicious attacks on the president

 or members of Congress. “He that is not for us is against us,” thundered the Federalist Gazette of the United States. Using the Sedition Act, Federalist prosecutors arrested more than twenty Republican newspaper editors and politicians, accused them of sedition, and convicted and jailed a number of them. This repression sparked a constitutional crisis. Republicans charged that the Sedition Act violated the First Amendment’s prohibition against “abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press.” However, they did not appeal to the Supreme Court because the Court’s

 CHAPTER 7

NORTHWEST TERRITORY

 NISH

 TERRITORY

Candidate


Electoral
Vote


TERR. SOUTH OF THE OHIO RIVER

 ID

OR FL A

 Presidential election maps usually show the strength of each state in the electoral college. The number of electoral votes cast by a state is the sum of the number of its senators (two) and its representatives in the U.S. Congress. States gain or lose representatives depending on their population, as determined each decade by the U.S. census. Consequently, the number of a state’s electoral votes may change over time.



SPA ERRITORY NISH T

NORTHWEST INDIANA TERR. TERR.

Candidate


Electoral
Vote


MISSISSIPPI TERRITORY

A


 ID

 OR

 FL

 The “Revolution of 1800” The campaign of 1800 degenerated into a bitter, no-holds-barred contest. The Federalists launched personal attacks on Jefferson, branding him an irresponsible pro-French radical and, because he opposed state support of religion in Virginia, “the arch-apostle of irreligion and free thought.” Both parties changed state election laws to favor their candidates, and rumors circulated of a Federalist plot to stage a military coup. The election did not end these worries. Thanks to a low Federalist turnout in Virginia and Pennsylvania and the three-fifths rule (which boosted electoral votes in the southern states), Jefferson won a narrow 73-to-65 victory over Adams in the electoral college. However, the Republican electors also gave 73 votes to Aaron Burr of New York, who was Jefferson’s vicepresidential running mate (Map 7.1). The Constitution specified that in the case of a tie vote, the House of Representatives would choose between the candidates. For thirty-five rounds of balloting, Federalists in the House blocked Jefferson’s election, prompting rumors that Virginia would raise a military force to put him into office. Ironically, arch-Federalist Alexander Hamilton ushered in a more democratic era by supporting Jefferson. Calling Burr an “embryo Caesar” and the “most unfit man in the United States for the office of president,” Hamilton persuaded key Federalists to allow Jefferson’s election. The Federalists’ concern for political stability also played a role. As Senator James Bayard of Delaware explained, “It was admitted on all

 Presidential elections quickly became a central focus of American political life. Political leaders used mental maps to envision those areas likely to support various candidates and to map their election strategies accordingly.



 SPA

 power to review congressional legislation was uncertain and because most of the justices were Federalists. Instead, Madison and Jefferson looked to the state legislatures. At their urging, the Kentucky and Virginia legislatures issued resolutions in 1798 declaring the Alien and Sedition Acts to be “unauthoritative, void, and of no force.” The Virginia and Kentucky Resolutions set forth a states’ rights interpretation of the Constitution, asserting that the states had a “right to judge” the legitimacy of national laws. The conflict over the Sedition Act set the stage for the presidential election of 1800. Jefferson, once opposed on principle to political parties, now asserted that they could “watch and relate to the people” the activities of an oppressive government. Meanwhile, John Adams reevaluated his foreign policy. Rejecting Hamilton’s advice to declare war against France (and benefit from the resulting upsurge in patriotism), Adams put country ahead of party and used diplomacy to end the maritime conflict.

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 States may cast their electoral votes either by district (as, for example, in North Carolina) or as a single statewide total. When Thomas Jefferson and Aaron Burr both received 73 electoral votes, the House of Representatives decided which one would be president.

 MAP 7.1 The Presidential Elections of 1796 and 1800 Both elections pitted Federalist John Adams of Massachusetts against Republican Thomas Jefferson of Virginia, and both saw voters split along regional lines. Adams carried every New England state and, reflecting Federalist strength in maritime and commercial areas, the eastern districts of the Middle Atlantic states; Jefferson won most of the agricultural-based states of the South and West (Kentucky and Tennessee). New York was the pivotal swing state. It gave its 12 electoral votes to Adams in 1796 and, thanks to the presence of Aaron Burr on the Republican ticket, bestowed them on Jefferson in 1800.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 hands that we must risk the Constitution and a Civil War or take Mr. Jefferson.” Why did Jefferson consider Jefferson called the election his election in 1800 to be the “Revolution of 1800,” and so it revolutionary? was. The bloodless transfer of power showed that popularly elected governments could be changed in an orderly way, even in times of bitter partisan conflict. In his inaugural address in 1801, Jefferson praised this achievement, declaring, “We are all Republicans, we are all Federalists.”

UNDERSTAND POINTS OF VIEW

A
Republican Empire Is Born  In the Treaty of Paris of 1783, Great Britain gave up its claims to the trans-Appalachian region and, said one British diplomat, left the Indian nations “to the care of their [American] neighbours.” Care was hardly the right word: many white Americans wanted to destroy native communities. “Cut up every Indian Cornfield and burn every Indian town,” proclaimed Congressman William Henry Drayton of South Carolina, so that their “nation be extirpated and the lands become the property of the public.” Other leaders, including Henry Knox, Washington’s first secretary of war, favored assimilating native peoples into Euro-American society. Knox proposed the division of tribal lands among individual Indian families, who would become citizens of the various states. Indians resisted both forms of domination and fought to retain control of their lands and cultures. In the ensuing struggle, the United States emerged as an expansive power, determined to control the future of the continent.

Sham Treaties and Indian Lands
 As in the past, the major struggle between natives and Europeans centered on land rights. Invoking the Paris treaty and regarding Britain’s Indian allies as conquered peoples, the U.S. government asserted both sovereignty over and ownership of the transAppalachian west. Indian nations rejected both claims, pointing out they had not been conquered and had not signed the Paris treaty. “Our lands are our life and our breath,” declared Creek PLACE EVENTS chief Hallowing King; “if we part IN CONTEXT with them, we part with our Why did the United States blood.” Brushing aside such go to war against western objections and threatening miliIndians so quickly after the tary action, U.S. commissioners Revolution? forced the pro-British Iroquois

 peoples — Mohawks, Onondagas, Cayugas, and Senecas — to cede huge tracts in New York and Pennsylvania in the Treaty of Fort Stanwix (1784). New York land speculators used liquor and bribes to take a million more acres, confining the once powerful Iroquois to reservations — essentially colonies of subordinate peoples. American negotiators used similar tactics to grab Ohio Valley lands. At the Treaties of Fort McIntosh (1785) and Fort Finney (1786), they pushed the Chippewas, Delawares, Ottawas, Wyandots, and Shawnees to cede most of the future state of Ohio. The tribes quickly repudiated the agreements, justifiably claiming they were made under duress. Recognizing the failure of these agreements, American negotiators arranged for a comprehensive agreement at Fort Harmar (1789), but it, too, failed. To defend their lands, these tribes joined with the Miami and Potawatomi Indians to form the Western Confederacy. Led by Miami chief Little Turtle, confederacy warriors crushed American expeditionary forces sent by President Washington in 1790 and 1791.

 The Treaty of Greenville Fearing an alliance between the Western Confederacy and the British in Canada, Washington doubled the size of the U.S. Army and ordered General “Mad Anthony” Wayne to lead a new expedition. In August 1794, Wayne defeated the confederacy in the Battle of Fallen Timbers (near present-day Toledo, Ohio). However, continuing Indian resistance forced a compromise. In the Treaty of Greenville (1795), American negotiators acknowledged Indian ownership of the land, and, in return for various payments, the Western Confederacy ceded most of Ohio (Map 7.2). The Indian peoples also agreed to accept American sovereignty, placing themselves “under the protection of the United States, and no other Power whatever.” These American advances caused Britain to agree, in Jay’s Treaty (1795), to reduce its trade and military aid to Indians in the trans-Appalachian region. The Greenville treaty sparked a wave of white migration. Kentucky already had a population of 73,000 in 1790, and in 1792 it was admitted to the Union as the fifteenth state (Vermont entered a year earlier). By 1800, more than 375,000 people had moved into the Ohio and Tennessee valleys; in 1805, the new state of Ohio alone had more than 100,000 residents. Thousands more farm families moved into the future states of Indiana and Illinois, sparking new conflicts with native peoples over land and hunting rights. Between 1790 and 1810, farm families settled as much

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 MAP 7.2 CANADA

 MAINE

L.
Superior 

Red River
Basin


Ft. Michilimackinac


DAKOTA (SIOUX)

 KICKAPOO

 i R. ur

Misso


NEBAGO WIN L.
Michigan 
 FOX

(


VT. L.
ron Hu 
 SAUK

 o n t a ri L. O

(Ft. Niagara


MICH. POTAWATOMI
Ft. Detroit ( 
L.


 CONN.

Lexington


 DEL.

S


N.C.


ATLANTIC OCEAN

 se

 CH

 es

 sip p

I


Te


 nn

 i R.

U


 ARK.

S.C.


I


A


 CADDO

 s sis

S


CHICKASAW MISS. ALA. 1817 '
Horseshoe CHOCTAW Bend NATCHEZ 
 WICHITA

N
A


 LA.

GA. CREEK

Indian Cessions


Natchez


Before 1784
1784–1820


MOBILE TIMUCUA

New Orleans


'


(


Gulf of Mexico
 SEMINOLE

 MEXICO

 land as they had during the entire colonial period. The United States “is a country in flux,” a visiting French aristocrat observed in 1799, and “that which is true today as regards its population, its establishments, its prices, its commerce will not be true six months from now.”

 Assimilation Rejected To dampen further conflicts, the U.S. government encouraged Native Americans to assimilate into white society. The goal, as one Kentucky Protestant minister put it, was to make the Indian “a farmer, a citizen of the United States, and a Christian.” Most Indians rejected wholesale assimilation; even those who joined Christian churches retained many ancestral values and religious beliefs. To think of themselves as individuals or members of a nuclear family, as white Americans were demanding, meant repudiating the clan, the very essence of Indian life. To preserve “the old Indian way,” many native communities expelled white missionaries and forced Christianized Indians to participate in tribal rites. As a Munsee prophet declared, “There are two ways to God, one for the whites and one for the Indians.”





E
W


 VA.

 SH

 QUAPAW

N


N.J.
 MD.

C


O


 OSAGE

N.Y.


 MASS.

 PA.

KY. AWN HI E EE . E
e R Y U OK TENN. R E 
 MO.

Ft. Stanwix


R.I.


MI AM I

St. Louis


 ARAPAHO

 IND. . oR O hi

 ILL.

N.H.


(


 ie Er

Fallen Timbers
1794'
 Harmar's Defeat' OHIO ' 1803 ERIE St. Clair's Tippecanoe ' Defeat ILLINOIS

 IOWA

 PAWNEE

L


 By virtue of the Treaty of Paris (1783) with Britain, the United States claimed sovereignty over the entire trans-Appalachian west. The Western Confederacy contested this claim, but the U.S. government upheld it with military force. By 1840, armed diplomacy had forced most Native American peoples to move west of the Mississippi River. White settlers occupied their lands, formed territorial governments, and eventually entered the Union as members of separate — and equal — states. By 1860, the trans-Appalachian region constituted an important economic and political force in American national life.

 To U.S. from Britain by Treaty of 1818

Mi


Indian Cessions and State Formation,
1776–1840


 500 miles 500 kilometers

After 1820
Battle
Fort
Treaty of Paris,
Greenville Treaty,


 A few Indian leaders sought a middle path in which new beliefs overlapped with old practices. Among the Senecas, the prophet Handsome Lake encouraged traditional animistic rituals that gave thanks to the sun, the earth, water, plants, and animals. But he included Christian elements in his teachings — the concepts of heaven and hell and an emphasis on personal morality — to deter his followers from alcohol, gambling, and witchcraft. Handsome Lake’s teachings divided the Senecas into hostile factions. Led by Chief Red Jacket, traditionalists condemned European culture as evil and demanded a complete return to ancestral ways. Most Indians also rejected the efforts of American missionaries to turn warriors into farmers and women into domestic helpmates. Among eastern woodland peoples, women grew corn, beans, and squash — the mainstays of the Indians’ diet — and land cultivation rights passed through the female line. Consequently, women exercised considerable political influence, which they were eager to retain. Nor were Indian men interested in becoming farmers. When war raiding and hunting were no longer possible, many turned to grazing cattle and sheep.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Treaty Negotiations at Greenville, 1795
 In 1785, Indian tribes in the Northwest Territory formed the Western Confederacy to prevent white settlement north of the Ohio River. After Indian triumphs in battles in the early 1790s, an American victory at the Battle of Fallen Timbers (1794) and the subsequent Treaty of Greenville (1795) opened up the region for white farmers. However, the treaty recognized many Indian rights because it was negotiated between relative equals on the battlefield. The artist suggests this equality: notice the height and stately bearing of the Indian leaders — ninety of whom signed the document — and their placement slightly in front of General Anthony Wayne and his officers. Chicago History Museum.

Migration and the Changing
Farm Economy
 Native American resistance slowed the advance of white settlers but did not stop it. Nothing “short of a Chinese Wall, or a line of Troops,” Washington declared, “will restrain . . . the Incroachment of Settlers, upon the Indian Territory.” During the 1790s, two great streams of migrants moved out of the southern states (Map 7.3).

 Southern Migrants One stream, composed primarily of white tenant farmers and struggling yeomen families, flocked through the Cumberland Gap into

 Kentucky and Tennessee. “Boundless settlements open a door for our citizens to run off and leave us,” a worried Maryland landlord lamented, “depreciating all our landed property and disabling us from paying taxes.” In fact, many migrants were fleeing from this plantercontrolled society. They wanted more freedom and hoped to prosper by growing cotton and hemp, which were in great demand. Many settlers in Kentucky and Tennessee lacked ready cash to buy land. Like the North Carolina Regulators in the 1770s, poorer migrants claimed a customary right to occupy “back waste vacant Lands” sufficient “to provide a subsistence to themselves and their Posterity.” Virginia legislators, who administered

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820




 MAP 7.3 a

St.
L


 NT

 KENTUCKY

A


R.


Te n
 nessee

 ALABAMA

 LOUISIANA

Po MD.
 t DEL. R.

N
E
W
S


 IA

C


H


N.C.


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

S.C.


 GA.



 200 miles

 200 kilometers

Cultural Core Areas
FLORIDA TERRITORY 1819–1845

Gulf of Mexico


R.I.


N.J.


 VA.

 tahoochee R. Chat

 MISS.

 PA.

MASS. CONN.

 LA

P


ARKANSAS TERRITORY 1819–1824

 PA

 TENNESSEE

R.


N.Y.


U
O


 o

R.


Cumberland
Gap


Arkansas


 NS

 OHIO

 AI

L.
Mic  hig a O hi

 i R.

 ntar i o

 r ie L. E

M


 ou r

 INDIANA

L. O


 ac om

Mi
 ss

 ME.

VT. N.H.

L.


 n

MICHIGAN TERRITORY 1818–1834

 ILLINOIS

 c

N


MISSOURI TERRITORY

 en wr

R.
 dson Hu

 iss iss ip

 ron Hu

M


 eR

 CANADA

L.
Superior 

R.
 pi

 By 1790, four core cultures had developed in the long-settled states along the Atlantic seaboard. Between 1790 and 1820, migrants from these four regions carried their cultures into the trans-Appalachian west. New England customs and institutions were a dominant influence in upstate New York and along the Great Lakes, while the Lower South’s hierarchical system of slavery and heavy concentration of African Americans shaped the character of the new states along the Gulf of Mexico. The pattern of cultural diffusion was more complex in the Ohio and Tennessee river valleys, which were settled by migrants from various core regions.

.


Regional Cultures Move West,
1790–1820


New England
Mid-Atlantic
Chesapeake
Lower South
 Direction of cultural diffusion

 the Kentucky Territory, had a more elitist vision. Although they allowed poor settlers to buy up to 1,400 acres of land at reduced prices, they sold or granted huge tracts of 100,000 acres to twenty-one groups of speculators and leading men. In 1792, this landed elite owned one-fourth of the state, while half the white men owned no land and lived as quasi-legal squatters or tenant farmers. Widespread landlessness — and opposition to slavery — prompted a new migration across the Ohio River into the future states of Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois. In a free community, thought Peter Cartwright, a Methodist lay preacher from southwestern Kentucky who moved to Illinois, “I would be entirely clear of the evil of slavery . . . [and] could raise my children to work where work was not thought a degradation.” Yet land distribution in Ohio was almost exactly as unequal as in Kentucky: in 1810, a quarter of its real estate was owned by 1 percent of the population, while more than half of its white men were landless. Meanwhile, a second stream of southern planters and slaves from the Carolinas moved along the coastal plain toward the Gulf of Mexico. Some set up new

 estates in the interior of Georgia and South Carolina, while others moved into the future states of Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana. “The Alabama Feaver rages here with great violence,” a North Carolina planter remarked, “and has carried off vast numbers of our Citizens.” Cotton was the key to this migratory surge. Around 1750, the demand for raw wool and cotton increased dramatically as water-powered spinning jennies, weaving mules, and other technological innovations of the Industrial IDENTIFY CAUSES Revolution boosted textile pro- Why were westward duction in England. South Caro- migration and agricullina and Georgia planters began tural improvement so growing cotton, and American widespread in the late inventors, including Connecticut- eighteenth and early nineborn Eli Whitney, built machines teenth centuries? (called gins) that efficiently extracted seeds from its strands. To grow more cotton, white planters imported about 115,000 Africans between 1776 and 1808, when Congress cut off the Atlantic slave trade. The cotton boom financed the rapid settlement of Mississippi and Alabama — in a



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

An Indian Log House in Georgia, 1791
 The Indian peoples of the southeastern United States — the Cherokees, Creeks, Choctaws, and Chickasaws — quickly adopted European practices that fit easily into their relatively settled, agricultural-based way of life. This sturdy Creek log cabin was based on a Scots-Irish or German design and sat adjacent to the family’s cornfields, visible in the background. Library of Congress.

 single year, a government land office in Huntsville, Alabama, sold $7 million of uncleared land — and the two states entered the Union in 1817 and 1819, respectively.

 Exodus from New England As southerners moved across the Appalachians and along the Gulf Coast, a third stream of migrants flowed out of the overcrowded communities of New England. Previous generations of Massachusetts and Connecticut farm families had moved north and east, settling New Hampshire, Vermont, and Maine. Now New England farmers moved west. Seeking land for their children, thousands of parents migrated to New York. “The town of Herkimer,” noted one traveler, “is entirely populated by families come from Connecticut.” By 1820, almost 800,000 New Englanders lived in a string of settlements stretching from Albany to Buffalo, and many others had traveled on to Ohio and Indiana. Soon, much of the Northwest Territory consisted of New England communities that had moved inland. In New York, as in Kentucky and Ohio, wellconnected speculators snapped up much of the best land, leasing farms to tenants for a fee. Imbued with the “homestead” ethic, many New England families

 preferred to buy farms. They signed contracts with the Holland Land Company, a Dutch-owned syndicate of speculators, that allowed settlers to pay for their farms as they worked them, or moved west again in an elusive search for land on easy terms.

 Innovation on Eastern Farms The new farm economy in New York, Ohio, and Kentucky forced major changes in eastern agriculture. Unable to compete with lower-priced western grains, farmers in New England switched to potatoes, which were high yielding and nutritious. To make up for the labor of sons and daughters who had moved inland, Middle Atlantic farmers bought more efficient farm equipment. They replaced metal-tipped wooden plows with cast-iron models that dug deeper and required a single yoke of oxen instead of two. Such changes in crop mix and technology kept production high. Easterners also adopted the progressive farming methods touted by British agricultural reformers. “Improvers” in Pennsylvania doubled their average yield per acre by rotating their crops. Yeomen farmers raised sheep and sold the wool to textile manufacturers. Many farmers adopted a year-round planting cycle, sowing corn in the spring for animal fodder and then

 CHAPTER 7

 planting winter wheat in September for market sale. Women and girls milked the family cows and made butter and cheese to sell in the growing towns and cities. Whether hacking fields out of western forests or carting manure to replenish eastern soils, farmers now worked harder and longer, but their increased productivity brought them a better standard of living. European demand for American produce was high in these years, and westward migration — the settlement and exploitation of Indian lands — boosted the farming economy throughout the country.

The Jefferson Presidency
 From 1801 to 1825, three Republicans from Virginia — Thomas Jefferson, James Madison, and James Monroe — each served two terms as president. Supported by farmers in the South and West and strong Republican majorities in Congress, this “Virginia Dynasty” completed what Jefferson had called the Revolution of 1800. It reversed many Federalist policies and actively supported westward expansion. When Jefferson took office in 1801, he inherited an old international conflict. Beginning in the 1780s, the Barbary States of North Africa had raided merchant ships in the Mediterranean, and like many European nations, the United States had paid an annual bribe — massive in relation to the size of the federal budget — to protect its vessels. Initially Jefferson refused to pay this “tribute” and ordered the U.S. Navy to attack the pirates’ home ports. After four years of intermittent fighting, in which the United States bombarded Tripoli and captured the city of Derna, the Jefferson administration cut its costs. It signed a peace treaty that included a ransom for returned prisoners, and Algerian ships were soon taking American sailors hostage again. At home, Jefferson inherited a national judiciary filled with Federalist appointees, including the formidable John Marshall of Virginia, the new chief justice of the Supreme Court. To add more Federalist judges, the outgoing Federalist Congress had passed the Judiciary Act of 1801. The act created sixteen new judgeships and various other positions, which President Adams filled at the last moment with “midnight appointees.” The Federalists “have retired into the judiciary as a stronghold,” Jefferson complained, “and from that battery all the works of Republicanism are to be beaten down and destroyed.” Jefferson’s fears were soon realized. When Republican legislatures in Kentucky and Virginia repudiated the Alien and Sedition Acts as unconstitutional,

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 Marshall declared that only the Supreme Court held the power of constitutional review. The Court claimed this authority for itself when James Madison, the new secretary of state, refused to deliver the commission of William Marbury, one of Adams’s midnight appointees. In Marbury v. Madison (1803), Marshall asserted that Marbury had the right to the appointment but that the Court did not have the constitutional power to enforce it. In defining the Court’s powers, Marshall voided a section of the Judiciary Act of 1789, in effect asserting the Court’s authority to review congressional legislation and interpret the Constitution. “It is emphatically the province and duty of the judicial department to say what the law is,” the chief justice declared, directly challenging the Republican view that the state legislatures had that power. Ignoring this setback, Jefferson and the Republicans reversed other Federalist policies. When the Alien and Sedition Acts expired in 1801, Congress branded them unconstitutional and refused to extend them. It also amended the Naturalization Act, restoring the original waiting period of five years for resident aliens to become citizens. Charging the Federalists with grossly expanding the national government’s size and power, Jefferson had the Republican Congress shrink it. He abolished all internal taxes, including the excise tax that had sparked the Whiskey Rebellion of 1794. To quiet Republican fears of a military coup, Jefferson reduced the size of the permanent army. He also secured repeal of the Judiciary Act of 1801, ousting forty of Adams’s midnight appointees. Still, Jefferson retained competent Federalist officeholders, removing only 69 of 433 properly appointed Federalists during his eight years as president. Jefferson likewise governed tactfully in fiscal affairs. He tolerated the economically important Bank of the United States, which he had once condemned as unconstitutional. But he chose as his secretary of the treasury Albert Gallatin, a fiscal conservative who believed that the national debt was “an evil of the first magnitude.” By limiting expenditures and using customs revenue to redeem government bonds, Gallatin reduced the debt from $83 million in 1801 to $45 million in 1812. With Jefferson and Gallatin at the helm, the nation’s fiscal affairs were no longer run in the interests of northeastern creditors and merchants.

Jefferson and the West
 Jefferson had long championed settlement of the West. He celebrated the yeoman farmer in Notes on the State of Virginia (1785); wrote one of the Confederation’s





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

America in the Middle East, 1804
 To protect American merchants from capture and captivity in the Barbary States, President Thomas Jefferson sent in the U.S. Navy. This 1846 lithograph, created by the famous firm of Currier & Ives, depicts one of the three attacks on the North African port of Tripoli by Commodore Edward Preble in August 1804. As the USS Constitution and other large warships lob shells into the city, small American gunboats defend the fleet from Tripolitan gunboats. “Our loss in Killed & Wounded has been considerable,” Preble reported, and “the Enemy must have suffered very much . . . among their Shipping and on shore.” The Granger Collection, New York.

 western land ordinances; and supported Pinckney’s Treaty (1795), the agreement between the United States and Spain that reopened the Mississippi River to American trade and allowed settlers to export crops via the Spanish-held port of New Orleans. As president, Jefferson pursued policies that made it easier for farm families to acquire land. In 1796, a Federalist-dominated Congress had set the price of land in the national domain at $2 per acre; by the 1830s, Jefferson-inspired Republican Congresses had enacted more than three hundred laws that cut the cost to $1.25, eased credit terms, and allowed illegal squatters to buy their farms. Eventually, in the Homestead Act of 1862, Congress gave farmsteads to settlers for free.

 The Louisiana Purchase International events challenged Jefferson’s vision of westward expansion. In

 1799, Napoleon Bonaparte seized power in France and sought to reestablish France’s American empire. In 1801, he coerced Spain into signing a secret treaty that returned Louisiana to France and restricted American access to New Orleans, violating Pinckney’s Treaty. Napoleon also launched an invasion to restore French rule in Saint-Domingue. It was once the richest sugar colony in the Americas, but its civil war had ruined the economy and cost France a fortune. Napoleon wanted to crush the rebellion, restore its planter class, and “destroy the new Algiers that has been growing up in the middle of America.” Napoleon’s actions in Haiti and Louisiana prompted Jefferson to question his pro-French foreign policy. “The day that France takes possession of New Orleans, we must marry ourselves to the British fleet and nation,” the president warned, dispatching James Monroe to

 CHAPTER 7

 Britain to negotiate an alliance. To keep the Mississippi River open to western farmers, Jefferson told Robert Livingston, the American minister in Paris, to negotiate the purchase of New Orleans. Jefferson’s diplomacy yielded a magnificent prize: the entire territory of Louisiana. By 1802, the French invasion of Saint-Domingue was faltering in the face of disease and determined black resistance, a new war threatened in Europe, and Napoleon feared an American invasion of Louisiana. Acting with characteristic decisiveness, the French ruler offered to sell the entire territory of Louisiana for $15 million (about $500 million today). “We have lived long,” Livingston remarked to Monroe as they concluded the Louisiana Purchase in 1803, “but this is the noblest work of our lives.” The Louisiana Purchase forced Jefferson to reconsider his strict interpretation of the Constitution. He had long believed that the national government possessed only the powers expressly delegated to it in the Constitution, but there was no provision for adding new territory. So Jefferson pragmatically accepted a loose interpretation of the Constitution and used its treaty-making powers to complete the deal with France. The new western lands, Jefferson wrote, would be “a means of tempting all our Indians on the East side of the Mississippi to remove to the West.”

 Secessionist Schemes The acquisition of Louisiana brought new political problems. Some New England Federalists, fearing that western expansion would hurt their region and party, talked openly of leaving the Union and forming a confederacy of northeastern states. The secessionists won the support of Aaron Burr, the ambitious vice president. After Alexander Hamilton accused Burr of planning to destroy the Union, the two fought an illegal pistol duel that led to Hamilton’s death. This tragedy propelled Burr into another secessionist scheme, this time in the Southwest. When his term as vice president ended in 1805, Burr moved west to avoid prosecution. There, he conspired with General James Wilkinson, the military governor of the Louisiana Territory, either to seize territory in New Spain or to establish Louisiana as a separate nation. But Wilkinson, himself a Spanish spy and incipient traitor, betrayed Burr and arrested him. In a highly politicized trial presided over by Chief Justice John Marshall, the jury acquitted Burr of treason. The Louisiana Purchase had increased party conflict and generated secessionist schemes in both New England and the Southwest. Such sectional differences

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 would continue, challenging Madison’s argument in “Federalist No. 10” that a large and diverse republic was more stable than a small one.



EXPLAIN CONSEQUENCES
How was Jefferson’s agrarian vision reflected in his policies affecting western lands? 
Lewis and Clark Meet the
 Mandans and Sioux A scientist as well as a statesman, Jefferson wanted information about Louisiana: its physical features, plant and animal life, and native peoples. He was also worried about intruders: the British-run Hudson’s Bay Company and Northwest Company were actively trading for furs on the upper Missouri River. So in 1804, Jefferson sent his personal secretary, Meriwether Lewis, to explore the region with William Clark, an army officer. From St. Louis, Lewis, Clark, and their party of American soldiers and frontiersmen traveled up the Missouri for 1,000 miles to the fortified, earth-lodge towns of the Mandan and Hidatsa peoples (near present-day Bismarck, North Dakota), where they spent the winter. The Mandans lived primarily by horticulture, growing corn, beans, and squash. They had acquired horses by supplying food to nomadic Plains Indians and secured guns, iron goods, and textiles by selling buffalo hides and dried meat to European traders. However, the Mandans (and neighboring Arikaras) had been hit hard by the smallpox epidemics that swept across the Great Plains in 1779–1781 and 1801–1802. Now they were threatened by Sioux peoples: Tetons, Yanktonais, and Oglalas. Originally, the Sioux had lived in the prairie and lake region of northern Minnesota. As their numbers rose and fish and game grew scarce, the Sioux moved westward, acquired horses, and hunted buffalo, living as nomads in portable skin tepees. The Sioux became ferocious fighters who tried to reduce the Mandans and other farming tribes to subject peoples. According to Lewis and Clark, they were the “pirates of the Missouri.” Soon the Sioux would dominate the buffalo trade throughout the upper Missouri region. In the spring of 1805, Lewis and Clark began an epic 1,300-mile trek into unknown country. Their party now included Toussaint Charbonneau, a French Canadian fur trader, and his Shoshone wife, Sacagawea, who served as a guide and translator. After following the Missouri River to its source on the Idaho-Montana border, they crossed the Rocky Mountains, and — venturing far beyond the Louisiana Purchase — traveled down the Columbia River to the Pacific Ocean. Nearly everywhere, Indian peoples asked for guns so they could defend themselves from other armed tribes.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

A
Mandan Village  This Mandan settlement in North Dakota, painted by George Catlin around 1837, resembled those in which the Lewis and Clark expedition spent the winter of 1804– 1805. Note the palisade of logs that surrounds the village, as protection from the Sioux and other marauding Plains peoples, and the solidly built mud lodges that provided warm shelter from the bitter cold of winter. Smithsonian American Art Museum, Washington, D.C./Art Resource, NY.

 In 1806, Lewis and Clark capped off their pathbreaking expedition by providing Jefferson with the first maps of the immense wilderness and a detailed account of its natural resources and inhabitants (Map 7.4). Their report prompted some Americans to envision a nation that would span the continent.

The War of 1812 and the
Transformation of Politics
 The Napoleonic Wars that ravaged Europe after 1802 brought new attacks on American merchant ships. American leaders struggled desperately to protect the nation’s commerce while avoiding war. When this effort finally failed, it sparked dramatic political changes that destroyed the Federalist Party and split the Republicans into National and Jeffersonian factions.

Conflict in the Atlantic and the West
 As Napoleon conquered European countries, he cut off their commerce with Britain and seized American merchant ships that stopped in British ports. The British ministry responded with a naval blockade and seized American vessels carrying sugar and molasses from the French West Indies. The British navy also searched American merchant ships for British deserters and used these raids to replenish its crews, a practice

 known as impressment. Between 1802 and 1811, British naval officers impressed nearly 8,000 sailors, including many U.S. citizens. In 1807, American anger boiled over when a British warship attacked the U.S. Navy vessel Chesapeake, killing three, wounding eighteen, and seizing four alleged deserters. “Never since the battle of Lexington have I seen this country in such a state of exasperation as at present,” Jefferson declared.

 The Embargo of 1807 To protect American interests, Jefferson pursued a policy of peaceful coercion. The Embargo Act of 1807 prohibited American ships from leaving their home ports until Britain and France stopped restricting U.S. trade. A drastic maneuver, the embargo overestimated the reliance of Britain and France on American shipping and underestimated the resistance of merchants, who feared the embargo would ruin them. In fact, the embargo cut the American gross national product by 5 percent and weakened the entire economy. Exports plunged from $108 million in 1806 to $22 million in 1808, hurting farmers as well as merchants. “All was noise and bustle” in New York City before the embargo, one visitor remarked; afterward, everything was closed up as if “a malignant fever was raging in the place.” Despite popular discontent over the embargo, voters elected Republican James Madison to the presidency in 1808. A powerful advocate for the Constitution, the architect of the Bill of Rights, and a prominent congressman and party leader, Madison

 CHAPTER 7

 BRITISH

 CANADA

GROS VENTRE

ME. (MASS.)

 pe L. Su rior Colum bia R.

 CROW

 FOX

M
 is SANTEE SIOUX

R.


 KICKAPOO

 IOWA

LOUISIANA PURCHASE

Taos
Santa Fe


(


A


I


 U.S. nationals per sq. mile 18 to 45 Over 45

Explorers’ Routes


Ar
 kan s as

( El Paso


R.


N.J.
 MD.

N
W


N.C.


S


S.C.


 GA.

A TLANTI C OCEAN

 CREEK

Gulf of Mexico






 DEL.

E


S PA N I S H


 COAHUILA

Lewis and Clark, 1804–1806
Pike, 1805–1806
Pike, 1806–1807
Missions
( Forts


 PA.

I EE
CH OK YU ER CH

New Orleans


San Antonio


TIMUCUA FL O R ID

A


 SEMINOLE

 500 miles 500 kilometers

 CUBA

 MAP 7.4 U.S. Population Density in 1803 and the Louisiana Purchase When the United States purchased Louisiana from France in 1803, much of the land to its east — the vast territory between the Appalachian Mountains and the Mississippi River — remained in Indian hands. The equally vast lands beyond the Mississippi were virtually unknown to Anglo-Americans, even after the epic explorations of Meriwether Lewis and William Clark. Still, President Jefferson predicted quite accurately that the huge Mississippi River Valley “from its fertility . . . will ere long yield half of our whole produce, and contain half of our whole population.”

 had served the nation well. But John Beckley, a loyal Republican, worried that Madison would be “too timid and indecisive as a statesman,” and events proved him right. Acknowledging the embargo’s failure, Madison replaced it with new economic restrictions, which also failed to protect American commerce.

 Western War Hawks Republican congressmen from the West were certain that Britain was the primary offender. They pointed to its trade with Indians in the Ohio River Valley in violation of the Treaty of Paris and Jay’s Treaty. Bolstered by British guns and supplies, the Shawnee war chief Tecumseh revived the Western Confederacy in 1809. His brother, the prophet Tenskwatawa, provided the confederacy with a powerful nativist ideology. He urged Indian peoples to shun

 MASS.

R.I.
 CONN.

CHOCTAW NATCHEZ

Nacogdoches


Chihuahua


 TENN.

MISSISSIPPI TERRITORY

TEXAS
Rio G ra 
N.H.
N.Y.


 VA.

 CHICKASAW

 WICHITA

 e nd

Under 2
2 to 18


 KIOWA

N


Population Density, 1800


 OSAGE

Red R.


P


( San Diego


 lo Co

 io

 OHIO

St. Louis
.
 oR Ohi SH KY. AW NE E

R.


S


(Santa Barbara
( Los Angeles


W


San Luis Obispo


 do ra

 ILLINOIS

 KANSA

 ie Er L.

 ntar

 ERIE

.


E


ALTA CALIFORNIA

INDIANA TERRITORY

Mis
 sissi ppi R

N


( San Francisco


PACIFIC O CE A N

 MISSOURI

 ARAPAHO

L. O


 POTAWATOMI

MI AM I

 CHEYENNE

R.


WINNEBAGO L.
Michigan 
 SAUK

 uri so

Snake


 VT.

L.
 ron Hu

 OREGON (Claimed by Britain, Spain, and the United States)



Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


 Americans, “the children of the Evil Spirit . . . who have taken away your lands”; renounce alcohol; and return to traditional ways. The Shawnee leaders found their greatest support among Kickapoo, Potawatomi, Winnebago, Ottawa, and Chippewa warriors: Indians of the western Great Lakes who had so far been largely shielded from the direct effects of U.S. westward expansion. They flocked to Tenskwatawa’s holy village, Prophetstown, in the Indiana Territory. As Tecumseh mobilized the western Indian peoples for war, William Henry Harrison, the governor of the Indiana Territory, decided on a preemptive strike. In November 1811, when Tecumseh went south to seek support from the Chickasaws, Choctaws, and Creeks, Harrison took advantage of his absence and attacked Prophetstown. The governor’s 1,000 troops



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Tenskwatawa, “The Prophet,” 1830
 Tenskwatawa added a spiritual dimension to Native American resistance by urging a holy war against the invading whites and calling for a return to sacred ancestral ways. His dress reflects his teachings: note the animal-skin shirt and the heavily ornamented ears. However, some of Tenskwatawa’s religious rituals reflected the influence of French Jesuits; he urged his followers to finger a sacred string of beads (such as those in his left hand) that were similar to the Catholic rosary, thereby “shaking hands with the Prophet.” Whatever its origins, Tenskwatawa’s message transcended the cultural differences among Indian peoples and helped his brother Tecumseh create a formidable political and military alliance. Smithsonian American Art Museum, Washington, D.C./Art Resource.

 and militiamen traded heavy casualties with the confederacy’s warriors at the Battle of Tippecanoe and then destroyed the holy village. With Britain assisting Indians in the western territories and seizing American ships in the Atlantic, Henry Clay of Kentucky, the new Speaker of the House of Representatives, and John C. Calhoun, a rising young congressman from South Carolina, pushed Madison toward war. Like other Republican “war hawks” from the West and South, they wanted to seize territory in British Canada and Spanish Florida. With national elections approaching, Madison issued an ultimatum to Britain. When Britain failed to respond quickly, the president asked Congress for a declaration of war. In June 1812, a sharply divided Senate voted 19 to 13 for war, and the House of Representatives concurred, 79 to 49. The causes of the War of 1812 have been much debated. Officially, the United States went to war because Britain had violated its commercial rights as a

 neutral nation. But the Federalists in Congress who represented the New England and Middle Atlantic merchants voted against the war; and in the election of 1812, those regions cast their 89 electoral votes for the Federalist presidential candidate, De Witt Clinton of New York. Madison amassed most of his 128 electoral votes in the South and West, where voters and congressmen strongly supported the war. Many historians therefore argue that the conflict was actually “a western war with eastern labels” (American Voices, p. 238).

The War of 1812
 The War of 1812 was a near disaster for the United States. An invasion of British Canada in 1812 quickly ended in a retreat to Detroit. Nonetheless, the United States stayed on the offensive in the West. In 1813, American raiders burned the Canadian capital of York (present-day Toronto), Commodore Oliver Hazard Perry defeated a small British flotilla on Lake Erie, and

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820




Counting Scalps
 Effective propaganda usually contains a grain of truth, in this case the Indian warriors’ practice of scalping their wartime victims. Entitled “A scene on the frontiers as practiced by the humane British and their worthy allies!”, this cartoon by Philadelphia artist William Charles accuses the British of paying Indians to kill — and then mutilate — American soldiers. “Bring me the scalps, and the King our master will reward you,” says the British officer in the cartoon. The verse at the bottom urges “Columbia’s Sons” to press forward their attacks; otherwise, “The Savage Indian with his Scalping knife, / Or Tomahawk may seek to take your life.” Library of Congress.

 General William Henry Harrison overcame a British and Indian force at the Battle of the Thames, taking the life of Tecumseh, now a British general. In the East, political divisions prevented a wider war. New England Federalists opposed the war and prohibited their states’ militias from attacking Canada. Boston merchants and banks refused to lend money to the federal government, making the war difficult to finance. In Congress, Daniel Webster, a dynamic young politician from New Hampshire, led Federalists opposed to higher tariffs and national conscription of state militiamen. Gradually, the tide of battle turned in Britain’s favor. When the war began, American privateers had captured scores of British merchant vessels, but by 1813 British warships were disrupting American commerce and threatening seaports along the Atlantic coast. In 1814, a British fleet sailed up the Chesapeake Bay, and troops stormed ashore to attack Washington City. Retaliating for the destruction of York, the invaders burned the U.S. Capitol and government buildings. After two years of fighting, the United States was

 stalemated along the Canadian IDENTIFY CAUSES frontier and on the defensive in What do you think is the the Atlantic, and its new capital most persuasive explanacity lay in ruins. The only U.S. tion for the United States’s victories came in the Southwest. decision to declare war on There, a rugged slave-owning Great Britain in 1812? planter named Andrew Jackson and a force of Tennessee militiamen defeated Britishand Spanish-supported Creek Indians in the Battle of Horseshoe Bend (1814) and forced the Indians to cede 23 million acres of land (Map 7.5).

 Federalists Oppose the War American military setbacks increased opposition to the war in New England. In 1814, Massachusetts Federalists called for a convention “to lay the foundation for a radical reform in the National Compact.” When New England Federalists met in Hartford, Connecticut, some delegates proposed secession, but most wanted to revise the Constitution. To end Virginia’s domination of the presidency, the Hartford Convention proposed a constitutional amendment limiting the office to a single

AMERICAN VOICES

Factional Politics and
 the War of 1812

 In the quarter-century following the ratification of the U.S. Constitution, American leaders had to deal with the wars of the French Revolution and Napoleon. These European conflicts posed two dangers to the United States. First, the naval blockades imposed by the British and the French hurt American commerce and prompted calls for a military response. Second, European ideological and political struggles intensified party conflicts in the United States. On three occasions, the American republic faced danger from the combination of an external military threat and internal political turmoil. In 1798, the Federalist administration of John Adams almost went to war with France to help American merchants and to undermine the Republican Party. In 1807, Thomas Jefferson’s embargo on American commerce shocked Federalists and sharply increased political tensions. And, as the following selections show, the political divisions during the War of 1812 threatened the very existence of the American republic.

George Washington


Farewell Address, 1796
 Washington’s support for Alexander Hamilton’s economic policies promoted political factionalism. Ignoring his own role in creating that political divide, Washington condemned factionalism and, as his presidency proceeded, tried to stand above party conflicts. In his farewell address, Washington warned Americans to stand united and avoid the “Spirit of Party.”

 A solicitude for your welfare [prompts me] . . . to offer . . . the disinterested warnings of a parting friend, who can possibly have no personal motive to bias his counsels. . . . The Unity of Government which constitutes you one people . . . is a main Pillar in the Edifice of your real independence . . . your tranquility at home; your peace abroad. . . . But it is easy to foresee, that, from different causes, and from different quarters, much pains will be taken, many artifices employed, to weaken in your minds the conviction of this truth. . . . I have already intimated to you the danger of parties in the State, with particular reference to founding them on geographical discriminations. Let me now take a more comprehensive view, and warn you, in the most solemn manner, against the baneful effects of the Spirit of Party, generally. This spirit, unfortunately, is inseparable from our nature, having its root in the strongest passions of the human mind. It exists under different shapes, in all governments, more or less stifled, controlled or repressed; but in those of the popular form, it is seen in its greatest rankness, and is truly their worst enemy.

 The alternate dominion of one faction over another, sharpened by the spirit of revenge . . . , is itself a frightful despotism; but this leads at length to a more formal and permanent despotism. Source: James D. Richardson, ed., A Compilation of the Messages and Papers of the Presidents, 1789–1896 (Washington, D.C.: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1896), 1: 213–215.

Josiah Quincy et al.


 Federalists Protest “Mr. Madison’s War” The United States — and its two political parties — divided sharply over the War of 1812. As Congress debated the issue of going to war against Great Britain, Josiah Quincy and other antiwar Federalist congressmen published a manifesto that questioned the justifications for the war offered by President Madison and the military strategy proposed by Republican war hawks.

 How will war upon the land [an invasion of British Canada] protect commerce upon the ocean? What balm has Canada for wounded honor? How are our mariners benefited by a war which exposes those who are free, without promising release to those who are impressed? But it is said that war is demanded by honor. Is national honor a principle which thirsts after vengeance, and is appeased only by blood? . . . If honor demands a war with England, what opiate lulls that honor to sleep over the wrongs done us by France? On land, robberies, seizures, imprisonments, by French authority; at sea, pillage, sinkings, burnings, under French orders. These are notorious. Are they unfelt because they are French? . . .

 There is . . . a headlong rushing into difficulties, with little calculation about the means, and little concern about the consequences. With a navy comparatively [small], we are about to enter into the lists against the greatest marine [power] on the globe. With a commerce unprotected and spread over every ocean, we propose to make a profit by privateering, and for this endanger the wealth of which we are honest proprietors. An invasion is threatened of the [British colonies in Canada, but Britain] . . . without putting a new ship into commission, or taking another soldier into pay, can spread alarm or desolation along the extensive range of our seaboard. . . . What are the United States to gain by this war? Will the gratification of some privateersmen compensate the nation for that sweep of our legitimate commerce by the extended marine of our enemy which this desperate act invites? Will Canada compensate the Middle states for [the loss of] New York; or the Western states for [the loss of] New Orleans? Let us not be deceived. A war of invasion may invite a retort of invasion. When we visit the peaceable, and as to us innocent, colonies of Great Britain with the horrors of war, can we be assured that our own coast will not be visited with like horrors? Source: Annals of Congress, 12th Cong., 1st sess., vol. 2, cols. 2219–2221.

Hezekiah Niles


A
Republican Defends the War  In 1814, what the Federalists feared had come to pass: British ships blockaded American ports, and British troops invaded American territory. In January 1815, Republican editor Hezekiah Niles used the pages of his influential Baltimore newspaper, Niles’ Weekly Register, to explain current Republican policies and blame the Federalists for American reverses.

 It is universally known that the causes for which we declared war are no obstruction to peace. The practice of blockade and impressment having ceased by the general pacification of Europe, our government is content to leave the principle as it was. . . . We have no further business in hostility, than such as is purely defensive; while that of Great Britain is to humble or subdue us. The war, on our part, has become a contest for life, liberty and property — on the part of our enemy, of revenge or ambition. . . . What then are we to do? Are we to encourage him by divisions among ourselves — to hold out the hope of a

 separation of the states and a civil war — to refuse to bring forth the resources of the country against him? . . . I did think that in a defensive war — a struggle for all that is valuable — that all parties would have united. But it is not so — every measure calculated to replenish the treasury or raise men is opposed [by Federalists] as though it were determined to strike the “star spangled banner” and exalt the bloody cross. Look at the votes and proceedings of congress — and mark the late spirit [to secede from the Union] . . . that existed in Massachusetts, and see with what unity of action every thing has been done [by New England Federalists] to harass and embarrass the government. Our loans have failed; and our soldiers have wanted their pay, because those [New England merchants] who had the greater part of the monied capital covenanted with each other to refuse its aid to the country. They had a right, legally, to do this; and perhaps, also, by all the artifices of trade or power that money gave them, to oppress others not of their “stamp” and depress the national credit — but history will shock posterity by detailing the length to which they went to bankrupt the republic. . . . To conclude — why does the war continue? It is not the fault of the government — we demand no extravagant thing. I answer the question, and say — it lasts because Great Britain depends on the exertions of her “party” in this country to destroy our resources, and compel “unconditional submission.” Thus the war began, and is continued, by our divisions. Source: Niles’ Weekly Register, January 28, 1815.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
According to Washington, what is the ultimate cause of political factionalism? Why does Washington believe that factionalism is most dangerous in “popular” — that is, republican — governments? 2. Compare and contrast the Quincy and Niles documents. What specific dangers did Josiah Quincy and the Federalists foresee with regard to Republican war policies? According to Hezekiah Niles, what were the war goals of the Republican administration? 3. Read the section on the War of 1812 on pages 236– 241, and then discuss the accuracy of the Federalists’ predictions. 4. How had Republican war goals changed since the start of the war? Niles charged the Federalists and their supporters with impeding the American war effort. What were his specific charges? Did they have any merit? How might the Federalists have defended their stance with respect to the war? 


 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Quebec
R.


L ak


 nc

 e

CANADA
Montreal 
(


 n ro

Lake Michig
 an

York (Toronto),
April 27, 1813


MICHIGAN TERRITORY

'


'
Ft. Detroit


Harriso
 n

Hull


(


Tippecanoe
Nov. 7, 1811 '


 ke

'


La


Pe


De a


Oh


 io

 6. British invasion stopped at Plattsburgh on Lake Champlain, Sept. 11, 1814 Boston

 rn

 MASS.

NEW YORK

CONN. N.J.

Erie


 r ry

New York


Philadelphia
Godly Wood
Sept. 12, 1814 Baltimore
'
 DEL. ' Ft. McHenry Washington, D.C.

 3. Perry defeats British, Put-In-Bay, Sept. 10, 1813

(


 OHIO

 5. British burn Washington, D.C., Aug. 24–28, 1814

R.


R.I.


 7. British siege of Baltimore, Sept. 13–14, 1814

 PENNSYLVANIA

INDIANA TERRITORY

St. Louis


 rb o

 Lundy’s Lane 'July 25, 1814

 ie Er

VT. N.H. '

Lake
Ontario


'


 4. Harrison defeats British, Battle of the Thames, Oct. 5, 1813

(


ILLINOIS TERRITORY

 Chrysler’s Farm 2. Americans burn Nov. 11, 1813'

La
 ke Hu

 1. Hull’s invasion of Canada fails, then he loses Detroit, Aug. 16, 1812

Fort
Dearborn


 MAINE (part of Mass.)

St. L
 aw re

 perior e Su

Ft. Mackinac




 MD.

ATLANTIC OCEAN

KENTUCKY NORTH CAROLINA

N


 TENNESSEE

E


 siss ipp i R.

W
S


SOUTH CAROLINA
Ja 
 8. Jackson defeats Creek Indians, Horseshoe Bend, March 27, 1814 cks

Charleston


 on

MISSISSIPPI TERRITORY
Jac ks on 
'


 GEORGIA

 300 miles 300 kilometers

 U.S. territories in 1812 British movements ' '

 FL





 American movements

H




(


 British blockade American victories British victories Forts

A
 ID

Gulf of Mexico


 OR

 10. Jackson defeats British at New Orleans, Jan. 8, 1815



 U.S. states in 1812

 IS

'




 9. Jackson invades Spanish Florida to attack the British at Pensacola, Nov. 7, 1814

Pensacola


 LOUISIANA

Savannah


AN SP

'


 kson Jac

New Orleans




Chesapeake
Bay


 VIRGINIA

M is


UNORGANIZED TERRITORY



 MAP 7.5 The War of 1812 Unlike the War of Independence, the War of 1812 had few large-scale military campaigns. In 1812 and 1813, most of the fighting took place along the Canadian border, as small American military forces attacked British targets with mixed success (nos. 1–4). The British took the offensive in 1814, launching a successful raid on Washington, but their attack on Baltimore failed, and they suffered heavy losses when they invaded the United States along Lake Champlain (nos. 5–7). Near the Gulf of Mexico, American forces moved from one success to another: General Andrew Jackson defeated the pro-British Creek Indians at the Battle of Horseshoe Bend, won a victory in Pensacola, and, in the single major battle of the war, routed an invading British army at New Orleans (nos. 8–10).

 CHAPTER 7

 four-year term and rotating it among citizens from different states. The convention also suggested amendments restricting commercial embargoes to sixty days and requiring a two-thirds majority in Congress to declare war, prohibit trade, or admit a new state to the Union. As a minority party, the Federalists could prevail only if the war continued to go badly — a very real prospect. The war had cost $88 million, raising the national debt to $127 million. And now, as Albert Gallatin warned Henry Clay in May 1814, Britain’s triumph over Napoleon in Europe meant that a “well organized and large army is [now ready] . . . to act immediately against us.” When an attack from Canada came in the late summer of 1814, only an American naval victory on Lake Champlain stopped the British from marching down the Hudson River Valley. A few months later, thousands of seasoned British troops landed outside New Orleans, threatening American control of the Mississippi River. With the nation politically divided and under attack from north and south, Gallatin feared that “the war might prove vitally fatal to the United States.”

Peace Overtures and a Final Victory Fortunately
 for the young American republic, by 1815 Britain wanted peace. The twenty-year war with France had sapped its wealth and energy, so it began negotiations with the United States in Ghent, Belgium. At first, the American commissioners — John Quincy Adams, Gallatin, and Clay — demanded territory in Canada and Florida, while British diplomats sought an Indian buffer state between the United States and Canada. Both sides quickly realized that these objectives were not worth the cost of prolonged warfare. The Treaty of Ghent, signed on Christmas Eve 1814, retained the prewar borders of the United States. That result hardly justified three years of war, but before news of the treaty reached the United States, a final military victory lifted Americans’ morale. On January 8, 1815, General Jackson’s troops crushed the British forces attacking New Orleans. Fighting from carefully constructed breastworks, the Americans rained “grapeshot and cannister bombs” on the massed British formations. The British lost 700 men, and 2,000 more were wounded or taken prisoner; just 13 Americans died, and only 58 suffered wounds. A newspaper headline proclaimed: “Almost Incredible Victory!! Glorious News.” The victory made Jackson a national hero, redeemed the nation’s battered pride, and undercut the Hartford Convention’s demands for constitutional revision.

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


The Federalist Legacy
 The War of 1812 ushered in a new phase of the Republican political revolution. Before the conflict, Federalists had strongly supported Alexander Hamilton’s program of national mercantilism — a funded debt, a central bank, and tariffs — while Jeffersonian Republicans had opposed it. After the war, the Republicans split into two camps. Led by Henry Clay, National Republicans pursued Federalist-like policies. In 1816, Clay pushed legislation through Congress creating the Second Bank of the United States and persuaded President Madison to sign it. In 1817, Clay won passage of the Bonus Bill, which created a national fund for roads and other internal improvements. Madison vetoed it. Reaffirming traditional Jeffersonian Republican principles, he argued that the national government lacked the constitutional authority to fund internal improvements. Meanwhile, the Federalist Party crumbled. As one supporter explained, the National Republicans in the eastern states had “destroyed the Federalist party by the adoption of its principles” while the favorable farm policies of Jeffersonians maintained the Republican Party’s dominance in the South and West. “No Federal character can run with success,” Gouverneur Morris of New York lamented, and the election of 1818 proved him right: Republicans outnumbered Federalists 37 to 7 in the Senate and 156 to 27 in the House. Westward expansion and the success of Jefferson’s Revolution of 1800 had shattered the First Party System.

 Marshall’s Federalist Law However, Federalist policies lived on thanks to John Marshall’s long tenure on the Supreme Court. Appointed chief justice by President John Adams in January 1801, Marshall had a personality and intellect that allowed him to dominate the Court until 1822 and strongly influence its decisions until his death in 1835. Three principles informed Marshall’s jurisprudence: judicial authority, the supremacy of national laws, and traditional property rights (Table 7.1). Marshall claimed the right of judicial review for the Supreme Court in Marbury v. Madison (1803), and the Court frequently used that power to overturn state laws that, in its judgment, violated the Constitution. Asserting National Supremacy The important case of McCulloch v. Maryland (1819) involved one such law. When Congress created the Second Bank of the United States in 1816, it allowed the bank to set up state branches that competed with state-chartered banks. In response, the Maryland legislature imposed a





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 TABLE 7.1 Major Decisions of the Marshall Court Date

Case


Significance of Decision


Judicial Authority




Marbury v. Madison


 Asserts principle of judicial review

Property Rights




Fletcher v. Peck


 Protects property rights through broad reading of Constitution’s contract clause



Dartmouth College v.
Woodward


 Safeguards property rights, especially of chartered corporations



 McCulloch v. Maryland

 Interprets Constitution to give broad powers to national government



Gibbons v. Ogden


 Gives national government jurisdiction over interstate commerce

Supremacy of National Law


 tax on notes issued by the Baltimore branch of the Second Bank. The Second Bank refused to pay, claiming that the tax infringed on national powers and was therefore unconstitutional. The state’s lawyers then invoked Jefferson’s argument: that Congress lacked the constitutional authority to charter a national bank. Even if a national bank was legitimate, the lawyers argued, Maryland could tax its activities within the state. Marshall and the nationalist-minded Republicans on the Court firmly rejected both arguments. The Second Bank was constitutional, said the chief justice, because it was “necessary and proper,” given the national govUNDERSTAND ernment’s control over currency POINTS OF VIEW and credit, and Maryland did not Why do historians think have the power to tax it. the decisions of the MarThe Marshall Court again shall Court constitute a Federalist legacy? asserted the dominance of national over state statutes in Gibbons v. Ogden (1824). The decision struck down a New York law granting a monopoly to Aaron Ogden for steamboat passenger service across the Hudson River to New Jersey. Asserting that the Constitution gave the federal government authority over interstate commerce, the chief justice sided with Thomas Gibbons, who held a federal license to run steamboats between the two states.

Upholding Vested Property Rights Finally,
 Marshall used the Constitution to uphold Federalist notions of property rights. During the 1790s, Jefferson Republicans had celebrated “the will of the people,” prompting Federalists to worry that popular sovereignty would result in a “tyranny of the majority.” If

 state legislatures enacted statutes infringing on the property rights of wealthy citizens, Federalist judges vowed to void them. Marshall was no exception. Determined to protect individual property rights, he invoked the contract clause of the Constitution to do it. The contract clause (in Article I, Section 10) prohibits the states from passing any law “impairing the obligation of contracts.” Economic conservatives at the Philadelphia convention had inserted the clause to prevent “stay” laws, which kept creditors from seizing the lands and goods of delinquent debtors. In Fletcher v. Peck (1810), Marshall greatly expanded its scope. The Georgia legislature had granted a huge tract of land to the Yazoo Land Company. When a new legislature cancelled the grant, alleging fraud and bribery, speculators who had purchased Yazoo lands appealed to the Supreme Court to uphold their titles. Marshall did so by ruling that the legislative grant was a contract that could not be revoked. His decision was controversial and far-reaching. It limited state power; bolstered vested property rights; and, by protecting out-of-state investors, promoted the development of a national capitalist economy. The Court extended its defense of vested property rights in Dartmouth College v. Woodward (1819). Dartmouth College was a private institution created by a royal charter issued by King George III. In 1816, New Hampshire’s Republican legislature enacted a statute converting the school into a public university. The Dartmouth trustees opposed the legislation and hired Daniel Webster to plead their case. A renowned constitutional lawyer and a leading Federalist, Webster cited the Court’s decision in Fletcher v. Peck and argued that the royal charter was an unalterable contract. The Marshall Court agreed and upheld Dartmouth’s claims.

 CHAPTER 7

Hammering Out a Federal Republic, 1787–1820


John Marshall, by Chester Harding,
 c. 1830 Even at the age of seventy-five, John Marshall (1755–1835) had a commanding personal presence. After he became chief justice of the U.S. Supreme Court in 1801, Marshall elevated the Court from a minor department of the national government to a major institution in American legal and political life. His decisions on judicial review, contract rights, the regulation of commerce, and national banking permanently shaped the character of American constitutional law. © Boston Athenaeum, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library.

The Diplomacy of John Quincy Adams Even as
 John Marshall incorporated important Federalist principles into the American legal system, voting citizens and political leaders embraced the outlook of the Republican Party. The political career of John Quincy Adams was a case in point. Although he was the son of Federalist president John Adams, John Quincy Adams had joined the Republican Party before the War of 1812. He came to national attention for his role in negotiating the Treaty of Ghent, which ended the war. Adams then served brilliantly as secretary of state for two terms under James Monroe (1817–1825). Ignoring Republican antagonism toward Great Britain,

 in 1817 Adams negotiated the Rush-Bagot Treaty, which limited American and British naval forces on the Great Lakes. In 1818, he concluded another agreement with Britain setting the forty-ninth parallel as the border between Canada and the lands of the Louisiana Purchase. Then, in the Adams-Onís Treaty of 1819, Adams persuaded Spain to cede the Florida territory to the United States (Map 7.6). In return, the American government accepted Spain’s claim to Texas and agreed to a compromise on the western boundary for the state of Louisiana, which had entered the Union in 1812. Finally, Adams persuaded President Monroe to declare American national policy with respect to the





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

N


BRITISH CANADA

N.
 MAINE

E


W
S


 OREGON

AT L A N T I C OCEAN

 COUNTRY

Treaty Lines
U.S. and Britain, 1818
 Adams-Onís Treaty, 1819

LOUISIANA PURCHASE, 1803 A LT

U N I T E D S TAT E S , 1 7 8 3


A
A C


NEW SPAIN
(Mexico after 1821) 
U.S. and British Territory
 Disputed territory, Maine Joint occupation, Oregon 1818–1846

 LI

 FO

Cessions


R


 IA

N


 BA

SONORA Y SINALOA

 JA

PAC I F I C OCEAN

Ceded by U.S.
 to Spain, 1818 Ceded by Britain to U.S., 1819

NUEVO MEXICO

 TEJAS

 CA

 LI

 FO

NUEVA VIZCAYA

Gulf of Mexico


 COAHUILA

RN IA

NUEVO SANTANDER





 FLORIDA (Ceded to U.S. by Spain, 1819) 500 miles

Land in Florida,
Occupied by U.S.


 500 kilometers

 MAP 7.6 Defining the National Boundaries, 1800–1820 After the War of 1812, American diplomats negotiated treaties with Great Britain and Spain that defined the boundaries of the Louisiana Purchase, with British Canada to the north and New Spain (which in 1821 became the independent nation of Mexico) to the south and west. These treaties eliminated the threat of border wars with neighboring states for a generation, giving the United States a much-needed period of peace and security.

 Western Hemisphere. At Adams’s behest, Monroe warned Spain and other European powers to keep their hands off the newly independent republics in Latin America. The American continents were not “subject for further colonization,” the president declared in 1823 — a policy that thirty years later became known as the Monroe Doctrine. In return, Monroe pledged that the United States would not “interfere in the internal concerns” of European nations. Thanks to John Quincy Adams, the United States had successfully asserted its diplomatic leadership in the Western Hemisphere and won international acceptance of its northern and western boundaries. The appearance of political consensus after two decades of bitter party conflict prompted observers to dub James Monroe’s presidency (1817–1825) the “Era of Good Feeling.” This harmony was real but transitory. The Republican Party was now split between the National faction, led by Clay and Adams, and the Jeffersonian faction, soon to be led by Martin Van

 Buren and Andrew Jackson. The two groups differed sharply over federal support for roads and canals and many other issues. As the aging Jefferson himself complained, “You see so many of these new [National] republicans maintaining in Congress the rankest doctrines of the old federalists.” This division in the Republican Party would soon produce the Second Party System, in which national-minded Whigs and state-focused Democrats would confront each other. By the early 1820s, one cycle of American politics and economic debate had ended, and another was about to begin.

SUMMARY
In this chapter, we traced three interrelated themes: public policy, westward expansion, and party politics. We began by examining the contrasting public policies advocated by Alexander Hamilton and Thomas 
 CHAPTER 7

 Jefferson. A Federalist, Hamilton supported a strong national government and created a fiscal infrastructure (the national debt, tariffs, and a national bank) to spur trade and manufacturing. By contrast, Jefferson wanted to preserve the authority of state governments, and he envisioned an America enriched by farming rather than industry. Jefferson and the Republicans promoted a westward movement that transformed the agricultural economy and sparked new wars with Indian peoples. Expansion westward also shaped American diplomatic and military policy, leading to the Louisiana Purchase,

CHAPTER REVIEW

 the War of 1812, and the treaties negotiated by John Quincy Adams. Finally, there was the unexpected rise of the First Party System. As Hamilton’s policies split the political elite, the French Revolution divided Americans into hostile ideological groups. The result was two decades of bitter conflict and controversial measures: the Federalists’ Sedition Act, the Republicans’ Embargo Act, and Madison’s decision to go to war with Britain. Although the Federalist Party faded away, it left as its enduring legacy Hamilton’s financial innovations and John Marshall’s constitutional jurisprudence.

C H A P T E R


R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
TERMS TO KNOW

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
Judiciary Act of 1789 (p. 216)
Bill of Rights (p. 216)
Report on the Public Credit
 (p. 216) Bank of the United States (p. 218) Report on Manufactures (p. 218) Proclamation of Neutrality (p. 219) French Revolution (p. 219) Jacobins (p. 219) Whiskey Rebellion (p. 219) Jay’s Treaty (p. 222) Haitian Revolution (p. 222) XYZ Affair (p. 223)

Key People
Naturalization, Alien, and
Sedition Acts (p. 224)
Virginia and Kentucky
Resolutions (p. 225)
Treaty of Greenville (p. 226)
Marbury v. Madison (1803)
 (p. 231) Louisiana Purchase (p. 233) Embargo Act of 1807 (p. 234) Battle of Tippecanoe (p. 236) Treaty of Ghent (p. 241) McCulloch v. Maryland (1819) (p. 241) Adams-Onís Treaty (p. 243) Monroe Doctrine (p. 244)

Alexander Hamilton (p. 216)
Thomas Jefferson (p. 218)
John Adams (p. 223)
Little Turtle (p. 226)
John Marshall (p. 231)
Tecumseh (p. 235)
Henry Clay (p. 241)
John Quincy Adams (p. 243)


REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. Why did Alexander Hamilton, as Washington’s first

 secretary of the treasury, advocate the creation of a permanent national debt and a national bank? What fears did his economic plans arouse in his Republican opponents?

 2. What were the principal effects of the French and

Haitian Revolutions in the United States? How
 did they influence the development of the American economy, American politics, and westward development?





 PART 3

CHAPTER REVIEW

 3. What forces — ideological, political, and eco-

 nomic — led the United States to gain dominance over eastern North America in these years?

 4. Explain the rise and fall of the First Party System.

 How did the policies implemented by Republican presidents between 1801 and 1825 differ from those implemented during the 1790s? Why did the Federalists fall out of favor? What legacy did the Federalists leave?

MAKING CONNECTIONS

 events listed under “Work, Exchange, and Technology” and “Politics and Power” for the period 1800– 1820 on the thematic timeline on page 149. What was the relationship in these years between the activism of the national government and developments in the American economy?

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE
In Chapter 6, 
 thirteen former British colonies cooperated in war and established new republican institutions of selfgovernment. After 1789, unforeseen divisions developed in American politics. Why did Hamiltonians and Jeffersonians disagree so sharply on key questions of national policy? Which of the factions in the First Party System — Federalists or Republicans — best embodied the principles of the Revolution? How did westward expansion and

MORE TO EXPLORE

THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING
Look at the 
 international relations force the United States to modify its Revolutionary republican ideals? 2. VISUAL EVIDENCE Return to the Currier &

 Ives print depicting the bombardment of Tripoli on page 232. What message does it convey about America’s position in the world? How well does that message square with the actual outcome of the First Barbary War? What does this suggest about the artist’s purpose?

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

Gregory Dowd, A Spirited Resistance (1993). A
 penetrating account of Indian resistance to American expansion. Joanne B. Freeman, Affairs of Honor (2002). A cultural analysis of the politics of the 1790s. Jon Kukla, A Wilderness So Immense (2004). A sweeping account of the contexts for the Louisiana Purchase.

Alan Taylor, The Civil War of 1812 (2010). Presents
 the contest for Canada as a multiethnic civil war. Ashli White, Encountering Revolution (2012). Considers the impact of the Haitian Revolution on the United States. The War of 1812 (PBS video, 2011) and its accompanying Web site (pbs.org/wned/war-of-1812/home/) offer reenactments, animations, interpretive essays, and historical site analyses.

 CHAPTER 7

 TIMELINE

CHAPTER REVIEW

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.

1784–1789


 Contested Indian treaties: Fort Stanwix (1784), Fort McIntosh (1785), Fort Finney (1786), and Fort Harmar (1789)

1789–1799


French Revolution




 Judiciary Act establishes federal courts



 Hamilton’s public credit system approved

1790–1791


 Western Confederacy defeats U.S. armies

1791–1803


Haitian Revolution




 Bill of Rights ratified Bank of the United States chartered



 Kentucky joins Union



 War between Britain and France



 Madison and Jefferson found Republican Party Whiskey Rebellion Battle of Fallen Timbers



 Jay’s Treaty with Great Britain Pinckney’s Treaty with Spain Treaty of Greenville accepts Indian land rights



XYZ
Affair Alien, Sedition, and Naturalization Acts Virginia and Kentucky Resolutions 


 Jefferson elected president

1801–1812


 Gallatin reduces national debt



Louisiana Purchase
 Marbury v. Madison asserts judicial review

1804–1806


 Lewis and Clark explore West



 Embargo Act cripples American shipping



 Madison elected president



 Tecumseh and Tenskwatawa revive Western Confederacy

1812–1815


War of 1812


1817–1825


Era of Good Feeling




 Adams-Onís Treaty McCulloch v. Maryland; Dartmouth College v. Woodward

KEY TURNING POINTS:
The Northwest Ordinance (1787; Chapter 6), Kentucky and Tennes- 
 see join the Union (1792, 1796), and Jefferson is elected president (1800). How were developments in the West tied into national politics in the 1790s? Why did the Federalists steadily lose ground to the Republicans?





Creating a Republican Culture
1790–1820


C H A P T E R
THE CAPITALIST COMMONWEALTH
Banks, Manufacturing, and Markets Public Enterprise: The Commonwealth System 
TOWARD A DEMOCRATIC REPUBLICAN CULTURE
Opportunity and Equality — for White Men Toward Republican Families Raising Republican Children 
ARISTOCRATIC REPUBLICANISM AND SLAVERY
The Revolution and Slavery, 1776–1800 The North and South Grow Apart The Missouri Crisis, 1819–1821 
PROTESTANT CHRISTIANITY AS A SOCIAL FORCE A
Republican Religious Order The Second Great Awakening Religion and Reform Women’s New Religious Roles 


B


 y the 1820s, America’s white citiIDENTIFY THE BIG IDEA zenry had embraced the republican In eighteenth-century Europe, the political order. Their nation stood leading principles were aristocracy, forth as a “promised land of civil liberty, patriarchy, mercantilism, arranged and of institutions designed to liberate marriages, legal privilege, and and exalt the human race,” declared a established churches. What prinKentucky judge. White Americans were ciples would replace those societal indeed fortunate. They lived under a reprerules in America’s new republican sentative republican government, free society? from arbitrary taxation and from domination by an established church. The timing of the deaths of aging political leaders John Adams and Thomas Jefferson seemed to many Americans to confirm that God looked with favor on their experiment in self-government. What other than divine intervention could explain their nearly simultaneous deaths on July 4, 1826, the fiftieth anniversary of the Declaration of Independence? Inspired by their political freedom, many citizens sought to extend republican principles throughout their society. But what were those principles? For entrepreneurial-minded merchants, farmers, and political leaders, republicanism meant a dynamic market economy based on the private ownership of property and capital. However, they welcomed legislative policies that assisted private business and, they claimed, enhanced the “common wealth” of the society. Other Americans in the northern states championed democratic republican cultural values, such as equality in the family and in social relationships. In the southern states, sharply divided by class and race, politicians and pamphleteers endorsed aristocratic republicanism. It stressed liberty for whites rather than equality for all. Yet another vision of American republicanism emerged from the Second Great Awakening, religious revivals that swept the nation between 1790 and 1850. As Alexis de Tocqueville reported in Democracy in America (1835), the Second Great Awakening gave “the Christian religion . . . a greater influence over the souls of men” than in any other country. Moreover, religious enthusiasm — what Methodist bishop McIlvaine praised as “the quickening of the people of God to a spirit and walk becoming the gospel” — prompted social reform on many fronts. For those who embraced the Awakening, the United States was both a great experiment in republican government and a Christian civilization destined to redeem the world — a moral mission that would inform American diplomacy in the centuries to come.

 Mrs. Hugh McCurdy and Her Daughters This 1806 portrait of Grace Allison McCurdy and her

 daughters, Mary Jane and Letitia Grace, excludes her husband, the Baltimore merchant Hugh McCurdy, suggesting the increased cultural focus on mothers and children in the early republic. A few years earlier, the artist, Joshua Johnson (or Johnston, c. 1763–c. 1824), had painted a solo portrait of Letitia Grace. Here Johnson links Mrs. McCurdy and her elder daughter visually with a splash of vibrant red fruit near their laps, which probably also serves as a symbol of their fertility. Corcoran Gallery of Art, Washington D.C., USA/Museum Purchase through the gifts of William Wilson Corcoran, Elizabeth Donner Norment, Francis Biddle, Erich Cohn, Hardinge Scholle and the William A. Clark Fund/The Bridgeman Art Library.





 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Capitalist Commonwealth
 What did republicanism mean for economic life? In early-nineteenth-century America, it meant private property, market exchange, individual opportunity, and activist governments. Throughout the nation, and especially in the Northeast, republican state legislatures embraced a “neomercantilist” system of governmentassisted economic development. And it worked. Beginning around 1800, the average per capita income of Americans increased by more than 1 percent a year — more than 30 percent in a single generation.

Banks, Manufacturing, and Markets
 America was “a Nation of Merchants,” a British visitor reported from Philadelphia in 1798, “keen in the pursuit of wealth in all the various modes of acquiring it.” Acquire it they did, making spectacular profits as the wars of the French Revolution and Napoleon (1793– 1815) crippled European firms. Merchants John Jacob Astor and Robert Oliver became the nation’s first millionaires. After working for an Irish-owned linen firm in Baltimore, Oliver struck out on his own, achieving affluence by trading West Indian sugar and coffee. Astor, who migrated from Germany to New York in 1784, began by selling dry-goods in western New York and became wealthy by carrying furs from the Pacific Northwest to China and investing in New York City real estate (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 252).

 Banking and Credit To finance their ventures, Oliver, Astor, and other merchants needed capital, from either their own savings or loans. Before the Revolution, farmers relied on government-sponsored land banks for loans, while merchants arranged partnerships or obtained credit from British suppliers. Then, in 1781, Philadelphia merchants persuaded the Confederation Congress to charter the Bank of North America, and traders in Boston and New York soon founded similar institutions that raised funds and lent them out. “Our monied capital has so much increased from the Introduction of Banks, & the Circulation of the Funds,” Philadelphia merchant William Bingham boasted in 1791, “that the Necessity of Soliciting Credits from England will no longer exist.” That same year, Federalists in Congress chartered the Bank of the United States to issue notes and make commercial loans (Chapter 7, p. 218). By 1805, the bank had branches in eight seaport cities, profits that averaged a handsome 8 percent annually, and clients

A
Cloth Merchant, 1789  Originally a prosperous storekeeper in New Milford, Connecticut, Elijah Boardman (1760–1832) eventually became a U.S. senator. Like other American traders during the 1780s, he imported huge quantities of cloth from Britain. When the wars of the 1790s cut off trade, some merchants financed the domestic production of textiles. Others, including Boardman, turned to land speculation. In 1795, he joined the Connecticut Land Company and bought huge tracts in Connecticut’s Western Reserve, including the present towns of Medina, Palmyra, and Boardman, Ohio. Ralph Earl painted this portrait in 1789. © The Metropolitan Museum of Art. Image Source: Art Resource/NY.

 with easy access to capital. As trader Jesse Atwater noted, “the foundations of our [merchant] houses are laid in bank paper.” However, Jeffersonians attacked the bank as an unconstitutional expansion of federal power. Moreover, they claimed it promoted “a consolidated, energetic government supported by public creditors, speculators, and other insidious men.” When the bank’s twenty-year charter expired in 1811, the Jeffersonian Republican–dominated Congress refused to renew it.

 CHAPTER 8

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


The China Trade
 Following the Revolution, New England merchants traded actively with the major Asian manufacturing centers of China and India. In this painting by George Chinnery (1774–1852), the American flag flies prominently, alongside other national banners, in front of the warehouse district in Canton (modern Guangzhou). There, merchants exchanged bundles of American furs for cargoes of Chinese tea, silks, and porcelain plates, cups, and serving dishes. © Peabody Essex Museum, Salem, Massachusetts, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library.

 Merchants, artisans, and farmers quickly persuaded state legislatures to charter banks — in Pennsylvania, no fewer than 41. By 1816, when Congress (now run by National Republicans) chartered a new national bank (known as the Second Bank of the United States), there were 246 state-chartered banks with tens of thousands of stockholders and $68 million in banknotes in circulation. These state banks were often shady operations that issued notes without adequate specie reserves, made loans to insiders, and lent generously to farmers buying overpriced land. Dubious banking policies helped bring on the Panic of 1819 (just as they caused the financial crisis of 2008), but broader forces were equally important. As the Napoleonic Wars ended in 1815, Americans sharply increased their consumption of English woolen and cotton goods. However, in 1818, farmers and planters faced an abrupt 30 percent drop in world agricultural

 prices. The price of raw cotton in South Carolina fell from 34 to 15 cents a pound, and as Britain closed the West Indies to American trade, wheat prices plummeted as well. As farmers’ income declined, they could not pay debts owed to stores and banks, many of which went bankrupt. “A deep shadow has passed over our land,” lamented one New Yorker, as land prices dropped by 50 percent. The panic gave Americans their first taste of a business cycle, the periodic boom and bust inherent to an unregulated market economy.

 Rural Manufacturing The Panic of 1819 devastated artisans and farmers who sold goods in regional or national markets. Before 1800, many artisans worked part-time and bartered their handicrafts locally. A French traveler in Massachusetts found many “men who are both cultivators and artisans,” while in Lancaster, Pennsylvania, clockmaker John Hoff exchanged



THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN

The Entrepreneur and
 the Community

 Americans of the early republic believed that with hard work and virtue, even the lowliest of white men might rise to economic and political respectability, if not prominence. In the Revolutionary generation, Benjamin Franklin, born into a large and impoverished Boston family, had become a successful businessman and an international celebrity. Franklin’s success reflected the optimism that laboring men felt when contemplating the new nation’s seemingly boundless opportunity.

1. Banner of the Society of Pewterers of the City of
 New York, carried in the Federal Procession, July 23, 1788, celebrating the ratification of the U.S. Constitution. The ribbon at top right reads “The Federal Plan Most Solid & Secure/Americans Their Freedom Will Endure/All Art Shall Flourish in Columbia’s Land/And All her Sons Join as One Social Band.”

 Franklin’s aphorism “Early to bed and early to rise, makes a man healthy wealthy and wise,” Astor wrote:

 The man who makes it the habit of his life to go to bed at nine o’clock, usually gets rich and is always reliable. Of course, going to bed does not make him rich — I merely mean that such a man will in all probability be up early in the morning and do a big day’s work . . . good habits in America make any man rich. 3. Anonymous, “A Working Man’s Recollections of America,” Knight’s Penny Magazine, 1846. A cabinetmaker penned this account after returning to England following an unsuccessful stint seeking success in New York.

 Source: © Collection of the New York Historical Society, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library.

 2. John Jacob Astor quoted in Elbert Hubbard, Little Journeys to the Homes of Great Business Men, 1909. John Jacob Astor’s (1763–1848) story is a parable of American entrepreneurial triumph. Arriving in America in 1783 from Germany, Astor worked in the fur industry treating pelts and, with capital borrowed from his brother, started up a musical instrument shop and fur business in 1786. Over the next three decades, Astor’s American Fur Company prospered by trading furs in China, making Astor America’s first millionaire. Apparently influenced by Benjamin



 I was a cabinet-maker by trade, and one of the many who, between the years 1825–35, expatriated themselves in countless thousands, drawn by the promise of fair wages for faithful work, and driven by the scanty remuneration offered to unceasing toil at home. . . . On landing in New York I made up my mind to lose none of the advantages it uttered by want of diligence on my part. During the first two years I took but one holiday. . . . In summer we began work at six; at eight took half an hour for breakfast, and then worked till twelve, when one an hour for dinner; after which we kept on till six, seven, or eight. . . . A relative who arrived from England held out to me bright prospects of advantages to be realized by the employment of a little capital, combined with a removal to some inland town. I sold off nearly the whole of our moveables . . . [and committed all my savings to this enterprise. However,] our scheme . . . completely failed, and I had no resources but my industry and chest of tools to meet the impending difficulties. 4. Diary entry by Philip Hone, March 29, 1848. Philip Hone (1780–1851), a conservative Whig, was a successful merchant and entrepreneur and mayor of New York City from 1826 to 1827.

 Hone’s marvelous diary (1828–1851) records the changing character of New York City, as well as his contempt for Jacksonian Democracy and its Irish immigrant supporters.

 John Jacob Astor died this morning, at nine o’clock, in the eighty-fifth year of his age . . . and left reluctantly his unbounded wealth. His property is estimated at $20,000,000, some judicious persons say $30,000,000; but, at any rate, he was the richest man in the United States in productive and valuable property; and this immense, gigantic fortune was the fruit of his own labor, unerring sagacity, and far-seeing penetration. He came to this country at twenty years of age; penniless, friendless, without inheritance, without education . . . but with a determination to be rich, and ability to carry it into effect. His capital consisted of a few trifling musical instruments, which he got from his brother, George Astor, in London, a dealer in music. . . . The fur trade was the philosopher’s stone of this modem Croesus; beaver-skins and musk-rats furnished the oil for the supply of Aladdin’s lamp. His traffic was the shipment of furs to China, where they brought immense prices, for he monopolized the business; and the return cargoes of teas, silks, and rich productions of China brought further large profits. . . . My brother and I found in Mr. Astor a valuable customer. . . . All he touched turned to gold. 5. Editorial in the New York Herald, April 5, 1848. John Jacob Astor’s will included a bequest of $400,000 for the establishment of what became the New York Public Library. This editorial questioned whether this relatively meager bequest adequately repaid residents.

 If we had been an associate of John Jacob Astor the first idea that we should have put into his head would have been that one-half of his immense property — ten million at least — belonged to the people of the city of New York. During the last fifty years of the life of John Jacob Astor, his property has been augmented and increased in the value by the aggregate intelligence, industry, enterprise and commerce of New York, fully to the amount of onehalf its value. The farms and lots of ground which he

 bought forty, twenty and ten and five years ago, have all increased in value entirely by the industry of the citizens of New York . . . half of his immense estate, in its actual value, has accrued to him by the industry of the community. Sources: (2) Elbert Hubbard, Little Journeys to the Homes of Great Business Men (New York: Wm. H. Wise & Co., 1916), 201; (3) Knight’s Penny Magazine, Vol. 1 (London: Charles Knight & Co., 1846), 97, 107, 108; (4) Philip Hone, The Diary of Philip Hone, 1828–1851, Vol. 2 (New York: Dodd, Mead and Company, 1889), 347–348; (5) Gustavus Myers, History of the Great American Fortunes, Vol. 1 (Chicago: Charles H. Kerr & Company, 1910), 199–200.

ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1.
What does the Pewterer’s Banner (source 1) suggest about personal and by extension national success in the post-Revolutionary era? What can you infer about artisan entrepreneurs in the new republic from this source? 2. According to John Jacob Astor (source 2) and the cabinetmaker (source 3), what traits are important in work? Based on the sources included here, do you agree with Astor that good habits make any man rich? Why or why not? 3. Sources 2, 4, and 5 all deal with John Jacob Astor. What do these sources suggest about the road to wealth in America? 4. Compare and contrast Hone’s view of Astor (source 4) with that of the Herald’s editorial (source 5). Then apply the Herald’s critique to contemporary entrepreneurs such as Bill Gates of Microsoft or Steve Jobs of Apple. Are their fortunes also the product, in part, of “the industry of the community”? 
PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
John Jacob Astor initially made money by trading furs in local and then in international markets. Next, he speculated in land in booming cities. Finally, he became a rentier, crafting long-term property leases that guaranteed wealth to future generations of his family. Using the material in Chapter 8, explain how a pewterer or a cabinetmaker might follow a somewhat similar path to wealth in the market economy of nineteenth-century America. Noting also the statement “All her Sons Join as One Social Band” (source 1), explain why other Americans were critical of the rise of such ambitious capitalist entrepreneurs. 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 his clocks for a dining table, a bedstead, and labor on his small farm. Then various artisans — shipbuilders in seacoast towns, ironworkers in Pennsylvania and Maryland, clockmakers in Connecticut, and shoemakers in Massachusetts — expanded their output and sold their products in wider markets. American entrepreneurs drove this expansion of rural manufacturing. Beginning in the 1790s, enterprising merchants bought raw materials, hired farm families to TRACE CHANGE process them, and distributed OVER TIME the finished manufactures. “Straw How did governhats and Bonnets are manufacments, banks, and merchants expand tured by many families,” a Maine American commerce and census-taker noted in the 1810s. manufacturing between Merchants shipped rural manu1780 and 1820? factures — shoes, brooms, and palm-leaf hats as well as cups, baking pans, and other tin utensils — to stores in seaport cities. New England peddlers, who quickly

 acquired repute as hard-bargaining “Yankees,” sold them throughout the rural South. New technology initially played only a minor role in producing this boom in consumer goods. Take the case of textile production. During the 1780s, New England and Middle Atlantic merchants built waterpowered mills to run machines that combed wool — and later cotton — into long strands. However, until the 1810s, they used the household-based outwork system for the next steps: farm women and children spun the machine-combed strands into thread and yarn on foot-driven spinning wheels, and men in other households used foot-powered looms to weave the yarn into cloth. In 1820, more than 12,000 household workers labored full-time weaving woolen cloth, which waterpowered fulling mills then pounded flat, giving the cloth a smooth finish. By then, the transfer of textile production to factories was gaining speed; the number of water-driven cotton spindles soared from 8,000 in 1809 to 333,000 in 1817.

The Yankee Peddler, c. 1830
 Even in 1830, many Americans lived too far from a market town to go there regularly to buy goods. Instead, they purchased their tinware, clocks, textiles, and other manufactures from peddlers, often from New England, who traveled far and wide in small horse-drawn vans like the one visible through the doorway. Collection IBM Corporation, Armonk, New York.

 CHAPTER 8

 The growth of manufacturing offered farm families new opportunities — and new risks. Ambitious New England farmers switched from subsistence crops of wheat and potatoes to raising livestock. They sold meat, butter, and cheese to city markets and cattle hides to the booming shoe industry. “Along the whole road from Boston, we saw women engaged in making cheese,” a Polish traveler reported. Other families raised sheep and sold raw wool to textile manufacturers. Processing these raw materials brought new jobs and income to stagnating farming towns. In 1792, Concord, Massachusetts, had one slaughterhouse and five small tanneries; a decade later, the town boasted eleven slaughterhouses and six large tanneries. As the rural economy churned out more goods, it altered the environment. Foul odors from stockyards and tanning pits wafted over Concord and other leather-producing towns. Nor was that all. Tanners cut down thousands of acres of hemlock trees, using the bark to process stiff cow hides into pliable leather. More trees fell to the ax to create pasturelands for huge herds of livestock — dairy cows, cattle, and especially sheep. By 1850, most of the ancient forests in southern New England and eastern New York were gone: “The hills had been stripped of their timber,” New York’s Catskill Messenger reported, “so as to present their huge, rocky projections.” Moreover, scores of textile milldams dotted New England’s rivers, altering their flow and preventing fish — already severely depleted from decades of overfishing — from reaching upriver spawning grounds. Even as the income of farmers rose, the quality of their natural environment declined. In the new capitalist-driven market economy, rural parents and their children worked longer and harder. They made yarn, hats, and brooms during the winter and returned to their regular farming chores during the warmer seasons. More important, these farm families now depended on their wage labor or market sales to purchase the textiles, shoes, and hats they had once made for themselves. The new productive system made families and communities more efficient and prosperous — and more dependent on a market they could not control.

 New Transportation Systems The expansion of the market depended on improvements in transportation, where governments also played a crucial role. Between 1793 and 1812, the Massachusetts legislature granted charters to more than one hundred private turnpike corporations. These charters gave the companies special legal status and often included monopoly rights to a transportation route. Pennsylvania issued fifty-five charters, including one to the Lancaster

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820




 Turnpike Company, which built a 65-mile graded and graveled toll road to Philadelphia. The road quickly boosted the regional economy. Although turnpike investors received only about “three percent annually,” Henry Clay estimated, society as a whole “actually reap[ed] fifteen or twenty percent.” A farm woman agreed: “The turnpike is finished and we can now go to town at all times and in all weather.” New turnpikes soon connected dozens of inland market centers to seaport cities. Water transport was even quicker and cheaper, so state governments and private entrepreneurs dredged shallow rivers and constructed canals to bypass waterfalls and rapids. For their part, farmers in Kentucky and Tennessee and in southern Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois settled near the Ohio River and its many tributaries, so they could easily get goods to market. Similarly, speculators hoping to capitalize on the expansion of commerce bought up property in the cities along the banks of major rivers: Cincinnati, Louisville, Chattanooga, and St. Louis. Farmers and merchants built barges to carry cotton, grain, and meat downstream to New Orleans, which by 1815 was exporting about $5 million in agricultural products yearly.

Public Enterprise:
The Commonwealth System
 Legislative charters for banks, turnpikes, and canal companies reflected the ideology of mercantilism: government-assisted economic development. Just as Parliament had used the Navigation Acts to spur British prosperity, so American legislatures enacted laws “of great public utility” to increase the “common wealth.” These statutes generally took the form of special charters that bestowed legal privileges, such as the power of eminent domain, that allowed turnpike, bridge, and canal corporations to force the sale of privately owned land along their routes. State legislatures also aided capital-intensive flour millers and textile manufacturers, who flooded adjacent farmland as they built dams to power their water-driven machinery. In Massachusetts, the Mill Dam Act of 1795 deprived farmers of their traditional common-law right to stop the flooding and forced them to accept “fair compensation” for their lost acreage. Judges approved this state-ordered shift in property rights. “The establishment of a UNDERSTAND great mill-power for manufactur- POINTS OF VIEW Did state mercantilism (the ing purposes,” Justice Lemuel grant of privileges and Shaw intoned, was “one of the charters) embody repubgreat industrial pursuits of the lican ideology or violate it? commonwealth.”



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

View of Cincinnati, by John Caspar Wild, c. 1835
 Thanks to its location on the Ohio River (a tributary of the Mississippi), Cincinnati quickly became one of the major processing centers for grain and hogs in the trans-Appalachian west. By the 1820s, passenger steamboats and freight barges connected the city with Pittsburgh to the north and the ocean port of New Orleans far to the south. Museum of Fine Arts, Boston, M. and M. Karolik Collection.

 Critics condemned the legal privileges given to private enterprises as “Scheme[s] of an evident antirepublican tendency,” as some “freeholder citizens” in Putney, Vermont, put it. Such grants to business corporations, they argued, violated the “equal rights” of citizens and infringed on the sovereignty of the governments. “Whatever power is given to a corporation, is just so much power taken from the State,” argued a Pennsylvanian. Nonetheless, judges in state courts, following the lead of John Marshall’s Supreme Court (Chapter 7), consistently upheld corporate charters and grants of eminent domain to private transportation companies. “The opening of good and easy internal communications is one of the highest duties of government,” declared a New Jersey judge. State mercantilism soon spread beyond transportation. Following Jefferson’s embargo of 1807, which cut off goods and credit from Europe, the New England

 states awarded charters to two hundred iron-mining, textile-manufacturing, and banking companies, while Pennsylvania granted more than eleven hundred. By 1820, state governments had created a republican political economy: a Commonwealth System that funneled state aid to private businesses whose projects would improve the general welfare.

Toward a Democratic
Republican Culture
 After independence, many Americans in the northern states embraced a democratic republicanism that celebrated political equality and social mobility. These citizens, primarily members of the emerging middle class, redefined the nature of the family and of education by

 CHAPTER 8

 seeking egalitarian marriages and affectionate ways of rearing their children.

Opportunity and Equality —
 for White Men Between 1780 and 1820, hundreds of well-educated visitors agreed that the American social order was different from that of Europe. In his famous Letters from an American Farmer (1782), French-born essayist J. Hector St. Jean de Crèvecoeur wrote that European society was composed “of great lords who possess everything, and of a herd of people who have nothing.” By contrast, the United States had “no aristocratical families, no courts, no kings, no bishops.” The absence of a hereditary aristocracy encouraged Americans to condemn inherited social privilege and to extol legal equality. “The law is the same for everyone,” noted one European traveler. Yet citizens of the new republic willingly accepted social divisions that reflected personal achievement, a phenomenon that astounded many Europeans. “In Europe to say of someone that he rose from nothing is a disgrace and a



Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


 reproach,” remarked a Polish arisIDENTIFY CAUSES tocrat. “It is the opposite here. To What factors encouraged — be the architect of your own for- and inhibited — equality tune is honorable. It is the highest and democracy in earlyrecommendation.” nineteenth-century Some Americans from long- American life? distinguished families felt threatened by the ideology of wealth-driven social mobility. “Man is estimated by dollars,” complained Nathaniel Booth, whose high-status family had once dominated the small Hudson River port town of Kingston, New York. However, for most white men, a merit-based system meant the chance to better themselves (Map 8.1). Old cultural rules — and new laws — denied such chances to most women and African American men. When women and free blacks asked for voting rights, male legislators wrote explicit race and gender restrictions into the law. In 1802, Ohio disenfranchised African Americans, and the New York constitution of 1821 imposed a property-holding requirement on black voters. A striking case of sexual discrimination occurred in New Jersey, where the state constitution of 1776 had granted the voting franchise to all property



C A N A D A


C A N A D A


MAINE (MASS.)

 MAINE

VT. NEW YORK

 INDIANA

 PA.

NORTHWEST TERRITORY

 MD.

 TERRITORY

 VT.

N.H.


N.C.


PA. OHIO

 DEL.

 ILL.





 500 miles

 500 kilometers

 GA.

N.C.


ARK. TERR.

Property
 qualifications Taxpayer qualifications Universal white male suffrage

 GA.

 ALA.

 LA.

 FLA.





E


W
S


S.C.
 MISS.



N


KY. TENN.

S


 DEL.

 VA.

MO. E

W


N.J.


 MD.

 IND.

N


S.C.
MISSISSIPPI TERRITORY

MASS. CT. R.I.

MICHIGAN TERRITORY

N.J.


KY. TENN.

N.H.


NEW YORK

MASS. CT. R.I.

 VA.



Property
 qualifications Taxpayer qualifications Universal white male suffrage

 500 miles

 500 kilometers

 MAP 8.1 The Expansion of Voting Rights for White Men, 1800 and 1830 Between 1800 and 1830, the United States moved steadily toward political equality for white men. Many existing states revised their constitutions and replaced a property qualification for voting with less restrictive criteria, such as paying taxes or serving in the militia. Some new states in the West extended the suffrage to all adult white men. As parties sought votes from a broader electorate, the tone of politics became more open and competitive — swayed by the interests and values of ordinary people.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 holders. As Federalists and Republicans competed for power, they ignored customary gender rules and urged property-owning single women and widows to vote. Sensing a threat to men’s monopoly on politics, the New Jersey legislature in 1807 invoked both biology and custom to limit voting to men only: “Women, generally, are neither by nature, nor habit, nor education, nor by their necessary condition in society fitted to perform this duty with credit to themselves or advantage to the public.”

Toward Republican Families
 The controversy over women’s political rights mirrored a debate over authority within the household. British and American husbands had long claimed patriarchal power and legal control of the family’s property. However, as John Adams lamented in 1776, the republican principle of equality had “spread where it was not intended,” encouraging his wife and other women to demand legal and financial rights. Patriot author and historian Mercy Otis Warren argued that patriarchy was not a “natural” rule but a social contrivance and could be justified only “for the sake of order in families.” To see a longer excerpt of the Mercy Otis Warren document, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.

 Republican Marriages Economic and cultural changes also eroded customary paternal authority. In colonial America, most property-owning parents had arranged their children’s marriages. They looked for a morally upright son- or daughter-in-law with financial resources; physical attraction and emotional compatibility between the young people were secondary considerations. As landholdings shrank in long-settled communities, many yeomen fathers has less control over their children’s marriages because they had fewer resources to give them. Increasingly, young men and women chose their own partners, influenced by a new cultural attitude: sentimentalism. Sentimentalism originated in Europe as part of the Romantic movement and, after 1800, spread quickly through all classes of American society. Rejecting the Enlightenment’s emphasis on rational thought, sentimentalism celebrated the importance of “feeling” — a physical, sensuous appreciation of God, nature, and fellow humans. This new emphasis on deeply felt emotions pervaded literary works, popular theatrical melodramas, and the passionate rhetoric of revivalist preachers.

 As the passions of the heart overwhelmed the logic of the mind, magazines praised companionate marriages: marriages “contracted from motives of affection, rather than of interest.” Many young people looked for a relationship based on intimacy and a spouse who was, as Eliza Southgate of Maine put it, “calculated to promote my happiness.” As young people “fell in love” and married, many fathers changed from authoritarian patriarchs to watchful paternalists. To guard against free-spending sons-in-law, wealthy fathers often placed their daughters’ inheritance in a legal trust. One Virginia planter told his lawyer “to see the property settlement properly drawn before the marriage, for I by no means consent that Polly shall be left to the Vicissitudes of Life.” As voluntary contracts between individuals, love marriages conformed more closely to republican principles than did arranged matches. In theory, such marriages would be companionate, giving wives and husbands “true equality,” as one Boston man suggested. In practice, husbands dominated most marriages, because male authority was deeply ingrained in cultural mores and because American common law gave husbands control of the family’s property. Moreover, the new love-based marriage system discouraged parents from protecting young wives, and governments refused to prevent domestic tyranny. The marriage contract “is so much more important in its consequences to females than to males,” a young man at the Litchfield Law School in Connecticut astutely observed in 1820, for “they subject themselves to his authority. He is their all — their only relative — their only hope” (American Voices, p. 260). Young adults who chose partners unwisely were severely disappointed when their spouses failed as providers or faithful companions. Before 1800, unhappy wives and husbands could do little; officials granted divorces infrequently and then only in cases of neglect, abandonment, or adultery — serious offenses against the moral order of society. After 1800, most divorce petitions cited emotional issues. One woman complained that her husband had “ceased to cherish her,” while a man grieved that his wife had “almost broke his heart.” Responding to changing cultural values, several states expanded the legal grounds for divorce to include drunkenness and personal cruelty.

 Republican Motherhood Traditionally, most American women had spent their active adult years working as farmwives and bearing and nurturing children. However, after 1800, the birthrate in the northern states dropped significantly. In the farming village of

 CHAPTER 8

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820




The Wedding, 1805
 Bride and groom stare intently into each other’s eyes as they exchange vows, suggesting that their union was a love match, not an arranged marriage based on economic calculation. The plain costumes of the guests and the sparse furnishings of the room suggest that the unknown artist may have provided us with a picture of a rural Quaker wedding. The Granger Collection, NYC.

 Sturbridge in central Massachusetts, women now bore an average of six children; their grandmothers had usually given birth to eight or nine. In the growing seaport cities, native-born white women now bore an average of only four children. The United States was among the first nations to experience this sharp decline in the birthrate — what historians call the demographic transition. There were several causes. Beginning in the 1790s, thousands of young men migrated to the trans-Appalachian west, which increased the number of never-married women in the East and delayed marriage for many more. Women who married in their late twenties had fewer children. In addition, white urban middle-class couples deliberately limited the size of their families. Fathers wanted to leave children an adequate inheritance, while mothers, influenced by new ideas of individualism and self-achievement, refused to spend their entire adulthood rearing children. After having four or five children, these couples used birth control or abstained from sexual intercourse. Even as women bore fewer children, they accepted greater responsibility for the welfare of the family. In his Thoughts on Female Education (1787), Philadelphia

 physician Benjamin Rush argued that young women should ensure their husbands’ “perseverance in the paths of rectitude” and called for loyal “republican mothers” who would instruct “their sons in the principles of liberty and government.” To see a longer excerpt of Thoughts on Female Education, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.

 Christian ministers readily embraced this idea of republican motherhood. “Preserving virtue and instructing the young are not the fancied, but the real ‘Rights of Women,’ ” the Reverend Thomas Bernard told the Female Charitable Society of Salem, Massachusetts. He urged his audience to dismiss public roles for women, such as voting or serving on juries, that English femi- IDENTIFY CAUSES nist Mary Wollstonecraft had How did republican ideals, new economic circumadvocated in A Vindication of the stances, and changing Rights of Woman (1792). Instead, cultural values affect marwomen should care for their chil- riage practices? dren, a responsibility that gave

AMERICAN VOICES

The Trials of
Married Life


 As the text explains, the ideal American marriage of the early nineteenth century was republican (a contract between equals) and romantic (a match in which mutual love was foremost). Were these ideals attainable, given the social authority of men and the volatility of human passions? Letters, memoirs, and diaries are excellent sources for answering these questions. These selections from the personal writings of a variety of American women offer insights into the new system of marriage and how changes in cultural values intersected with individual lives.

Emma Hart Willard


The Danger of High Expectations
 Born in Connecticut in 1787, Emma Hart married John Willard in 1809. An early proponent of advanced education for women, she founded female academies in Middlebury, Vermont (1814), and Waterford and Troy, New York (1821). She wrote this letter to her sister, Almira Hart, in 1815.

 You think it strange that I should consider a period of happiness as more likely than any other to produce future misery. I know I did not sufficiently explain myself. Those tender and delicious sensations which accompany successful love, while they soothe and soften the mind, diminish its strength to bear or to conquer difficulties. It is the luxury of the soul; and luxury always enervates. . . . This life is a life of vicissitude. . . . [Suppose] you are secured to each other for life. It will be natural that, at first, he should be much devoted to you; but, after a while, his business must occupy his attention. While absorbed in that he will perhaps neglect some of those little tokens of affection which have become necessary to your happiness. His affairs will sometimes go wrong, . . . and he may sometimes hastily give you a harsh word or a frown. But where is the use, say you, of diminishing my present enjoyment by such gloomy apprehensions? Its use is this, that, if you enter the marriage state believing such things to be absolutely impossible, if you should meet them, they would come upon you with double force. Caroline Howard Gilman

Female Submission in Marriage
 Born in Boston in 1794, Caroline Howard married in 1819 and moved to Charleston, South Carolina, with her husband, Samuel Gilman, a Unitarian minister. A novelist, she published Recollections of a Housekeeper (1835), a portrait of domestic life in New England, and Recollections



 of a Southern Matron (1838), a fictional account that includes this selection.

 The planter’s bride, who leaves a numerous and cheerful family in her paternal home, little imagines the change which awaits her in her own retired residence. She dreams of an independent sway over her household, devoted love and unbroken intercourse with her husband, and indeed longs to be released from the eyes of others, that she may dwell only beneath the sunbeam of his. And so it was with me. . . . There we were together, asking for nothing but each other’s presence and love. At length it was necessary for him to tear himself away to superintend his interests. . . . But the period of absence was gradually protracted; then a friend sometimes came home with him, and their talk was of crops and politics, draining the fields and draining the revenue. . . . A growing discomfort began to work upon my mind. I had undefined forebodings; I mused about past days; my views of life became slowly disorganized; my physical powers enfeebled; a nervous excitement followed: I nursed a moody discontent. . . . If the reign of romance was really waning, I resolved not to chill his noble confidence, but to make a steadier light rise on his affections. . . . This task of self-government was not easy. To repress a harsh answer, to confess a fault . . . in gentle submission, sometimes requires a struggle like life and death; but these . . . efforts are the golden threads with which domestic happiness is woven. . . . How clear is it, then, that woman loses by petulance and recrimination! Her first study must be self-control, almost to hypocrisy. A good wife must smile amid a thousand perplexities. Martha Hunter Hitchcock

Isolation, Unmentionable Sorrows,
 and Suffering Martha Hunter Hitchcock married a doctor in the U.S. Army. These excerpts from letters, in the Virginia Historical

 Society, to her cousins Martha and Sarah Hunter describe her emotional dependence on her husband and her unhappy life.

To Martha Hunter, 1840:
 If I had never married how much of pain, and dissatisfaction, should I have escaped — at all events I should never have known what jealousy is. You must not betray me, dear cousin, for despite all my good resolutions, I find it impossible always to struggle against my nature — the school of indulgence, in which I was educated, was little calculated to teach me, those lessons of forbearance, which I have had to practice so frequently, since my marriage — it is ungrateful in me to murmur, if perchance a little bitter is mingled in my cup of life. To Sarah Hunter, 1841: I have lived so long among strangers since my marriage, that when I contrast it with the old warm affection, in which I was nurtured, the contrast is so terrible, that I cannot refrain from weeping at the thought of it — I hope my dear cousin, that yours, will be a happier destiny than mine, in that respect — only think of it! Nearly a year and a half have passed away, since I have seen, a single relation! To Martha Hunter, 1845: Uneasiness about [my daughter] Lillie, and very great sorrows of my own, which I cannot commit to paper, have almost weighed me down to the grave; and indeed, without any affectation, I look forward to that, as the only real rest, I shall ever know. To Martha Hunter, 1846: Lillie had the scarlet fever, during our visit to Alabama, and she has never recovered from the effects of it — My life is a constant vigil — and there is nothing which wearies mind, and body, so much, as watching a sickly child. . . . All this I have to endure, and may have to suffer more for I know not, what Fate may have in store for me. Elizabeth Scott Neblett

My Seasons of Gloom and Despondency
 Elizabeth Scott Neblett lived with her husband and children in Navarro County, Texas. In 1860, she reflected in her diary on her bouts of depression and the difficulties of

 wives and husbands in understanding each other’s inner lives.

 It has now been almost eight years since I became a married woman. Eight years of checkered good and ill, and yet thro’ all it seems the most of the ill has fallen to my lot, until now my poor weak cowardly heart sighs only for its final resting place, where sorrow grief nor pain can never reach it more. I feel that I have faithfully discharged my duty towards you and my children, but for this I know that I deserve no credit nor aspire to none; my affection has been my prompter, and the task has proven a labor of love. You have not rightly understood me at all times, and being naturally very hopeful you could in no measure sympathize with me during my seasons of gloom and despondency. . . . But marriage is a lottery and that your draw proved an unfortunate one on your part is not less a subject of regret with me than you. . . . It is useless to say that during these eight years I have suffered ten times more than you have and ten times more than I can begin to make you conceive of, but of course you can not help the past, nor by knowing my suffering relieve it, but it might induce you to look with more kindness upon [my] faults. . . . The 17th of this month I was 27 years old and I think my face looks older than that, perhaps I’ll never see an other birth day and I don’t grieve at the idea. Source: These selections are abridged versions of materials in Anya Jabour, ed., Major Problems in the History of American Families and Children (Boston: Houghton Mifflin, 2005), 108–113.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
What problems do these women share? How might their problems reflect larger social and economic issues in nineteenth-century America? 2. How would you characterize the unhappiness of these women? In what ways is it related to their expectations about love-based marriage? 3. What was Caroline Gilman’s advice to wives? How does it apply to the other women in this section? 4. Do these selections suggest that most American women had unfulfilled marriages? Or were these isolated cases? Would you expect to find more records of happy or unhappy marriages? 




 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 them “an extensive power over the fortunes of man in every generation.”

Raising Republican Children
 Republican values changed assumptions about inheritance and child rearing. English common law encouraged primogeniture, the bequest of the family’s property to the eldest son (Chapter 1). After the Revolution, most state legislatures enacted statutes specifying equal division of the estate among all children, when there was no will. Most American parents applauded these statutes because they were already treating their children equally and with respect.

 Two Modes of Parenting Indeed, many European visitors believed that republican parents gave their children too much respect and freedom. Because of the “general ideas of Liberty and Equality engraved on their hearts,” a Polish aristocrat suggested around 1800, American children had “scant respect” for their parents. Several decades later, a British traveler stood dumbfounded when an American father excused his son’s “resolute disobedience” with a smile and the remark, “A sturdy republican, sir.” The traveler

 speculated that American parents encouraged such independence to prepare youth to “go their own way” in the world. Permissive child rearing was not universal. Foreign visitors interacted primarily with well-to-do Episcopalians and Presbyterians who held an Enlightenment conception of children. This outlook, transmitted by religious authors influenced by John Locke, viewed children as “rational creatures” best trained by means of advice and praise. The parents’ role was to develop their child’s conscience, self-discipline, and sense of responsibility. Families in the rapidly expanding middle class widely adopted this rationalist method of child rearing. By contrast, many yeomen and tenant farmers, influenced by the Second Great Awakening, raised their children in an authoritarian fashion. Evangelical Baptist and Methodist writers insisted that children were “full of the stains and pollution of sin” and needed strict rules and harsh discipline. Fear was a “useful and necessary principle in family government,” minister John Abbott advised parents; a child “should submit to your authority, not to your arguments or persuasions.” Abbott told parents to instill humility in children and to teach them to subordinate their personal desires to God’s will.

 The Battle over Education Here an unknown artist pokes fun at a tyrannical schoolmaster and, indirectly, at the strict approach to child rearing taken by evangelical authors, parents, and teachers. The students’ faces reflect the artist’s own rationalist outlook. One Enlightenment-minded minister suggested that we see in young children’s eyes “the first dawn of reason, beaming forth its immortal rays.” Picture Research Consultants & Archives.

 CHAPTER 8

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820




 Women’s Education Even in education-conscious New England, before 1800 few girls attended free public primary schools for more than a few years. Subsequently, as this detail from Scenes from a Seminary for Young Ladies (c. 1810– 1820) indicates, some girls stayed in school into their teenage years and studied a wide variety of subjects, including geography. Many graduates of these female academies became teachers, a new field of employment for women. The St. Louis Art Museum, Missouri, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library.

 Debates over Education Although families provided most moral and intellectual training, republican ideology encouraged publicly supported schooling. Bostonian Caleb Bingham, an influential textbook author, called for “an equal distribution of knowledge to make us emphatically a ‘republic of letters.’ ” Both Thomas Jefferson and Benjamin Rush proposed ambitious schemes for a comprehensive system of primary and secondary schooling, followed by college training for bright young men. They also envisioned a university in which distinguished scholars would lecture on law, medicine, theology, and political economy. To ordinary citizens, whose teenage children had to labor in the fields or workshops, talk of secondary and college education smacked of elitism. Farmers, artisans, and laborers wanted elementary schools that would instruct their children in the “three Rs” — reading, ’riting, and ’rithmetic — and make them literate enough to read the Bible. In New England, locally funded public schools offered basic instruction to most boys and some girls. In other regions, there were few publicly supported schools, and only 25 percent of the boys and perhaps 10 percent of the girls attended private institutions or had personal tutors. Even in New England, only a few young men and almost no young women went on to grammar school (high school), and less than 1 percent of men attended college. “Let anybody show what advantage the poor man receives from colleges,” an anonymous “Old Soldier” wrote to the Maryland Gazette. “Why should they support them, unless it is to serve those who are in affluent circumstances, whose children can be spared from labor, and receive the benefits?” Although many state constitutions encouraged support for education, few legislatures acted until the 1820s. Then a new generation of educational

 reformers, influenced by merchants and manufacturers, raised standards by certifying qualified teachers and appointing statewide superintendents of schools. To encourage students, the reformers chose textbooks UNDERSTAND such as Parson Mason Weems’s POINTS OF VIEW The Life of George Washington Which form of child (c. 1800), which praised honesty rearing — the rationalist and hard work and condemned or the authoritarian — was gambling, drinking, and laziness. the most compatible with To bolster patriotism and shared republican values and cultural ideals, reformers required why? the study of American history. As a New Hampshire schoolboy, Thomas Low recalled: “We were taught every day and in every way that ours was the freest, the happiest, and soon to be the greatest and most powerful country of the world.”

Promoting Cultural Independence Like Caleb
 Bingham, writer Noah Webster wanted to raise the nation’s intellectual prowess. Asserting that “America must be as independent in literature as she is in politics,” he called on his fellow citizens to free themselves “from the dependence on foreign opinions and manners, which is fatal to the efforts of genius in this country.” Webster’s Dissertation on the English Language (1789) celebrated language as a marker of national identity by defining words according to American usage. With less success, it proposed that words be spelled as they were pronounced, that labour (British spelling), for example, be spelled labur. Still, Webster’s famous “blue-back speller,” a compact textbook first published in 1783, sold 60 million copies over the next half century and served the needs of Americans of all backgrounds. “None of us was ’lowed to see a book,” an enslaved African American recalled, “but we gits hold



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 of that Webster’s old blue-back speller and we . . . studies [it].” Despite Webster’s efforts, a republican literary culture developed slowly. Ironically, the most successful writer in the new republic was Washington Irving, an elitist-minded Federalist. His whimsical essay and story collections — which included the tales of “Rip Van Winkle” and “The Legend of Sleepy Hollow” — sold well in America and won praise abroad. Frustrated by the immaturity of American cultural life, Irving lived for seventeen years in Europe, reveling in its aristocratic culture and intense intellectuality. Apart from Irving, no American author was well known in Europe or, indeed, in the United States. “Literature is not yet a distinct profession with us,” Thomas Jefferson told an English friend. “Now and then a strong mind arises, and at its intervals from business emits a flash of light. But the first object of young societies is bread and covering.” Not until the 1830s and 1840s would American authors achieve a professional identity and make a significant contribution to Western literature (Chapter 11).

 prompted by Royal Governor Lord Dunmore’s proclamation of 1775 (Chapter 5), circulated among slaves in Virginia and the Carolinas, prompting thousands of African Americans to flee behind British lines. Two neighbors of Virginia Patriot Richard Henry Lee lost “every slave they had in the world,” as did many other planters. In 1781, when the British army evacuated Charleston, more than 6,000 former slaves went with them; another 4,000 left from Savannah. All told, 30,000 blacks may have fled their owners. Hundreds of freed black Loyalists settled permanently in Canada. More than 1,000 others, poorly treated in British Nova Scotia, sought a better life in Sierra Leone, West

Aristocratic Republicanism
 and Slavery Republicanism in the South differed significantly from that in the North. Enslaved Africans constituted onethird of the South’s population; their bondage contradicted the new nation’s professed ideology of freedom and equality. “How is it that we hear the loudest yelps for liberty among the drivers of Negroes?” British author Samuel Johnson had chided the American rebels in 1775, a point that some Patriots took to heart. “I wish most sincerely there was not a Slave in the province,” Abigail Adams confessed to her husband, John. “It always appeared a most iniquitous Scheme to me — to fight ourselves for what we are daily robbing and plundering from those who have as good a right to freedom as we have.”

The Revolution and Slavery,
1776–1800
 In fact, the whites’ struggle for independence had raised the prospect of freedom for blacks. As the Revolutionary War began, a black preacher in Georgia told his fellow slaves that King George III “came up with the Book [the Bible], and was about to alter the World, and set the Negroes free.” Similar rumors, probably

Republican Families . . . and Servants
 Around 1828, an unidentified artist painted this York, Pennsylvania, family with an African American servant. The artist gives equal emphasis to the wife and the husband, suggesting they enjoyed a companionate-style marriage. Reflecting the outlook of republican motherhood, the mother takes the leading role in educating the children. The family, probably of upper-middle-class status given their attire and furnishings, employs an African American woman as a domestic servant and nanny — common occupations among free black women of the time. The Saint Louis Art Museum, Missouri, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library.

 CHAPTER 8

Manumission and Gradual Emancipation Yet
 thousands of African Americans supported the Patriot cause. Eager to raise their social status, free blacks in New England volunteered for military service in the First Rhode Island Company and the Massachusetts “Bucks.” In Maryland, some slaves took up arms for the rebels in return for the promise of freedom. Enslaved Virginians struck informal bargains with their Patriot owners, trading loyalty in wartime for the hope of liberty. Following the Virginia legislature’s passage of a manumission act in 1782, allowing owners to free their slaves, 10,000 slaves won their freedom. Two other developments — one religious, the other intellectual — encouraged manumission. Beginning in the 1750s, Quaker evangelist John Woolman urged Friends to free their slaves, and many did so. Rapidly growing evangelical churches, especially Methodists and Baptists, initially advocated slave emancipation; in 1784, a conference of Virginia Methodists declared MAP 8.2

L


The Status of Slavery, 1800
.S


 er up

 ior

 This simple map illustrates a complex process: the abolition of slavery in the United States up to 1800. The political boundaries are those of the states and territories in 1800. VERMONT MAINE (1777) (part of MASS.) BR I TI S H (1780) N O R TH A MER I C A L.

L.
Michigan 

 ron Hu

N.H.
(1783)


 rio L. Onta NEW YORK

L. E


 MASS. (1780) RHODE ISLAND CONN.

 rie PENNSYLVANIA

NEW JERSEY

OHIO TERRITORY
(1787) 
INDIANA TERRITORY
(1787) 
DELAWARE VIRGINIA

SP A N I S H LOU I S I A N A

 MARYLAND

 KENTUCKY

 Some areas marked “free” on the map, the Indiana Territory, for example, actually had slaves dating from the French colonial days.

NORTH CAROLINA

 In 1800, the free black population of the United States numbered about 100,000, roughly 10 percent of those of African ancestry. Half of these free blacks lived in states in which slavery remained legal until the end of the Civil War.

 GEORGIA

 FL

S


 Free (date when slavery eliminated) Gradual abolition Slave

O
RI DA

Gulf of Me x i co


E


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

SOUTH CAROLINA

 SPANISH

N


W


 TENNESSEE

FUTURE MISSISSIPPI TERRITORY

 The three colors show areas where slavery was legally abolished, where it continued to exist, and where it was in the process of being eliminated. (after Paullin)



 that slavery was “contrary to the IDENTIFY CAUSES Golden Law of God on which Why did aristocratic repubhang all the Law and Prophets.” licanism develop in the Meanwhile, Enlightenment South, and what were its philosophy challenged the wide- defining features? spread belief among whites that Africans were inherently inferior to Europeans. According to John Locke, ideas were not innate but stemmed from a person’s experiences in the world. Pointing out the obvious — “A state of slavery has a mighty tendency to shrink and contract the minds of men” — Enlightenment-influenced Americans suggested that the debased condition of blacks reflected their oppressive captivity. Quaker philanthropist Anthony Benezet declared that African Americans were “as capable of improvement as White People” and funded a Philadelphia school for their education. Swept along by these religious and intellectual currents, legislators in northern states enacted gradual emancipation statutes (Map 8.2). These laws recognized white property rights by requiring slaves to buy their freedom by years — even decades — of additional

 Africa, a settlement founded by English antislavery organizations.

 In 1775, racial slavery was legal in all of the British colonies in North America. By the time the confederated states achieved their independence in 1783, the New England region was mostly free of slavery. By 1800, all of the states north of Maryland had provided for the gradual abolition of slavery, but the process of gradual emancipation dragged on until the 1830s. Some slave owners in the Chesapeake region manumitted a number of their slaves, leaving only the whites of the Lower South firmly committed to racial bondage.

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820






 200 miles 200 kilometers



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 labor. For example, the New York Emancipation Act of 1799 allowed slavery to continue until 1828 and freed slave children only at the age of twenty-five. Consequently, as late as 1810, almost 30,000 blacks in the northern states — nearly one-fourth of the African Americans living there — were still enslaved. Freed blacks faced severe prejudice from whites who feared job competition and racial melding. When Massachusetts judges abolished slavery through case law in 1784, the legislature reenacted an old statute that prohibited whites from marrying blacks, mulattos, or Indians. For African Americans in the North, freedom meant second-class citizenship.

 Slavery Defended The southern states faced the most glaring contradiction between liberty and property rights, because enslaved blacks represented a huge financial investment. Some Chesapeake tobacco planters, moved by evangelical religion or an oversupply of workers, manumitted their slaves or allowed them to buy their freedom by working as artisans or laborers. Such measures gradually brought freedom to one-third of the African Americans in Maryland. Farther south, slavery remained ascendant. Fearing total emancipation, hundreds of slave owners petitioned the Virginia legislature to repeal the manumission act. Heeding this demand to protect “the most valuable and indispensible Article of our Property, our Slaves,” legislators forbade further manumissions in 1792. Following the lead of Thomas Jefferson, who owned more than a hundred slaves, political leaders now argued that slavery was a “necessary evil” required to maintain white supremacy and the luxurious planter lifestyle. In North Carolina, legislators condemned private Quaker manumissions as “highly criminal and reprehensible.” Moreover, the slave-hungry ricegrowing states of South Carolina and Georgia reopened the Atlantic slave trade. Between 1790 and 1808, merchants in Charleston and Savannah imported about 115,000 Africans, selling thousands to French and American sugar planters in Louisiana. Debate in the South over emancipation ended in 1800, when Virginia authorities thwarted an uprising planned by Gabriel Prosser, an enslaved artisan, and hanged him and thirty of his followers. “Liberty and equality have brought the evil upon us,” a letter to the Virginia Herald proclaimed, denouncing such doctrines as “dangerous and extremely wicked.” To preserve their privileged social position, southern leaders redefined republicanism. They restricted individual liberty and legal equality to whites, creating what historians call a herrenvolk (“master race”) republic.

The North and South Grow Apart
 European visitors to the United States agreed that North and South had distinct characters. A British observer labeled New England the home to religious “fanaticism” but added that “the lower orders of citizens” there had “a better education, [and were] more intelligent” than those he met in the South. “The state of poverty in which a great number of white people live in Virginia” surprised the Marquis de Chastellux. Other visitors to the South likewise commented on the rude manners, heavy drinking, and weak work ethic of its residents. White tenants and smallholding farmers seemed only to have a “passion for gaming at the billiard table, a cock-fight or cards,” and rich planters squandered their wealth on extravagant lifestyles while their slaves endured bitter poverty. Some southerners worried that human bondage had corrupted white society. “Where there are Negroes a White Man despises to work,” one South Carolina merchant commented. Moreover, well-to-do planters, able to hire tutors for their own children, did little to provide other whites with elementary schooling. In 1800, elected officials in Essex County, Virginia, spent about 25 cents per person for local government, including schools, while their counterparts in Acton, Massachusetts, allocated about $1 per person. This difference in support for education mattered: by the 1820s, nearly all native-born men and women in New England could read and write, while more than onethird of white southerners could not.

 Slavery and National Politics As the northern states ended human bondage, the South’s commitment to slavery became a political issue. At the Philadelphia convention in 1787, northern delegates had reluctantly accepted clauses allowing slave imports for twenty years and guaranteeing the return of fugitive slaves (Chapter 6). Seeking even more protection for their “peculiar institution,” southerners in the new national legislature won approval of James Madison’s resolution that “Congress have no authority to interfere in the emancipation of slaves, or in the treatment of them within any of the States.” Nonetheless, slavery remained a contested issue. The black slave revolt in Haiti brought 6,000 white and mulatto planters and their slaves to the United States in 1793, and stories of Haitian atrocities frightened American slave owners (Chapter 7). Meanwhile, northern politicians assailed the British impressment of American sailors as just “as oppressive and tyrannical as the slave trade” and demanded the end of both.

 CHAPTER 8

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820




Aristocratic Republicanism in South
Carolina
 The money that paid for Drayton Hall came originally from raising cattle in South Carolina for sale in the West Indies. At his death in 1717, Thomas Drayton left an estate that included 1,300 cattle and 46 slaves (both Native American and African). His third son, John (1715–1779), used his inheritance to buy slaves and to create a rice-growing plantation along the Ashley River. The home he erected on the site, Drayton Hall (built 1738–1742), reflected the designs of Andrea Palladio, the Italian Renaissance architect who celebrated the concepts of classical Roman proportion and decoration in his widely read The Four Books of Architecture (1516). Photo courtesy of Drayton Hall.

 When Congress outlawed the Atlantic slave trade in 1808, some northern representatives demanded an end to the trade in slaves between states. Southern leaders responded with a forceful defense of their labor system. “A large majority of people in the Southern states do not consider slavery as even an evil,” declared one congressman. The South’s political clout — its domination of the presidency and the Senate — ensured that the national government would protect slavery. American diplomats vigorously demanded compensation for slaves freed by British troops during the War of 1812, and Congress enacted legislation upholding slavery in the District of Columbia.

African Americans Speak Out Heartened by the
 end of the Atlantic slave trade, black abolitionists spoke out. In speeches and pamphlets, Henry Sipkins and Henry Johnson pointed out that slavery — “relentless tyranny,” they called it — was a central legacy of America’s colonial history. For inspiration, they looked to the Haitian Revolution; for collective support, they joined in secret societies, such as Prince Hall’s African Lodge of Freemasons in Boston. Initially, black (and white) antislavery advocates hoped that slavery would die out naturally as the tobacco economy declined. However, a boom in cotton planting dramatically increased the demand for slaves, and Louisiana (1812), Mississippi (1817), and Alabama (1819) joined the Union with state constitutions permitting slavery. As some Americans redefined slavery as a problem rather than a centuries-old social condition, a group of prominent citizens founded the American Colonization

 Society in 1817. According to Henry Clay — a society member, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and a slave owner — racial bondage hindered economic progress. It had placed his state of Kentucky “in the rear of our neighbors . . . in the state of agriculture, the progress of manufactures, the advance of improvement, and the general prosperity of society.” Clay and other colonizationists argued that slaves had to be freed and then resettled, in Africa or elsewhere; emancipation without removal would lead to chaos — “a civil war that would end in the extermination or subjugation of the one race or the other.” Given the cotton boom, few planters responded to the society’s plea. It resettled only about 6,000 African Americans in Liberia, its colony on the west coast of Africa. Most free blacks strongly opposed such colonization schemes because they saw themselves as Americans. As Bishop Richard Allen of the African Methodist Episcopal Church put it, “[T]his land which we have watered with our tears and our blood is now our mother EXPLAIN country.” Allen spoke from expe- CONSEQUENCES rience. Born into slavery in Why did the colonization Philadelphia in 1760 and sold to a movement of the 1810s farmer in Delaware, Allen grew fail? up in bondage. In 1777, Freeborn Garretson, an itinerant preacher, converted Allen to Methodism and convinced Allen’s owner that on Judgment Day, slaveholders would be “weighted in the balance, and . . . found wanting.” Allowed to buy his freedom, Allen enlisted in the Methodist cause, becoming a “licensed exhorter” and then a regular minister in



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

The Reverend Richard Allen and the African Methodist Episcopal Church
 One of the best-known African Americans in the early republic, Richard Allen founded a separate congregation for Philadelphia’s black Methodists, the Bethel Church. Working with other ministers in 1816, he created the first independent black religious domination in the United States — the African Methodist Episcopal (AME) Church — and became its first bishop. Library of Congress / Picture Research Consultants & Archives.

 Philadelphia. In 1795, Allen formed a separate black congregation, the Bethel Church; in 1816, he became the first bishop of a new denomination: the African Methodist Episcopal Church. Two years later, 3,000 African Americans met in Allen’s church to condemn colonization and to claim American citizenship. Sounding the principles of democratic republicanism, they vowed to defy racial prejudice and advance in American society using “those opportunities . . . which the Constitution and the laws allow to all.”

The Missouri Crisis, 1819–1821
 The abject failure of colonization set the stage for a major battle over slavery. In 1818, Congressman Nathaniel Macon of North Carolina warned that radical members of the “bible and peace societies” intended to place “the question of emancipation” on the national political agenda. When Missouri applied for admission to the Union in 1819, Congressman James Tallmadge of New York did so: he would support statehood for Missouri only if its constitution banned the entry of new slaves and provided for the emancipation of existing bonds-people. Missouri whites rejected Tallmadge’s proposals, and the northern majority in the House of Representatives blocked the territory’s admission. White southerners were horrified. “It is believed by some, & feared by others,” Alabama senator John

 Walker reported from Washington, that Tallmadge’s amendment was “merely the entering wedge and that it points already to a total emancipation of the blacks.” Mississippi congressman Christopher Rankin accused his northern colleagues of brinksmanship: “You conduct us to an awful precipice, and hold us over it.” Underlining their commitment to slavery, southerners used their power in the Senate — where they held half the seats — to withhold statehood from Maine, which was seeking to separate itself from Massachusetts.

 Constitutional Issues In the ensuing debate, southerners advanced three constitutional arguments. First, they invoked the principle of “equal rights,” arguing that Congress could not impose conditions on Missouri that it had not imposed on other territories. Second, they maintained that the Constitution guaranteed a state’s sovereignty with respect to its internal affairs and domestic institutions, such as slavery and marriage. Finally, they insisted that Congress had no authority to infringe on the property rights of individual slaveholders. Beyond those arguments, southern leaders defended human bondage. Downplaying the proposition that slavery was a “necessary evil,” they now justified slavery on religious grounds. “Christ himself gave a sanction to slavery,” declared Senator William Smith of South Carolina. “If it be offensive and sinful to own slaves,” a prominent Mississippi Methodist added, “I

 CHAPTER 8

 wish someone would just put his finger on the place in Holy Writ.” Controversy raged in Congress and the press for two years before Henry Clay devised a series of political agreements known collectively as the Missouri Compromise. Faced with unwavering southern opposition to Tallmadge’s amendment, a group of northern congressmen deserted the antislavery coalition. They accepted a deal that allowed Maine to enter the Union as a free state in 1820 and Missouri to follow as a slave state in 1821. This bargain preserved a balance in the Senate between North and South and set a precedent for future admissions to the Union. For their part, southern senators accepted the prohibition of slavery in most of the Louisiana Purchase, all the lands north of latitude 36°30' except for the state of Missouri (Map 8.3). As they had in the Philadelphia convention of 1787, white politicians preserved the Union by compromising over slavery. However, the delegates in Philadelphia had resolved their sectional differences in two months; it took Congress two years to work out the Missouri Compromise, which even then did not command universal support. “[B]eware,” the Richmond Enquirer protested sharply as southern representatives agreed to exclude slavery from most of the Louisiana Purchase: “What is a territorial restriction to-day becomes a state restriction tomorrow.” The fate of the western lands,

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


 enslaved blacks, and the Union PLACE EVENTS itself were now intertwined, rais- IN CONTEXT ing the specter of civil war and the What compromises over end of the American republican slavery did Congress make experiment. As the aging Thomas to settle the Missouri Jefferson exclaimed during the crisis? Missouri crisis, “This momentous question, like a fire-bell in the night, awakened and filled me with terror.”

Protestant Christianity
 as a Social Force Throughout the colonial era, religion played a significant role in American life but not an overwhelming one. Then, beginning around 1790, religious revivals planted the values of Protestant Christianity deep in the national character and gave a spiritual dimension to American republicanism. These revivals especially changed the lives of blacks and of women. Thousands of African Americans became Baptists and Methodists and created a powerful institution: the black Christian Church. Evangelical Christianity also gave rise to new public roles for white women, especially in the North, and set in motion long-lasting movements for social reform.

 MAP 8.3 The Missouri Compromise, 1820–1821 The Missouri Compromise resolved for a generation the issue of slavery in the lands of the Louisiana Purchase. The agreement prohibited slavery north of the Missouri Compromise line (36°30’ north latitude), with the exception of the state of Missouri. To maintain an equal number of senators from free and slave states in the U.S. Congress, the compromise provided for the nearly simultaneous admission to the Union of Missouri and Maine.

 CANADA

 MI

 ME. (Admitted as free state, 1820) VT.

 CH

 IG

 AN

N.H.
MASS. CT. R.I.

N.Y.


UNORGANIZED TERRITORY OHIO

 IND.

S


 MD.

 DEL.

ATLANTIC OCEAN

KY. N.C. TENN.



S.C.


ARKANSAS TERRITORY MISS.

W


N.J.


VA. MO.
(Admitted as slave state, 1821) 
N
E


 PA.

 ILL.

MEXICAN POSSESSIONS



 ALA.

 GA.

LA. FLORIDA TERRITORY

Gulf of Mexico






 400 miles

 400 kilometers

Free
Slave
 Closed to slavery by the Missouri Compromise Opened to slavery by the Missouri Compromise



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

A
Republican Religious Order  The republican revolution of 1776 forced American lawmakers to devise new relationships between church and state. Previously, only the Quaker- and Baptistcontrolled governments of Pennsylvania and Rhode Island had rejected a legally established church that claimed everyone as a member and collected compulsory religious taxes. Then, a convergence of factors — Enlightenment principles, wartime needs, and Baptist ideology — eliminated most state support for religion and allowed voluntary church membership.

 Religious Freedom Events in Virginia revealed the dynamics of change. In 1776, James Madison and George Mason advanced Enlightenment ideas of religious toleration as they persuaded the state’s constitutional convention to guarantee all Christians the “free exercise of religion.” This measure, which ended the privileged legal status of the Anglican Church, won Presbyterian and Baptist support for the independence struggle. Baptists, who also opposed public support of religion, convinced lawmakers to reject a tax bill (supported by George Washington and Patrick Henry) that would have funded all Christian churches. Instead, in 1786, the Virginia legislature enacted Thomas Jefferson’s bill for Establishing Religious Freedom, which made all churches equal in the eyes of the law and granted direct financial support to none. Elsewhere, the old order of a single established church crumbled away. In New York and New Jersey, the sheer number of denominations — Episcopalian, Presbyterian, Dutch Reformed, Lutheran, and Quaker, among others — prevented lawmakers from agreeing on an established church or compulsory religious taxes. Congregationalism remained the official church in the New England states until the 1830s, but members of other denominations could now pay taxes to their own churches. Church-State Relations Few influential Americans wanted a complete separation of church and state because they believed that religious institutions promoted morality and governmental authority. “Pure religion and civil liberty are inseparable companions,” a group of North Carolinians UNDERSTAND advised their minister. “It is your POINTS OF VIEW particular duty to enlighten manWhat were the main kind with the unerring principles principles of the new of truth and justice, the main republican religious props of all civil government.” regime? Accepting this premise, most state

 governments indirectly supported churches by exempting their property and ministers from taxation. Freedom of conscience also came with sharp cultural limits. In Virginia, Jefferson’s Religious Freedom act prohibited religious requirements for holding public office, but other states discriminated against those who were not Protestant Christians. The North Carolina Constitution of 1776 disqualified from public office any citizen “who shall deny the being of God, or the Truth of the Protestant Religion, or the Divine Authority of the Old or New Testament.” New Hampshire’s constitution contained a similar provision until 1868. Americans influenced by Enlightenment deism and by evangelical Protestantism condemned these religious restrictions. Jefferson, Franklin, and other American intellectuals maintained that God had given humans the power of reason so that they could determine moral truths for themselves. To protect society from “ecclesiastical tyranny,” they demanded complete freedom of conscience. The “truth is great and will prevail if left to herself,” Jefferson declared; “religion is a matter which lies solely between man and his God.” Many evangelical Protestants likewise demanded religious liberty to protect their churches from an oppressive government. Isaac Backus, a New England minister, warned Baptists not to incorporate their churches or accept public funds because that might lead to state control. In Connecticut, a devout Congregationalist welcomed “voluntarism,” the funding of churches by their members; it allowed the laity to control the clergy, he said, while also supporting selfgovernment and “the principles of republicanism.”

 Republican Church Institutions Following independence, Americans embraced churches that preached spiritual equality and governed themselves democratically while ignoring those with hierarchical and authoritarian institutions. Preferring Luther’s doctrine of the priesthood of all believers, few citizens accepted the authority claimed by Roman Catholic priests and bishops. Likewise, few Americans joined the Protestant Episcopal Church, the successor to the Church of England, because wealthy lay members dominated many congregations and it, too, had a hierarchy of bishops (Figure 8.1). The Presbyterian Church attracted more adherents, in part because its churches elected lay members to synods, the congresses that determined doctrine and practice. Evangelical Methodist and Baptist churches were by far the most successful institutions in attracting new members, especially from the “unchurched” — the

 CHAPTER 8





Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


Share of all
 congregations (%)



Anglican/
Episcopalian




2,100






Baptist




12,150








2,500






Congregational




2,200






Lutheran




2,100






Methodist




20,000








6,400






2,447


47,450


Catholic


Presbyterian


1,000


2,000


4,000


6,000


8,000


10,000


12,000


14,000


16,000


18,000


20,000


 FIGURE 8.1 Number of Church Congregations by Denomination, 1780 and 1860 The growth of evangelical churches, Methodist and Baptist, transformed American Christianity during the first half of the nineteenth century. Also noteworthy was the surge in the number of Roman Catholic congregations, the result of Catholic immigration from Ireland and Germany after 1830.

 great number of irreligious Americans. The Baptists boasted a thoroughly republican church organization, with self-governing congregations. Also, Baptists (and Methodists as well) developed an egalitarian religious culture marked by communal singing and emotional services. These denominations formed a dynamic new force in American religion.

The Second Great Awakening
 As Americans adopted new religious principles, a decades-long series of religious revivals — the Second Great Awakening — made the United States a genuinely Christian society. Evangelical denominations began the revival in the 1790s, as they spread their message in seacoast cities and the backcountry of New England. A new sect of Universalists, who repudiated Calvinism and preached universal salvation, also gained tens of thousands of converts, especially in Massachusetts and northern New England. After 1800, enthusiastic camp meetings swept the frontier regions of South Carolina, Tennessee, Ohio, and Kentucky. The largest gathering, at Cane Ridge in Kentucky in 1801, lasted for nine electrifying days and nights and attracted almost 20,000 people (Map 8.4). With these revivals, Baptist and Methodist preachers reshaped the spiritual landscape throughout the South. Offering a powerful emotional message and the promise of religious fellowship, revivalists attracted both unchurched individuals and pious families searching for social ties as they migrated to new communities (America Compared, p. 272).

A
New Religious Landscape The Second Great  Awakening transformed the denominational makeup of American religion. The main colonial-period churches — the Congregationalists, Episcopalians, and Quakers — grew slowly through natural increase, while Methodist and Baptist churches expanded spectacularly by winning converts. In rural areas, their preachers followed a regular circuit, “riding a hardy pony or horse” with their “Bible, hymn-book, and Discipline” to visit existing congregations. They began new churches by searching out devout families, bringing them together for worship, and then appointing lay elders to lead the congregation and enforce moral discipline. Soon, Baptists and Methodists were the largest denominations. To attract converts, evangelical ministers copied the “practical preaching” techniques of George Whitefield and other eighteenth-century revivalists (Chapter 4). They spoke from memory in plain language, raised their voice to make important points, and punctuated their words with theatrical gestures. “Preach without papers,” advised one minister. “[S]eem earnest & serious; & you will be listened to with Patience, & Wonder.” In the South, evangelical religion was initially a disruptive force because many ministers spoke of spiritual equality and criticized slavery. Husbands and planters grew angry when their wives became more assertive and when blacks joined evangelical congregations. To retain white men in their churches, Methodist and Baptist preachers gradually adapted their religious

AMERICA C O M PA R E D
Frances Trollope 
American Camp
Meetings and English
Church Hierarchies


 Frances Trollope, a successful English author and the mother of novelist Anthony Trollope, lived for a time in Cincinnati. She won great acclaim as the author of a critical-minded study, Domestic Manners of the Americans (1832), a best-seller in Europe and the United States.

 I found the opportunity I had long wished for, of attending a camp-meeting, . . . in a wild district on the confines of Indiana. . . . One of the preachers began in a low nasal tone, and, like all other Methodist preachers, assured us of the enormous depravity of man as he comes from the hands of his Maker, and of his perfect sanctification after he had wrestled sufficiently with the Lord. . . . The admiration of the crowd was evinced by almost constant cries of “Amen! Amen!” “Jesus! Jesus!” “Glory! Glory!” and the like. . . . [T]he preacher told them that “this night was the time fixed upon for anxious sinners to wrestle with the Lord” . . . and that such as needed their help were to come forward. . . . [A]bove a hundred persons, nearly all females, came forward, uttering howlings and groans, so terrible that I shall never cease to shudder when I recall them. They appeared to drag each other forward, and on the word being given, “let us pray,” they all fell on their knees; but this posture was soon changed for others that permitted greater scope for the convulsive movements of their limbs. . . . Many of these wretched creatures were beautiful young females. The preachers moved about among them, at once exciting and soothing their agonies. . . . I watched their tormentors breathing into their ears consolations that tinged the pale cheek with red. Had I been a man, I am sure I should have been guilty of some rash act of interference; nor do I believe that such a scene could have been acted in the presence of Englishmen, without instant punishment being inflicted . . . to check so turbulent and vicious a scene. ** ** **

 The critics who have from time to time reproached me with undue severity in my strictures on the domestic manners of the Americans have said that a candid examination of matters at home would have shown me that what I reprobated might be found in England, as well as in the United States. In most cases I have felt that this might be rebutted . . . by showing that what I complained of in the Union as indicative of imperfect civilisation, [whereas] if existing at all with us, could only be met with among persons in a much lower station of life. . . . But on the subject treated in the present chapter, justice compels me to avow that no such pleading can avail me. That such fearful profanation of the holy name of religion has rapidly increased among us since the year 1827, in which I quitted England for America, is most sadly certain. . . . [Yet, the bishops of the Church of England protect us from many excesses, while in America the lack of an established] national church, and of that guardian protection which its episcopal authority seems to promise against its desecration by the ever-varying innovations of sectarian licence, appeared to account for all the profanations I witnessed.

 message to justify the authority of yeomen patriarchs and slave-owning planters. Man was naturally at “the head of the woman,” declared one Baptist minister, while a Methodist conference told Christian slaves to be “submissive, faithful, and obedient.”

Source: Frances Trollope, Domestic Manners of the Americans (London: Whittaker,
 Treacher, 1832), 139, 142–144; the material following the asterisks comes from ibid., 5th ed. (London: R. Bentley, 1839), chapter 8.

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
According to Trollope, what accounts for the frequency of “profane” religious services in America and their relative absence in England? 2. How does Trollope use “social class” to analyze the differences between England and America? 
 Black Christianity Other evangelists persuaded planters to spread Protestant Christianity among their African American slaves. During the eighteenth century, most blacks had maintained the religious practices of their African homelands, giving homage to

 CHAPTER 8

 MAP 8.4

 CANADA

E


W


 In the 1820s an intense wave of revivals ignited religious fervor in communities VT. along the Erie Canal, and this region became (1791) known as the “burned-over district.”

S


L


 uperior .S

N.Y.


L.


 ro n L.

 e Canal Yale College

 rie

E


R.


 ssouri R. Muddy River Red River

Gasper
River


O


 INDIANA (1816)

 OHIO io (1803) h Cane Ridge

 VA.

 African gods and spirits or practicing Islam. “At the time I first went to Carolina,” remembered former slave Charles Ball, “there were a great many African slaves in the country. . . . Many of them believed there were several gods [and] I knew several . . . Mohamedans.” Beginning in the mid-1780s, Baptist and Methodist preachers converted hundreds of African Americans along the James River in Virginia and throughout the Chesapeake and the Carolinas. Subsequently, black Christians adapted Protestant teachings to their own needs. They generally ignored the doctrines of original sin and Calvinist predestination as well as biblical passages that prescribed unthinking obedience to authority. Some African American converts envisioned the Christian God as a warrior who had liberated the Jews. Their own “cause was similar to the Israelites,” preacher Martin Prosser told his fellow slaves as he and his brother Gabriel plotted rebellion in Virginia in 1800. “I have read in my Bible where God says, if we worship him, . . . five of you shall conquer a hundred and a hundred of you a hundred thousand of our enemies.” Confident of a special relationship with God, Christian slaves prepared

 CONN.

 Student revivals at Yale College and Andover Seminary around 1800 led to the expansion of Protestant missions in the West and also in Africa, India, and Hawaii. Societies supporting the missions combined into the American Home Missionary Society in 1826.

 KY. (1792)

ATLANTIC OCEAN

NORTH CAROLINA

 TENNESSEE (1796)

 Paths of settlement, 1790–1830 Camp meeting, 1801 Kentucky revival New York’s “burned-over district” Paths of revival

New
Haven R.I.


N.J.


 PA.

 ILLINOIS (1818)

Andover
Andover
Seminary


 MASS.

Eri


 As devout farmers moved west, they established new Protestant churches throughout the Upper South and Midwest.

Mi


 MAINE (1820)

N.H.


Hu


MICHIGAN TERRITORY

M
 iss iss

R.
 ippi

 The Second Great Awakening lasted for decades and invigorated churches in every part of the nation. The revivals in Kentucky and New York State were particularly influential. As thousands of farm families migrated to the West, they carried with them the religious excitement generated by the Cane Ridge revival in Kentucky in 1801. And, between 1825 and 1835, the area along the Erie Canal in New York witnessed such fervor that it came to be known as the Burnedover District.



N


L.
Michigan 

The Second Great Awakening,
1790–1860


Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


 The Second Great Awakening started in the 1790s as Baptists, Methodists, and a new sect called Universalists proselytized in New England. After 1800 the Awakening continued in Kentucky in camp meetings of pioneer farmers, who carried evangelical religion back to their communities.

 themselves spiritually for emancipation, the first step in their journey to the Promised Land.

Religion and Reform




 250 miles

 250 kilometers

COMPARE AND CONTRAST
How did evangelical and African American churches differ from other Protestant denominations? 
 Many whites also rejected the Calvinists’ emphasis on human depravity and weakness; instead, they celebrated human reason and free will. In New England, educated Congregationalists discarded the mysterious concept of the Trinity — Father, Son, and Holy Spirit — and, taking the name Unitarians, worshipped a “united” God and promoted rational thought. “The ultimate reliance of a human being is, and must be, on his own mind,” argued William Ellery Channing, a famous Unitarian minister. A children’s catechism conveyed the denomination’s optimistic message: “If I am good, God will love me, and make me happy.” Other New England Congregationalists softened Calvinist doctrines. Lyman Beecher, the preeminent Congregationalist clergyman, accepted the traditional Christian belief that people had a natural tendency to



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

Women in the Awakening
 The Second Great Awakening was a pivotal moment in the history of American women. In this detail from Religious Camp Meeting, painted by J. Maze Burbank in 1839, male preachers inspire religious frenzy, mostly among young women. In fact, most women embraced evangelical Christianity in a calm and measured manner, becoming dedicated workers, teachers, and morality-minded mothers. When tens of thousands of these women also joined movements for temperance, abolition, and women’s rights, they spurred a great wave of social reform. Old Dartmouth Historical Society/New Bedford Whaling Museum.

 sin; but, rejecting predestination, he affirmed the capacity of all men and women to choose God. By embracing the doctrine of free will, Beecher — along with “Free Will” Baptists — testified to the growing belief that people could shape their destiny. Reflecting this optimism, the Reverend Samuel Hopkins linked individual salvation to religious benevolence — the practice of disinterested virtue. As the Presbyterian minister John Rodgers explained, fortunate individuals who had received God’s grace or bounty had a duty “to dole out charity to their poorer brothers and sisters.” Heeding this message, pious

 merchants in New York City founded the Humane Society and other charitable organizations. Devout women aided their ministers by holding prayer meetings and distributing charity. By the 1820s, so many Protestant men and women had embraced benevolent reform that conservative church leaders warned them not to neglect spiritual matters. Still, improving society was a key element of the new religious sensibility. The mark of a true church, declared the devout Christian social reformer Lydia Maria Child, is when members’ “heads and hearts unite in working for the welfare of the human-race.”

 CHAPTER 8

 By the 1820s, many Protestant Christians had embraced that goal. Unlike the First Great Awakening, which split churches into warring factions, the Second Great Awakening fostered cooperation among denominations. Religious leaders founded five interdenominational societies: the American Education Society (1815), the Bible Society (1816), the Sunday School Union (1824), the Tract Society (1825), and the Home Missionary Society (1826). Based in eastern cities — New York, Boston, and Philadelphia — these societies dispatched hundreds of missionaries to the West and distributed thousands of religious pamphlets. Increasingly, American Protestants saw themselves as a movement that could change the course of history. “I want to see our state evangelized,” declared a churchgoer near the Erie Canal: “Suppose the great State of New York in all its physical, political, moral, commercial, and pecuniary resources should come over to the Lord’s side. Why it would turn the scale and could convert the world. I shall have no rest until it is done.” Because the Second Great Awakening aroused such enthusiasm, religion became an important new force in political life. On July 4, 1827, the Reverend Ezra Stiles Ely called on the Philadelphia Presbyterians to begin a “Christian party in politics.” Ely’s sermon, “The Duty of Christian Freemen to Elect Christian Rulers,” proclaimed a religious agenda for the American republic that Thomas Jefferson and John Adams would have found strange and troubling. The two founders had gone to their graves the previous year believing that America’s mission was to spread political republicanism. In contrast, Ely urged the United States to become an evangelical Christian nation dedicated to religious conversion at home and abroad: “All our rulers ought in their official capacity to serve the Lord Jesus Christ.” Evangelical Christians would issue similar calls during the Third (1880–1900) and Fourth (1970–present) Great Awakenings.

Creating a Republican Culture, 1790–1820


 she had died and been reincarCOMPARE AND nated as Christ, Wilkinson CONTRAST declared herself the “Publick How was the Second Great Universal Friend,” dressed in Awakening similar to, and masculine attire, and preached different from, the First a new gospel. Her teachings Great Awakening of the blended the Calvinist warning 1740s (Chapter 4)? of “a lost and guilty, gossiping, dying World’’ with Quaker-inspired plain dress, pacifism, and abolitionism. Wilkinson’s charisma initially won scores of converts, but her radical lifestyle and ambiguous gender aroused hostility, and her sect dwindled away.

A
Growing Public Presence Female-led sects had far less impact than thousands of women in mainstream churches. For example, women in New Hampshire churches managed more than fifty local 
 Women’s New Religious Roles The upsurge in religious enthusiasm allowed women to demonstrate their piety and even to found new sects. Mother Ann Lee organized the Shakers in Britain and in 1774 migrated to America, where she attracted numerous recruits; by the 1820s, Shaker communities dotted the American countryside from New Hampshire to Indiana. Jemima Wilkinson, a young Quaker woman in Rhode Island, found inspiration by reading George Whitefield’s sermons. After experiencing a vision that



Mrs. Juliann Jane Tillman, 1844
 In 1837, Mrs. Tillman explained in a newspaper article that she “was strangely wrought upon” and “went to God” for help. Soon, “what seemed to be an angel made his sudden appearance, and in his hand was a roll . . . on which was written, ‘Thee I have chosen to preach my gospel without delay.’” After much anguish and more supernatural visitations, Mrs. Tillman overcame strong personal doubts — and the equally strong opposition of male ministers and laity — and began to preach in the African Methodist Episcopal Church. Library of Congress.



 PART 3

REVOLUTION AND REPUBLICAN CULTURE, 1763–1820

 “cent” societies to raise funds for the Society for Promoting Christian Knowledge, New York City women founded the Society for the Relief of Poor Widows, and young Quaker women in Philadelphia ran the Society for the Free Instruction of African Females. Women took charge of religious and charitable enterprises because of their exclusion from other public roles and because of their numbers. After 1800, more than 70 percent of the members of New England Congregational churches were women. The predominance of women prompted Congregational ministers to end traditional gender-segregated prayer meetings, and evangelical Methodist and Baptist preachers actively promoted mixed-sex praying. “Our prayer meetings have been one of the greatest means of the conversion of souls,” a minister in central New York reported in the 1820s, “especially those in which brothers and sisters have prayed together.” Far from leading to sexual promiscuity, as critics feared, mixing men and women in religious activities promoted greater self-discipline. Believing in female virtue, young women and the men who courted them postIDENTIFY CAUSES poned sexual intercourse until Why did Protestant Chrisafter marriage — previously a tianity and Protestant much rarer form of self-restraint. women emerge as forces In Hingham, Massachusetts, and for social change? many other New England towns, more than 30 percent of the women who married between 1750 and 1800 bore a child within eight months of their wedding day; by the 1820s, the rate had dropped to 15 percent. As women claimed spiritual authority, men tried to curb their power. In both the North and the South, evangelical Baptist churches that had once advocated spiritual equality now prevented women from voting on church matters or offering public testimonies of faith. Testimonies by women, one layman declared, were “directly opposite to the apostolic command in [Corinthians] xiv, 34, 35, ‘Let your women learn to keep silence in the churches.’ ” Another man claimed, “Women have a different calling. That they be chaste, keepers at home is the Apostle’s direction.” Such injunctions merely changed the focus of women’s religious activism. Embracing the idea of republican motherhood, Christian women throughout the United States founded maternal associations to encourage proper child rearing. By the 1820s, Mother’s Magazine and other newsletters, widely read in hundreds of small

 towns and villages, were giving women a sense of shared identity and purpose. Religious activism also advanced female education, as churches sponsored academies where girls from the middling classes received intellectual and moral instruction. Emma Willard, the first American advocate of higher education for women, opened the Middlebury Female Seminary in Vermont in 1814 and later founded girls’ academies in Waterford and Troy, New York. Beginning in the 1820s, women educated in these seminaries and academies displaced men as public-school teachers, in part because they accepted lower pay than men would. Female schoolteachers earned from $12 to $14 a month with room and board — less than a farm laborer. However, as schoolteachers, women had an acknowledged place in public life — a status that previously had been beyond their reach. Just as the ideology of democratic republicanism had expanded voting rights and the political influence of ordinary white men in the North, so the values of Christian republicanism had bolstered the public authority of middling women. The Second Great Awakening made Americans a fervently Protestant people. Along with the values of republicanism and capitalism, this religious impulse formed the core of an emerging national identity.

SUMMARY
Like all important ideologies, republicanism has many facets. We have explored three of them in this chapter. We saw how state legislatures used governmentgranted charters and monopolies to support private businesses, with the goal of enhancing the commonwealth of society. This republican-inspired “commonwealth” policy of state mercantilism remained dominant until the 1840s, when classical liberal doctrines partially replaced it. We also saw how republicanism influenced social and family values. The principle of legal equality encouraged social mobility among white men and prompted men and women to seek companionate marriages. Republicanism likewise encouraged parents to provide their children with equal inheritances and to allow them to choose their marriage partners. In the South, republican doctrines of liberty and equality coexisted uneasily with racial slavery and class divisions, and ultimately they benefitted only a minority of the white population. 
 CHAPTER 8

 Finally, we observed the complex interaction of republicanism and religion. Stirred by republican principles, many citizens joined democratic and egalitarian denominations, particularly Methodist and Baptist churches. Inspired by “benevolent” ideas and the enthusiastic preachers of the Second Great Awakening,

CHAPTER REVIEW

 many women devoted their energies to religious purposes and social reform organizations. The result of all these initiatives — in economic policy, social relations, and religious institutions — was the creation of a distinctive American republican culture.

C H A P T E R


R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
TERMS TO KNOW

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
 “neomercantilist” (p. 250) Panic of 1819 (p. 251) Commonwealth System (p. 256) sentimentalism (p. 258) companionate marriages (p. 258) demographic transition (p. 259) republican motherhood (p. 259) manumission (p. 265)

Key People
 herrenvolk republic (p. 266) American Colonization Society (p. 267) Missouri Compromise (p. 269) established church (p. 270) voluntarism (p. 270) “unchurched” (p. 270) Second Great Awakening (p. 271)

John Jacob Astor (p. 250)
Benjamin Rush (p. 259)
Henry Clay (p. 267)
Richard Allen (p. 267)
Lyman Beecher (p. 273)
Emma Willard (p. 276)


REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. How important were the regional differences in

 the social aspects of republicanism, given the national scope of other republican-inspired developments such as state mercantilism and religious revivalism?

 2. Trace the relationship between America’s republi-

 can culture and the surge of evangelism called the Second Great Awakening. In what ways are the goals of the two movements similar? How are they different?

 3. In what ways did women’s private and public lives

 change during the years between 1790 and 1820,

 and what were the motive forces behind those changes? 4. THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING Review the

 events listed under “Work, Exchange, and Technology,” “Ideas, Beliefs, and Culture,” and “Identity” on the thematic timeline on page 149. How did the emerging economic and social order of early-nineteenth-century America represent an advance upon, or a retreat from, the republican ideology articulated during the decades of the independence struggle?





 PART 3

CHAPTER REVIEW

MAKING CONNECTIONS

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE
The text argues 
 that a distinct American identity had begun to emerge by 1820. How would you describe this identity, and how did it differ from the sense of identity in the American mainland colonies in 1750 (Chapter 4)? What forces might account for the changes?

MORE TO EXPLORE

 The painting of “Republican Families . . . and Servants” (p. 264) addresses many of the themes of this chapter. What are those themes, and what position does the artist take in presenting them?

VISUAL EVIDENCE

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

Nancy Cott, Public Vows: A History of Marriage and
 the Nation (2000). Analyzes the cultural and legal aspects of marriage. Jan Lewis, The Pursuit of Happiness (1983). Discusses the paternalistic slave-owning gentry of the Upper South. Jeffrey L. Pasley et al., eds., Beyond the Founders (2004). Shows how ordinary citizens promoted a democratic polity.

Randolph Ferguson Scully, Religion and the Making of
 Nat Turner’s Virginia (2008). Links the rise of evangelical Christianity in the South to the slave revolt led by Nat Turner. Bernard Weisberger, They Gathered at the River (1958). A classic study of the revivalists who led America’s Great Awakenings. Rosemarie Zagarri, Revolutionary Backlash (2007). Demonstrates the limited inclusion of women in politics.

 CHAPTER 8

 TIMELINE



CHAPTER REVIEW

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.

 St. Jean de Crèvecoeur publishes Letters from an American Farmer Virginia manumission law (repealed 1792)



 Noah Webster publishes his “blue-back speller”



 Slavery ends in Massachusetts Northern states begin gradual emancipation



 Benjamin Rush writes Thoughts on Female Education

 1790s

 States grant corporations charters and special privileges Private companies build roads and canals to facilitate trade Merchants expand rural outwork system Chesapeake blacks adopt Protestant beliefs Parents limit family size as farms shrink Second Great Awakening expands church membership



 Congress charters first Bank of the United States



 Mary Wollstonecraft publishes A Vindication of the Rights of Woman



Massachusetts Mill Dam Act




 Gabriel Prosser plots slave rebellion in Virginia

 1800s

 Rise of sentimentalism and of companionate marriages Women’s religious activism Founding of female academies Religious benevolence sparks social reform



 Cane Ridge revival in Kentucky



 Congress charters Second Bank of the United States



 Prominent whites create American Colonization Society



 Plummeting agricultural prices set off financial panic

1819–1821


Missouri Compromise


 1820s

 States reform education Women become schoolteachers

KEY TURNING POINTS:
The timeline mentions books by four authors (Crèvecoeur, Webster, 
 Rush, and Wollstonecraft) and two other entries relating to education. Based on the materials in Chapter 8, what might account for this blossoming of American literary and educational life?





Overlapping
Revolutions
1800–1860


P A R T


